Volume 37, Chapter 531.1: Breaking in! The Raid Starts!


The Spirit Eyes had seven rings, while the Ice Jade Empress Scorpion had eight. The rings of two different colors interchanged as they shone brilliantly. In the next instant, Huo Yuhao transformed into a gigantic eye that was floating in mid-air.

A deep melodic chanting sound began as the higher-ups who were waiting on the observation deck returned to their legions.

The Eye of the Asura! Yes, this was the Eye of the Asura!

The soul masters from the three different legions were all screaming inside with excitement.

Nine huge black doors slowly opened before the observation deck.

Actually, this was not the limit of Huo Yuhao’s ability. It was just unnecessary for him to use all of his abilities.

“Get ready to enter.” Huo Yuhao’s voice reverberated across the military drill ground.

The Heavy Artillery Soul Engineer Legion—the least mobile legion—was the first to move. They also happened to be the unit under Huo Yuhao. Under the control of the soul engineers, the three hundred Zhuge Divine Crossbow Cannons rolled towards the huge doors.

After the repeated improvements Xuan Ziwen had made, these crossbow cannons now had tracks. When necessary, they were able to use their stored soul power to drive themselves forward. Even though their speed was still fairly limited, it was a lot better than having to rely on human strength all the time.

It took a whole ten minutes for the three hundred crossbow cannons to fully enter the black doors into the spectral demiplane.

While they were slowly entering, two hundred figures had already activated their flying-type soul tools and were levitating in mid-air. This was none other than the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion—the only legion which possessed flight capabilities.

The Fort Soul Engineer Legion spread out into a fan shape as every single All-Terrain Self-Driving Fort fully extended their long legs. Compared to the Heavy Artillery Soul Engineer Legion, they were a lot more agile and mobile. They formed a fan shape and guarded the nine huge doors as though they were the sweepers of the team.

A few people stood at a corner of the military drill ground. As they watched the scene unfold before them, they could not help but nod. After these two years of rigorous training, these three legions now finally possessed true fighting power. It would depend on the commander as to how they would actually perform on the battlefield.

After the Heavy Artillery Soul Engineer Legion entered, it was the Fort Soul Engineer Legion’s turn. They were a lot faster, and it took them only four minutes to enter. Last but not least was the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion. They flew in from the top in an organized fashion, and only took two minutes.

In total, the three legions—which contained two thousand seven hundred people—took sixteen minutes to completely enter Huo Yuhao’s spectral demiplane. If one were to add in the time which Huo Yuhao used to chant the incantations, they would have used twenty minutes in total.

This meant that they would be able to retreat from anywhere in twenty minutes. This was definitely contingent on Huo Yuhao’s ability to escape detection, which had already been tested during his countless forays on the battlefield.

After the nine black doors were closed, the military drill ground returned to its formerly quiet state. One could only tell that there were many soul masters here previously from the tracks the heavy artillery and forts left on the ground.

The Eye of the Asura morphed back into Huo Yuhao’s figure. After landing on the ground, he moved towards the group of individuals who were standing under the tree at the corner of the military drill ground.

The leader amongst them was none other than Elder Xuan. The two Deans—Yan Shaozhe and Xian Lin’er—were standing by his side.

“Elder Xuan!” Huo Yuhao greeted politely.

Elder Xuan nodded and said, “The ball is now in your court. Let’s hope you can give us a much-needed miracle.”

Huo Yuhao smiled. “I am confident that we can pull it off. We will also have to depend on all of you for the battle at the frontline.”

Elder Xuan replied, “The Sun Moon Empire might be strong, but do you really think the three original empires of the Douluo Continent are a joke? It won’t be that easy for them to invade us. Anyways, I just received an update this morning. Just as we have predicted, the Sun Moon Empire’s army has already entered what was formerly the land of the Heavenly Soul Empire. They are now moving towards the southeast region of the Heavenly Soul Empire.”

Huo Yuhao started to break out into a sweat.

It seems like time really waits for no man! At the same time, the figure of a lady fleeted into his mind.

Ju Zi, are you still the commander leading the Sun Moon Empire’s army?

I really don’t want to bump into you on the battlefield!

“Yuhao, you can start moving out. Regardless of whether or not you succeed, do your best to bring them back.” Elder Xuan instructed Huo Yuhao as he gave him a pat on the shoulder.

“Yes.” Huo Yuhao answered politely. Following which, he bade goodbye to both Yan Shaozhe and Xian Lin’er before flying up into the air. Then, he vanished as he sped towards the Sun Moon Empire.

It would take time for the three legions to familiarize themselves with and accept their surroundings within the spectral demiplane. However, Huo Yuhao did not have to be overly concerned with these things. The other higher-ups of the Tang Sect had taken up the responsibility to brief the legions on the spectral demiplane. Also, he had already gotten Er Bai to chase away the spectral creatures and create a camping area for the three legions. At the very least, the soul masters would not be able to see any spectral creatures near their camping area. This would naturally make things smoother.

Even though they had only left in the morning, by noontime, they had already arrived at the Ming Dou Mountain Range because of how fast Huo Yuhao was flying. However, the White Tiger Duke was not at the Ming Dou Mountain Range where the Sun Moon Empire’s Western Army was camping. Instead, he had already led his elite troops to the north of the Star Luo Empire.

This time round, the Sun Moon Empire did not conceal the route they were taking. Hence, the Star Luo Empire were also beginning to make preparations after receiving the news of their impending attack.

Of course, there were still plenty of troops which camped at the Ming Dou Mountain Range, including five legions. Other than the troops, Princess Jiujiu was also here.

“Yuhao? How come you’re here?” Princess Jiujiu was extremely happy to see Huo Yuhao.

As time passed, Huo Yuhao had started to gain the recognition and acknowledgement of the higher-ups in the different empires after showcasing his abilities. Besides, Huo Yuhao was still holding out for the title of Duke of the Star Luo Empire.

After sitting down with Princess Jiujiu in the tent, Huo Yuhao asked, “Your Highness, do you have the latest news?”

Princess Jiujiu said, “I do have some news, but it might not be extremely accurate. The only thing that is certain is that the Sun Moon Empire has assembled over three hundred thousand soldiers for their armies. It seems like all of them have been transported into the Heavenly Soul Empire. From the looks of it, they are probably going to link up with the troops that are already within the Heavenly Soul Empire. As to what they will do next, we have no reliable intelligence on that.”

“Other than this, the Sun Moon Empire has strengthened their defences at the borders of their land. In fact, they have placed at least two soul engineer legions on the other side of the Ming Dou Mountain Range to supplement their aerial surveillance soul tools and existing troops. With their new setup, we can’t even send a fly in to do any reconnaissance work. Yuhao, since you are here already, do you mind helping us do some reconnaissance work?”

Even though he was looking into the Princess’s hopeful eyes, Huo Yuhao shook his head and replied, “Your Highness, I am sorry, but I do have another mission at hand. However, I can help you solve some of your reconnaissance problems.” Following which, Huo Yuhao gave her a sly smile.

Princess Jiujiu seemed to have caught what Huo Yuhao was hinting as she said, “That would be great. However, I must let you know how sly their surveillance soul tools have become. They do not only possess a greater range, but also greater mobility and speed. They will flee the moment they detect any dubious movement. At the same time, the other soul tools in the area will stop any attempt from the enemy to intercept the surveillance soul tool. Hence, this will be a challenging task. We have tried to use soul cannon shells to bomb the surveillance soul tools multiple times, to no avail.”

Huo Yuhao said, “These are probably the best prevention methods they can employ. But rest assured, I have my ways. Even though I won’t be able to destroy all of them, I am confident I can take down at least some of them.”

Princess Jiujiu was evidently excited by Huo Yuhao’s reply. “That would be great! If we can give the Sun Moon Empire some pressure from here, the battle at the frontline will be a lot easier for our people.”

Huo Yuhao said, “Then I shall begin to make my move. Afterwards, we will be inserting ourselves into the Sun Moon Empire to continue our battle. Goodbye, Your Majesty.”

After bidding her goodbye, both Huo Yuhao and Princess Jiujiu stood up. She moved closer to Huo Yuhao and looked at him with an inexplicable look. She said, “Yuhao, you are truly the most outstanding youth I’ve ever seen. The Star Luo Empire will forever be your home. As long as you wish for it, the Empire can give you all the honor and glory you might want.”

Huo Yuhao smiled. “In that case, if this operation were to be completed successfully, I shall return to ask for the title of Duke from Your Majesty.”

Princess Jiujiu was a little shocked by Huo Yuhao’s request. It was not the first time that he had asked about this title. However, he had never asked for anything other than the title—not even a plot of land.

Why is he so persistent about the title? Of course, it was still more reassuring to know that he wanted something, instead of not wanting anything at all. Xu Jiujiu said, “Yuhao, what is your mission actually about? Can you tell me?”

Huo Yuhao hesitated for a short while before replying, “I am leading some troops to perform a sabotage operation within the Sun Moon Empire just like the Duke did previously. If we succeed, I am confident that we can threaten the foundation of the Sun Moon Empire and alleviate the pressure on our troops at the frontline.”

It was apparent that the White Tiger Duke had not inform Xu Jiujiu of this plan. After hearing Huo Yuhao’s words, Xu Jiujiu was very much taken aback. “You are going to bring an entire army into the Sun Moon Empire? Are they from the Shrek City Defense Army?”

Huo Yuhao nodded and replied, “Pretty much. However, they are stronger than the Defense Army. I don’t think it would be appropriate for me to reveal any more information. I just hope I can bring back good news soon. Alright. I’ll see you around, Your Highness.”

Xu Jiujiu saw Huo Yuhao to the edge of the main peak and watched him take off until his figure disappeared in the sky. Her emotions, which had been suppressed for the past few days seemed to have relaxed a little. She clenched her fists and muttered to herself, “Good luck, Yuhao!”

Of course, Huo Yuhao would not share the secret of his spectral demiplane with Xu Jiujiu. Even though there would be a lot of people who would learn of his spectral plane after the war ended, he still believed he should keep it a secret—at least for the time being.





Volume 37, Chapter 531.2: Breaking in! The Raid Starts!


As he became stronger, some of the things that he had to be extremely careful with before could now be treated with less caution.

As a faint glow flashed on his body, Huo Yuhao projected an ice-cold beam from his face. While he was flying, he had already unleashed his spiritual detection ability to search for the Sun Moon Empire’s surveillance soul tools, which were hiding somewhere in the sky.

The current surveillance soul tool setup used by the Sun Moon Empire was very different from the one they had used previously. These soul tools were completely separated and spaced out. Even though they were able to cover a huge range, their arrangement was not in an extremely predictable pattern. In fact, the Sun Moon Empire had employed a dual surveillance method by performing surveillance from both the land and the air. The overlapping of their surveillance range would increase the chances of detecting enemy movement and guaranteed better safety.

Almost every surveillance soul tool was protected by a soul tool on the land, and the aerial surveillance soul tools were also acting as a radar for the soul tools on the ground. Hence, it could be said that they were highly complementary, and would help improve their security to a huge extent.

Nowadays, there were linked soul tools wherever soul tools were stationed in the Sun Moon Empire. These linked soul tools could perform both offensive and defensive operations. When it came to their offensive capabilities, they could kill a Titled Douluo in a split second. This was why linked soul tools were extremely scary. Because of their overwhelming power, even the powerful Body Sect could not stop the advance of the Sun Moon Empire

Because the Sun Moon Empire had stepped up their security at the Ming Dou Mountain Range, neither the White Tiger Duke nor Princess Jiujiu could do anything to the Sun Moon Empire.

If a large army were to attempt to penetrate these lines of soul tools, they would still be able to do so. Nonetheless, they would have to deal with large numbers of casualties. In addition, they would not know what kind of security would be stationed in an ambush position due to the impossibility of doing any form of reconnaissance. Falling into an ambush after sustaining heavy losses from penetrating the thick lines of soul tools would be a cost even the Star Luo Empire could not undertake.

Hence, the White Tiger Duke opted to defend the Ming Dou Mountain Range instead of taking the risk to attack.

Huo Yuhao’s spiritual detection was ultimately limited, and could only detect a large party of troops. He could not get a complete picture of all the troops near the perimeter of the Sun Moon Empire.

Nonetheless, this would not affect his mission.

Of course, Huo Yuhao would not be foolish enough to attack those aerial surveillance tools. He would simply become a target for the soul tools lined up beneath him. In fact, they would not even have to take aim at him. They simply had to shoot upwards into the sky, and he would be in an extremely precarious position. One must remember that Huo Yuhao was not fighting alone.

After going around the Sun Moon Empire’s surveillance tools, Huo Yuhao flew straight into the Sun Moon Empire. He went straight to the nearest station where the Sun Moon Empire had set up a series of soul tools.

He went up to them in an extremely delicate fashion before circling to the back of the area. He took a moment to use his spiritual detection to analyze the landscape of this station before finding a gap to get closer to them.

From his spiritual detection, Huo Yuhao was able to tell that this station had over a hundred offensive soul tools and several types of soul tools which could help with surveillance, defense, and auxiliary work. Outside of the station, there were five thousand normal soldiers who were tasked with defending this soul tool formation. The interior of the station was primarily manned by a few soul engineers. Their numbers were not very large—just over a hundred people. It was apparent that the soul tools were running on sealed milk bottles. The soul engineers simply had to control their daily consumption. After all, the most demanding soul tools were the offensive and defensive ones, and they did not have to be operated that often.

After surveying the surroundings of this station, Huo Yuhao silently crept away and retreated to a blind spot where the Sun Moon Empire’s surveillance soul tools would not be able to detect him. He chanted a few incantations and opened his spectral demiplane.

After entering the demiplane, Huo Yuhao met up with his companions and shared his plan.

After listening to his plan, all of them agreed to it, and the nine black doors soon opened in an inconspicuous forest, and the heavy artillery started to roll out. Yes, it was none other than Huo Yuhao’s Heavy Artillery Soul Engineer Legion.

The three hundred Zhuge Divine Crossbow Cannons were able to line up in an organized fashion very quickly as they waited for orders to be issued. It was only now that they realized they had already arrived at the Sun Moon Empire in such a short amount of time. They were feeling both excited and amazed by this revelation.

The higher-ups of the Tang Sect also emerged from the spectral demiplane.

Tang Wutong naturally moved to Huo Yuhao’s side. Huo Yuhao announced, “I want everyone to get ready to attack. Eldest senior brother, Wutong and I will head over to the station where the soul tools are. After sabotaging them, we will immediately return.”

Bei Bei nodded and said, “Alright. Take care.”

Huo Yuhao held Tang Wutong’s hand as he activated Imitation. He started to creep towards the place where the soul tools were stationed.

The soul tools stationed in that area were in fact very sensitive. However, their surveillance ability was limited to a certain range. To put it simply, their surveillance was useless on soldiers outside those ranges, Hence, those surveillance soul tools were primarily used to keep watch on movement in the sky. When it came to watching the ground, that was the responsibility of the aerial surveillance soul tools.

After Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power evolved again, oscillation detectors were no longer useful against him. He could use his spiritual power to detect any oscillation waves that were headed in his direction. He was also able to use his Ultimate Ice to change the temperature around him to avoid detection by thermal detectors. Hence, it was extremely hard for any soul tools to detect him. He was only vulnerable to the extremely rare spiritual power detectors and soul power detectors.

These two detectors were extremely limited, as they could only detect fluctuations within an extremely short range.

Hence, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong could enter the camp of the normal soldiers without being detected.

Right now, it was the middle of the afternoon. After lunch, the five thousand soldiers were taking their afternoon breaks. The lives of soldiers tended to be a lot more relaxed when they were not in the middle of a war. Their routine usually included some training in the morning, breaks in the afternoon and patrols in the evening.

As they went through the camp, they started to get closer to the place where the soul tools were stationed.

“Yuhao, what should we do now?”

Huo Yuhao replied, “There are only about a hundred soul engineers inside. The strongest one is but a seven-ringed Soul Sage. I believe he has yet to attain the level of a Class 7 soul engineer. Nonetheless, this area is enveloped by surveillance from soul power detectors and spiritual power detectors. The soul engineers in this area must be carrying some sort of pass which allows them to roam around without being mistaken as an enemy. We would probably get found out the moment we stepped into the area. However, the soul tools in this area seem to be heavy weapons. Even though they might be very destructive and can activate the powers of linked soul tools, they probably won’t be able to unleash their powers within the area.”

Tang Wutong immediately caught what Huo Yuhao was hinting at. “We are going to rush in?”

Huo Yuhao flashed her a smile. “What are we waiting for? Let’s go.”

After he finished his sentence, Huo Yuhao grabbed Tang Wutong’s hand and dashed into the area like a lightning bolt. His eyes turned brilliant golden the moment he stepped into the area where the soul tools were stationed.

Huo Yuhao might have twin martial souls and an Ultimate Strength martial soul, but the most frightening thing about him was not his fighting power. It was his invincible reconnaissance ability.

Even though there were plenty of surveillance soul tools and even some spiritual power detectors within the area, they were unable to stop Huo Yuhao’s ability from scanning the entire camp.

Huo Yuhao immediately grasped the locations of all the different soul engineers within this area. This information would be extremely helpful for his subsequent actions.

The place that Huo Yuhao had chosen to enter first was the resting area for the soul engineers who were in charge of protecting and controlling the soul tools.

The resting area was placed in the center of the camp in order to protect them.

Huo Yuhao dashed straight towards the center of the camp with both of his eyes shining with a golden color.

The daily maintenance and surveillance work for the area did not require many people. It was only during war when they required everyone to be working at any point in time. Hence, most of the soul engineers were congregated at the resting area. That was why Huo Yuhao chose to strike this area first.

At the very instant when he stepped into the camp, a mysterious spiritual ripple spread out from his body.

He was immediately detected by the spiritual power detectors as the alarm within the camp went off. However, this would not be sufficient to stop him.

Huo Yuhao activated his Eye of Destiny as his spiritual power was increased to its maximum. At this very instant, the entire resting area was within his control.

As the saying went, a commander must not go easy on the enemy’s soldiers. As the Chief Commander of Shrek City’s three Soul Engineer Legions, he had to be responsible for the safety of his troops, and more importantly, the hope and future of three Empires. Hence, he must not be merciful against these soul engineers!

After hearing the deafening alarm, the soul engineers within the resting area jumped up. However, an overwhelming spiritual power attacked them from within their minds.

Spiritual Blast!

Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power was almost invincible. Even Du Busi had commended him on his spiritual power—which was on par with that of a Transcendent Douluo—before his death. With Tang Wutong’s support and their Haodong Power, his spiritual power had received another significant boost.

This was Huo Yuhao’s first time performing such a powerful spiritual blast.





Volume 37, Chapter 531.3: Breaking in! The Raid Starts!


A loud explosion could be heard from within the resting area. The explosion sound came from the heads of the soul engineers. All their heads had exploded from Huo Yuhao’s spiritual blast.

At this very instant, all fifty soul engineers who were resting in the resting area had been killed.

It was only now that the whole camp started to react to what had just happened. The linked soul tools started to establish a defensive barrier to cordon the area off from the rest of the world.

It was a logical move for them to contain the intruders since there were only two people. Based on their calculations, it should be relatively easy to capture or kill them.

Little did they expect their enemies to be so powerful.

After unleashing a spiritual blast, Huo Yuhao did not wait around. He grabbed Tang Wutong and flickered around the camp like a ghost.

There were many defensive soul tools within the camp which were specially designed to fight against intruders. They shot several laser beams towards Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, but they just couldn’t hit the couple who were flickering around in the camp.

Huo Yuhao was not only capable of predicting where the beams would go because of his spiritual detection ability, but was also a Class 9 soul engineer! He had long discovered the flaws in the arrangements of these soul tools.

The biggest problem with these defensive soul tools was how they were arranged in a way so as to minimize damage to the soul tools within the camp. On top of this, their power was limited to protect the soldiers. This resulted in countless blind spots, which Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong gladly took advantage of.

With his spiritual blast as a continuous ranged attacks, Huo Yuhao was able to unleash his powerful attacks without even seeing the soul engineers.

The most powerful soul engineer among them was only a seven-ringed Soul Sage. Their self-defense soul tools were mainly focused on protecting against attacks which were physical or soul-power-based. Not everyone could be equipped with high-class soul tools which could protect them against spiritual attacks. Other than the seven-ringed Soul Sage, which required Huo Yuhao to kill him with spiritual shock, the rest of them perished under Huo Yuhao’s spiritual blast. Spiritual attacks were no doubt the most effective way to kill soul engineers.

It took them only a couple of minutes to kill all of them. In the end, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were the only ones still alive within the camp.

Following which, Huo Yuhao entered the core area of the camp and shut down the linked defensive system with the help of his understanding of soul tools as a Class 9 soul engineer.

The soldiers who were camped outside had already erupted into chaos. However, they did not dare to enter the area where the soul tools were stationed after the linked defensive system had vanished.

The soul engineers in the camp were held in great esteem by the soldiers. Besides, there were already orders given to not enter the area unless they were given permission by the soul engineers.

One must understand that any of the soul engineers would have a higher rank than the commanders amongst the soldiers. Soul engineers had extremely high social statuses in the Sun Moon Empire.

After completing their sabotage work, Huo Yuhao concealed himself and Tang Wutong as they snuck out of the area where the soul tools were stationed. Following which, they accelerated through the air with their Class 9 flying soul tools and returned to where they had hidden the Heavy Artillery Soul Engineer Legion.

“# 1 to #12, listen carefully. I want you to lock onto the coordinates that my spiritual energy is pointing at. Change your shells to Class 4 shells and get ready.”

Because Huo Yuhao’s voice was projected with his spiritual energy, every single soul engineer in the legion could hear his words clearly.

At the same time, Huo Yuhao also informed his companions within the spectral demiplane.

Following which, the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion and the Fort Soul Engineer Legion started to move out from the black doors, and line up in their formations quickly.

Hu Yuhao’s eyes were radiating a certain glow as he used his spiritual energy to keep the doors open, lock onto the position of the aerial surveillance soul tools, and fix the coordinates for the artillery with his Spiritual Sharing ability. He was capable of multitasking, and had fully exhibited the importance of his spiritual energy in war.

Huo Yuhao gazed into the distance as a smile escaped from the corner of his mouth.

Following which, twenty of the three hundred Zhuge Divine Crossbow Cannons started to take aim after receiving the coordinates from Huo Yuhao’s Spiritual Sharing.

At this very instant, Huo Yuhao was like their eyes. The long black metallic barrels began their adjustments as they aimed towards the distant sky.

After repeated improvements, the current cannons were far more accurate than before.

The earliest versions of the cannons had forty-eight barrels. Because they required sixteen barrels for every shot, they could fire three times consecutively. Afterwards, they would have to be set aside to cool before they could be used again.

Now, regardless of whether it was their cooling mechanisms or their material, the cannons had improved tremendously, and could sustain extended periods of continuous firing.

The sixteen barrels used to only be able to fire in a single direction. However, after Xuan Ziwen improved its design, it was now able to aim in a single direction with just two barrels. This would allow the cannon to be a lot more accurate in its firing.

“Fire!” Huo Yuhao ordered.

At that instant, twenty Zhuge Divine Crossbow Cannons fired in unison with a deafening belch. Three hundred and twenty Class 4 shells ascended into the air instantly as they headed in the direction of the distant sky.

He Caitou was standing by Huo Yuhao’s side as he grabbed his own chest. The mere thought of the cost of these shells made his heart ache. Those were all stationary soul cannon shells! Even though Huo Yuhao’s newly researched manufacturing technique had helped to reduce the cost of producing these shells, it still cost a small fortune to launch a few hundred shells at once.

Huo Yuhao turned his head and smiled at He Caitou. He said, “Senior brother, don’t worry about it. We will not be taking a loss. Those aerial surveillance soul tools have the ability to dodge attacks. If we were to scrimp on the shells, they might not be enough to destroy them.”

While they were speaking, a deafening explosion could be heard from the distant sky.

Several balls of fire could be seen in the background. Because it was the middle of the day, the fireballs were not too obvious. However, it was still apparent enough that the balls of fire were not just timed explosions.

“We hit them!” He Caitou waved his fist in excitement.

Huo Yuhao nodded and said, “We have managed to clear all one hundred aerial surveillance soul tools in the vicinity. Senior Brother, lead the Fort Soul Engineer Legion to clear up the camp I have just returned from. I have left plenty of spoils for you there.”

The aerial surveillance soul tools were useless to Huo Yuhao. They were of no use for the mission he was leading. In fact, Huo Yuhao was probably better than all those soul tools when it came to surveillance and reconnaissance work. However, the soul tools in the camp were different. They were all high-quality heavy weapons—the fruits of the labor and research the Sun Moon Empire had done. In fact, such areas would usually contain precious resources like the Sealed Milk Bottles! They should also have plenty of stationary soul cannon shells. Even if this area did not have the strongest soul tools, they should still have an abundance of resources.

After hearing Huo Yuhao’s words, He Caitou immediately understood what he meant. Following which, he joyfully led the Fort Soul Engineer Legion to collect their spoils.

However, it was not just him who headed out. Bei Bei was also moving out with the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion.

Even though the three legions had trained for a long period of time, they had still not fought any battles in their capacity as soul engineers. Since this was already a sure victory for them, it would be good for them to go out and experience fighting. It would also be a good way for them to improve their capabilities.

The outcome was one which everyone had long expected. There was no other possible outcome when five thousand normal foot soldiers met two soul engineer legions.

Under the instructions of He Caitou and Bei Bei, the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion and the Fort Soul Engineer Legion only used non-stationary soul cannon shells, soul rays, and similar expendable items to finish the soldiers off.

The entire battle took less than twenty minutes, and the entire army of five thousand soldiers was obliterated. Without the protection of soul tools, these soldiers had pretty much no capabilities on the battlefield.

While they were destroying the soldiers and collecting the spoils, Huo Yuhao had already ordered his Heavy Artillery Soul Engineer Legion to return into the spectral demiplane. It was best for them to return first, since they were the slowest legion. After they had returned, it would be easier for Huo Yuhao to make his next move.

Even though it was fairly tedious to disassemble the heavy weapons, the legion of soul engineers found it relatively easy with the help of the all-terrain self-driving forts.

They first began to clear up the leftover supplies before disassembling the heavy soul tools.

Huo Yuhao grabbed Tang Wutong as both of them floated in mid-air. Huo Yuhao was observing the disassembly process while using his spiritual energy to detect any enemy movement in the distance.

Tang Wutong smiled. “Seems like it isn’t too difficult to deal with the Sun Moon Empire!”

Huo Yuhao replied, “This is but the start. Besides, the explosions in the air earlier must have alerted the other nearby camps. Their assistance is probably late because of the precautionary measures they have to take and the long distance from their camps to this one. We must leave the moment I detect any movement from them.”

Tang Wutong asked, “Then what do we do with the equipment we can’t bring along with us in time?”

Huo Yuhao smiled before replying, “We will of course destroy it. We can’t leave it behind for them to use.”

Tang Wutong said, “Even if their reinforcements were to arrive, they would probably lose to us too. Logically speaking, the Sun Moon Empire would not set up their soul tool camps with overlapping ranges. Hence, if the other camps can’t reach the area here, their soul engineers would have no chance against us.”

Huo Yuhao shook his head and said, “No, we can’t assume all of that. Firstly, we can’t afford to lose anyone. We only have this number of people. Hence, I cannot risk any of their lives. Not even a single one of them. I would rather we lose out on some of the spoils than give the enemy a chance to deal damage to us. Besides, there is also the possibility of us getting tangled in the combat and losing the chance to retreat. This is near the frontline, so there must be plenty of troops from the Sun Moon Empire around. Once we get caught in battle, our plan will have failed. Hence, we must strike and leave immediately. We must make sure no one knows the profile of our army. The unknown enemy is often the scariest enemy. Our main goal is to exert pressure on the Sun Moon Empire! Oh! They’re here!”

Huo Yuhao solemnly gave the signal to begin retreating.

The fellows from Tang Sect had spent so much time together. Because Huo Yuhao had been the main control-type soul master all along, they reacted according to his warnings without any hesitation.

After taking everything they had dismantled, the all-terrain self-driving forts started to shoot soul rays at the soul tools which they were unable to take with them. In a short amount of time, they transformed the soul tool camp into ruins.





Volume 37, Chapter 532: An Attack from Afar


In the meantime, Huo Yuhao took his leave with Tang Wutong as they returned to the forest to look after the spectral gate.

Even though the all-terrain self-driving forts could not move as fast as the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion, which was in flight, they were not much slower than them. From the air, the forts were basically gigantic metallic balls running at an incredibly fast speed with their eight long legs. No terrain could stop them from advancing. Before long, they were all out of sight. When the Sun Moon Empire’s reinforcements arrived, all they would see was the rubble.

After entering the forest, the forts disappeared into the black doors. With the experience they had gained from their previous entrance, they were a lot faster this time around. As the nine doors closed, everything became as serene as before. It was almost as though the legions had not appeared at all.

Huo Yuhao had gone into the spectral demiplane along with the rest of them.

Even though he was formerly trained in military tactics in the Ultimate Soldier Plan, what he had learned was primarily individual-based tactics. When it came to controlling a large number of troops, he knew he could not be compared to Ju Zi. However, the gap between him and her was not insurmountable. He believed that he was able to do so with the help of his powerful abilities and his spectral demiplane. This was apparent from the ease with which they were able to win the previous battle and retreat upon attaining victory.

However, he still believed in the need to reflect and review what they had done well and what they could improve on. This was necessary for them in order to perform better during subsequent battles.

As everyone gathered at the top of a knoll within the spectral demiplane, everyone could see the excitement written on each other’s faces.

This was not only Huo Yuhao’s first time leading troops, but also Tang Sect’s first time fighting in a battle! All three soul engineer legions had participated and showcased their different abilities on the battlefield.

In fact, they were not able to showcase their full suite of capabilities because of how weak their opponent was. Nevertheless, the destruction they had caused and the resources they had looted had given the team’s morale a huge boost.

When they left the Tang Sect for this mission, Huo Yuhao had ordered them to bring only ten days of rations. Much of their storage space had been used to bring resources which would be useful for actual combat.

His objective was simple. He wanted to use the loot from their previous battles as their resources for the next battle.

They had managed to plunder a huge amount of rations from the Sun Moon Empire in their previous battle. These rations would be enough to last them for an extended period of time. In addition, they were also able to acquire several different kinds of soul tools. Those they were unable to bring away in time were completely destroyed. The Sun Moon Empire had definitely suffered a huge loss.

“Yuhao, that was truly an incredible battle. If we keep this up, we’re going to be rich! What’s our next target? Are we going to focus on the next area where the soul tools are stationed? If we can destroy all of these areas established by the Sun Moon Empire outside of the Ming Dou Mountain Range, I’m sure we can to strike fear deep into the heart of the Sun Moon Empire. At the same time, the Star Luo Empire would be able to help us occupy their attention from the other end.” He Caitou was undoubtedly one of the most excited individuals among the rest. He had obviously forgotten his unhappiness with the generous usage of the stationary soul cannon shells.

As he was the main person in charge of logistics and supplies, he was now feeling like a wealthy man.

Huo Yuhao shook his head and said, “No, we have not come here to attack such installations. Even though we do have the power to destroy all of these installed soul tools, that would undoubtedly expose our existence. Besides, I am sure the Sun Moon Empire has its means to counter these scenarios. If we were to be overly absorbed in these battles, we would definitely lose at some point in time. Because of how small our unit is, we cannot afford to lose anyone! Hence, we must not give them a chance to catch us. We must retreat quickly right after striking them. And we must do it in a clean and quick fashion.”

He Caitou was surprised by Huo Yuhao’s reply. “So we’re giving up on this battlefield? We’re not continuing?”

Huo Yuhao nodded and said, “We need to adopt a macro perspective. Our intent is to influence the entire war, not just any small plot of land. Our biggest advantage is our speed! By ferrying everyone in the spectral demiplane, I can bring everyone to any corner of the Sun Moon Empire within two days. Hence, our best strategy is to strike them in different parts of their Empire. It would be a losing battle for us if we were to fight head-on with them.”

Bei Bei nodded in agreement. “Little junior brother is right. We cannot be overly content with our small victories. We need to stretch the battlefield across the entire Sun Moon Empire in order for them to feel the pain that we are about to deliver to them. We must make them panic by striking their most vulnerable parts. This will allow us to create the greatest amount of opportunity and, at the same time, give them the greatest amount of fear. As long as we can affect the foundation of their Empire and threaten their rule, we would have accomplished our objective.”

Xu Sanshi said, “Yuhao, you are our Chief Commander. Everyone here is a member of our family. There’s no need for you to be overly courteous. Just let us know where you want us to head to, and we will follow your orders without any complaints. Let’s give the Sun Moon Empire a lesson, and show them what happens when they mess with us!”

Huo Yuhao revealed a faint smile. “We should all rest up first and recover what we have expended earlier. I will also be resting for a short while before setting off for our next location. This time around, I want to play a game of chess against the Sun Moon Empire. I want them to receive news that their entire Empire is being attacked at multiple places—at the same time!”

Even though Huo Yuhao had expended quite a bit of his energy, it was not overly significant. He went to cultivate with Tang Wutong, whereas the others went for meetings with the higher-ups within their legions to perform after-action reviews.

……

In the Heavenly Soul Empire.

Ju Zi was floating in mid-air silently while being surrounded by a sea of fiery red. The Phoenix Soul Engineer Legion was stationed around her as they looked to protect from any harm.

As she looked into the distance, it seemed as though her mind had drifted away.

It had been a while since the entire army had moved out. However, Ju Zi was still feeling very uneasy. The reason for her unease was simple—it was because of that person.

If her child was still unfound, she would perhaps not be as conflicted as she was right now. She would only feel enraged, and would channel the hatred within her into bloodlust as her troops stormed forward onto the battlefield.

But now that her child had been returned to her, the hatred in her heart had become a lot fainter. Her child’s return had resulted in an inexplicable change in her attitude. In fact, this newfound feeling was slowly taking over the deep hatred in her heart.

And this feeling was directed towards her child—definitely not towards her husband.

Other than the child, the rest of her feelings was directed towards that person.

That day, after Huo Yuhao had left, Ju Zi had cried for a long time. It was only after she had calmed down that she thought of this: he did not disappoint me.

In her heart, Huo Yuhao’s image was becoming better, whereas Xu Tianran’s was worsening.

Nonetheless, Ju Zi continued to lead the army out for their conquest. She left her child in the palace because she was not allowed to bring the Crown Prince of a country out from Radiant City. The truth was that when she was requesting that liberty from Xu Tianran, she was still hopeful that she might be given permission to bring him out. In fact, it was more like she was trying to convince herself to give Xu Tianran one last chance.

Unfortunately, Xu Tianran turned her down resolutely. And this made Ju Zi certain about the decision she was about to make. In her mind, a perfect plan was gradually taking shape.

Yuhao, where are you now? Will you be in the enemy’s camp? I really don’t want to see you on the battlefield. But I really miss you…

A bitter expression formed on her delicate face. She was suffering from the conflict within her heart. But at the same time, she was excited by the possibilities which lay ahead.

She started to laugh at herself.

Back then, I even told him that his biggest problem was his emotional weakness. But why do I feel an inexplicable weakness in my heart whenever I think of him? Yuhao, oh, Yuhao... I am really regretting my decision in the past… If I had chosen you back then, and followed you to leave Radiant City, everything might have turned out differently. At the very least, I would have had a chance to fight for a place by your side.

However, she understood that there was not much point crying over spilled milk. There was no way she could undo what she had done after choosing to take this path. All she could do was try and make things easier for him.

Huo Yuhao, you can rest assured that I will never hurt you regardless of the circumstances. Because you are my…

As she thought about this, Ju Zi’s heart softened once again. Right now, she did not resemble a War God Empress. She was more like a young girl who was thinking about her boyfriend.

“Issue my orders. Everyone is to rest for the next three days. Set up the defensive soul tools and be on high alert. Double the range of the aerial surveillance soul tools and push them forward by a thousand meters. I want more visuals on the situation of the Heavenly Soul and Dou Ling Empires.”

“Roger!”

After the Crown Prince was returned, Xu Tianran had given at least half of the army to Ju Zi. In the current campaign, there were only a few Class 9 soul engineers who could influence her tactics. The position of the Commander of the Three Forces was slowly becoming hers.

The war must go on. In Ju Zi’s heart, she knew it was impossible for her to let go of the hatred she had. In addition, she was no longer only fighting the war as a form of revenge. She was also building the foundation for her son’s throne.

When it came to this, Xu Tianran had made several good predictions. He knew that he was infertile, and only had the Crown Prince as his son. Regardless of how big the future of the Sun Moon Empire would be, it was ultimately going to be handed over to Xu Yunhan. That was why Xu Tianran was so daring to put so much power into Ju Zi’s hands. Of course, he was also confident in his ability to rein her in.

……

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were flying across the sky with their hands interlocked with one another.

After waking up from his cultivation and returning to that little forest, he realized how a large part of the sky above him was already covered by aerial surveillance soul tools.

After the area where the soul tools were stationed had been destroyed, it had alerted all of the Sun Moon Empire’s troops which were stationed near the Ming Dou Mountain Range. They were currently doing their best to find where their enemies were.

This showed that Huo Yuhao’s previous worries were legitimate. It was definitely not a wise decision to fight head-on with the large number of troops the Sun Moon Empire had stationed in this area.

After activating Imitation, Huo Yuhao concealed both himself and Tang Wutong as they fled at the speed of sound with their Class 9 flying soul tools at full throttle.

The aerial surveillance soul tools were useless against Huo Yuhao. The Sun Moon Empire had spent several days trying to find this mysterious unit which had attacked them, but to no avail. The only news they had received was how a large legion of all-terrain self-driving forts had attacked them.

During the battle, Huo Yuhao and his people did not kill everyone. After all, there were close to five thousand normal soldiers there. They had only planned to disrupt their operations and flee; they did not want to do any unnecessary killing.

Without any other clues, this battle in which the Sun Moon Empire suffered huge losses could only be concluded as an unsolvable mystery. The news was delivered to Radiant City as soon as possible.

Oak City was a mid-sized city in the northern part of the Sun Moon Empire. It was very close to the northern frontier. However, it was different from the frontiers of the original Douluo Continent. The Sun Moon Empire was surrounded by the ocean on its northern border. It bordered the Ice Sea—the expansive sea which was on the west of the core regions of the Extreme North.

Even though it was called the Ice Sea, the sea was not actually frozen entirely. This name was merely given to it because of its incredibly low temperatures.

Because of how low the temperature was, there were always blocks of ice floating on the surface of the water. Occasionally, one might even see an entire iceberg floating in the ocean. The weather at the Ice Sea was truly unbearable.

Oak City might just be a mid-sized city, but it was already incredibly large considering how few cities there were in the northern parts of the Sun Moon Empire. It was the center of commerce in the northern regions. Many specialties of the north were traded in Oak City before being transported to the southern parts of the Sun Moon Empire for sale.

Some of these northern specialties included the fish in the Ice Sea. These fish were extremely popular among its people.

The northern regions had a much lower population density than the southern parts of the Sun Moon Empire. Because this place was also very close to the west, it was considerably far from the Wasteland of the Extreme North, and was often considered the safest place in the Sun Moon Empire. Hence, there weren’t many troops stationed here. Only a thousand troops or so were in charge of the safety of Oak City, as well as some of the smaller cities in the vicinity.

There were two figures which were silently standing on the top of a hill about fifty kilometers away from Oak City. They were looking at the city, which was uniformly grey in color.

Oak City was extremely close to the Ice Sea. It was only about twenty-five kilometers away. Hence, it was possible to look at the Ice Sea by finding a vantage point at a higher altitude.

“What a great view! It’s really different from what we’re used to back where we stay!” Huo Yuhao exclaimed.

Tang Wutong wrapped her arm around Huo Yuhao’s arm before exclaiming, “Yeah! Look at the Ice Sea in the distance. It looks so mysterious! I really want to check that place out if we have time. There must be many soul beasts in the Ice Sea. I wonder how strong they are… They must be pretty strong in order to survive under such harsh conditions.”





Volume 37, Chapter 533.1: Eastern Sun City


Huo Yuhao began to laugh as he listened to her. The Extreme North’s environment was a lot more brutal than this place, but several of its most powerful soul beasts ultimately became his Spirits. He was only able to achieve his current strength because of his Ultimate Ice.

Huo Yuhao was like a fish in water in this extremely chilly northern region. He had absolute faith that he could rely on his own strength to fight at a Titled Douluo’s level; the environment’s impact on his strength was very evident.

“When everything settles down, I will take you to every corner of the Douluo Continent. Haih, speaking of that, I feel really dejected. I’m supposed to meet your father when I return, but I don’t know how long this delay is going to take.”

Tang Wutong giggled and said, “Are you worried? Do you think we still have time to get married with the current situation in the continent?”

Huo Yuhao chuckled and said, “Even if we don’t get married, I will ask your father after consulting him to remove that seal from your body. At the very least, I don’t have to be so agonizingly stifled!”

Tang Wutong blushed. “Just control yourself and stop being so talkative. When do we start? The temperature here is too low, and not conducive for a prolonged battle. We should end it as quickly as possible.”

“Haven’t we just scouted? Oak City almost has no ability to resist at all, so we’re just going to pillage it. We will leave immediately after the mission. Second senior brother should be prepared.”

“Then let’s begin,” Tang Wutong nodded as she spoke.

“Alright.” Huo Yuhao’s expression grew solemn as deep incantations rang out on the mountaintop. There were no aerial surveillance soul tools in a place like this.

Large black doors opened, and enormous metal spheres strode out from those doors as they formed up neatly beneath the little mountain.

Every metal sphere was like a porcupine, and all sorts of offensive soul tools shaped like spikes long and short protruded from their surface.

He Caitou was sitting in the largest all-terrain self-driving fort, and he was the first to walk out. Only he and Xiao Xiao were sitting inside.

He Caitou came beside Huo Yuhao, and the self-driving fort paused as He Caitou’s voice echoed from within. “Yuhao, Wutong, do you guys want to come in and sit down?”

“Alright,” Huo Yuhao acknowledged. Attacking

Oak City wouldn’t be very difficult, so they had only mobilized the Fort Soul Engineer Legion. Huo Yuhao didn’t have to be too involved, he only had to control the situation with his Spiritual Detection, and that was sufficient.

Huo Yuhao’s reputation among the three soul engineer legions became greatly elevated after their battle the other day. Anyone who experienced how magical his Spiritual Detection was would be shaken by that formidable ability of his, whether they were soul masters or soul engineers.

He Caitou had crafted this Class 8 all-terrain self-driving fort himself. It was bright silver in color, but five meters in diameter. He enjoyed all kinds of high-powered soul tools, so he had installed many different kinds of frighteningly destructive soul tools into his soul tool fort. This soul tool fort rivaled the strength of a Class 9 soul tool if He Caitou used his full strength to attack. The reason why it was a Class 8 soul tool was because the fort didn’t contain a single soul tool installed that could reach the attacking force of a Class 9 soul tool.

There were six seats installed inside. Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong entered from the metal door at the back, but the fort still felt very spacious and comfortable.

Huo Yuhao glanced He Caitou and Xiao Xiao, who were sitting on enormous chairs in the front, and he laughed as he said, “You know how to take care of yourself, second senior brother!”

He Caitou turned around and laughed. “It’s always better to be a little more comfortable. How are we doing this?”

Huo Yuhao’s eyes sparkled. “Oak City almost doesn’t have any kind of defensive capabilities at all, so we can just force our way forward. I’ve already scouted around. They mainly store food in their granaries and resource storage units, so we should target those places. There’s a treasury among their resource warehouses, so we’ll retreat after cleaning out their granaries and that treasury. We will try to avoid hurting civilians as much as possible, we’re not here to kill.”

“Alright, don’t worry.”

“Let’s move out, boys. Our target is the city fifty kilometers in front of us, and we are to do as much damage as we wish to its structures. But we have to minimize hurting people as much as possible.” He Caitou used his group communicator to give an order to every one of this soul engineer legion’s members.

His soul engineer legion was the largest one, with a thousand five hundred members. There were five people in each all-terrain self-driving fort, and each individual controlled different functions within them.

Someone would be responsible for movement, while other people would be responsible for offense and defense, and two others were responsible for infusing soul power into the fort. All five individuals had to be adept at all their tasks so that they could switch around at any moment. That way, their all-terrain self-driving fort’s functions could be realized as much as possible while maintaining continuous endurance and usage.

He Caitou controlled his all-terrain self-driving fort and strode at lightning speed toward Oak City. The others got into formation and followed behind him as they charged straight forward.

They tried to keep some space between each other in their formation as they pushed forward so that their firepower wouldn’t overlap. They moved forward in an orderly fashion, and even though their formation wasn’t considered entirely strict and flawless, it was absolutely reasonable.

They had been training for more than two years, and their standards from their training were adequately displayed. Fifty kilometers was barely an hour’s journey for all-terrain self-driving forts.

The reason why Huo Yuhao didn’t choose to use his necromancy nearer to Oak City because there were still aerial surveillance soul tools in the sky. What he wanted to achieve was for the Sun Moon Empire to be confused about where this army had come from. They would be warned if Huo Yuhao destroyed their aerial surveillance soul tools beforehand. Oak City’s defenses were lax, but if they were given warning early enough, cities which were relatively close by could still send reinforcements. Furthermore, the Sun Moon Empire could use backup aerial surveillance soul tools when Huo Yuhao was using necromancy, and they would then discover where this mysterious army had come from. This was what Huo Yuhao wanted least, so he had to be careful in dealing with their defenses.

Huo Yuhao wanted to use these battles to boost their soul engineer legions’ adaptability at the same time, so he didn’t have to go through so much trouble. It was time for them to exercise and move around after being stuck in his spectral demiplane for a day.

The patrolling soldiers on Oak City’s wall were wrapped in thick blankets because the weather was too cold. They would circle for a round or two before hiding from the wind behind the battlements. The patrolling teams switched every hour, and every team only had ten people. Patrols would sometimes even be cancelled during the coldest days of winter.

At this moment, ten soldiers from the City Defense Army’s first large team’s third small team were patrolling on the city wall. Ten soldiers strolled around lackadaisically on top of the city wall under their vice-captain’s leadership.

“Why don’t we talk to boss about this damned weather, captain. We don’t have to patrol anymore. There’s nothing to see!” An old soldier complained to his vice-captain.

The vice-captain snapped, “If you have the guts to do it yourself, then do it. The captain’s mood hasn’t been so good these few days.”

“Heh, I’ve heard that the team captain has gone out in search of new experiences, but he was discovered by his wife? Is that true?”

“You shouldn’t ask if you don’t wish to be burned alive by the captain’s wrath.”

Everyone guffawed along with tacit mutual understanding.

“Captain, we want to pool our money to buy a drink of wine for you after our patrol is finished. What do you think?”

“A drink? I’m on duty today, so…”

“Captain, the weather is so cold. Drinking some wine will help you execute your duties better.”

“Yes, alright. At least you fellows are filial. Eh, what’s that sound?”

“Tch tch tch, tch tch tch…” Strange sounds travelled from the distance as the patrol gazed out from the city. It was but a glance before all ten pairs of pupils contracted at the same time.

There were enormous metal spheres in the distance wherever their eyes could see. They didn’t have enough sunlight, but these metal spheres were still reflecting icy brilliance as they charged towards Oak City at lightning speed.

The vice-captain froze for a few moments before he yelled hysterically, “Ambush—!”

“Close the city gates, quick.”

These soldiers were a little idle and slack, but seeing an attack of such scale sent chills straight into their hearts.

They were in the Sun Moon Empire’s territory after all. Even though they were far in the north, these soldiers still had some understanding of soul tools. These soldiers knew that they couldn’t defend themselves against an attack from an enormous soul engineer legion of such a scale. What they could do now was to call the soldiers below to close the city gates before they would… run!

The spherical all-terrain self-driving fort at the forefront suddenly flipped as it turned its belly forward and revealed an enormous cannon barrel that was one-and-a-half meters in diameter.

The barrel itself wasn’t long, but when it flipped around, the opening flashed with freakish red light.

This all-terrain self-driving fort was still roughly two kilometers from Oak City, but in the next moment, a radiant beam of red light blasted from that frightening muzzle as it cut across two kilometers in an instant and smashed heavily against the closed city gates.

“Boom, boom, boom!” Deafening booming sounds resonated across Oak City as the city’s gates were blown to dust. Countless pieces and fragments were blown in all directions as several tens of meters of the city wall on both sides of the city gates collapsed. An enormous hole was blown right through the city gates.

Self-driving forts moving at full speed could cover two kilometers in the blink of an eye. The Fort Soul Engineer Legion that was spread out horizontally charged into the city gates.





Volume 37, Chapter 533.2: Eastern Sun City


He Caitou controlled his machine and charged directly into the city through the enormous hole that he had blown open. Countless cannon barrels snapped open on the metal sphere, and more than twenty barrels that looked like spikes concentrated penetrating white light. More than twenty over beams of white light surged into the air in the next moment and pierced through the heavens.

These soul tools were called long-range piercing cannons, and were Class 8 soul tools. This soul tool had the second longest range; stationary soul cannon shells could go farther.

Booming sounds resonated in waves through the sky as flashes of fire and light flickered again and again.

This was the result of the Eye of the Asura working together with the Origin of Destruction, and piercing cannons that could lock onto its targets swept over all the surveillance soul tools in the sky above Oak City. Oak City immediately became blind, so that they were temporarily unable to seek reinforcements from cities a little further away.

Long-range transmission soul tools were starting to appear within the Sun Moon Empire as technology continued to advance. However, these transmission soul tools required satellites in the sky for transmission. Otherwise, they couldn’t reach their extremely long ranges. The first things that Huo Yuhao and He Caitou locked onto were these satellites, as doing so meant Oak City was temporarily unable to send any information or messages out. Furthermore, their Fort Soul Engineer Legion wouldn’t leave any traces behind.

He Caitou stopped attacking once he completed this attack. Instead, he stood fast and proudly in an empty space within the city’s gates. Oak City didn’t have any strength to resist at all, and He Caitou could trample through this city with his all-terrain self-driving fort even if he was all by himself.

The Fort Soul Engineer Legion had entered the city by now, but the other members didn’t charge in through the city gate. They instead scaled the city’s walls.

That was the reason why all-terrain self-driving forts were called that; walls couldn’t stop them. Every self-driving fort’s eight limbs were extremely sharp, just like eight long spears. Each limb had three different joints, and its toughest component was at the bottom. It was crafted using a special kind of metal that was very hard and tough.

These limbs could casually pierce into the city’s walls through mechanical power, and could carry their heavy and bulky bodies as they climbed swiftly. The self-driving forts could scale the city’s walls with a few motions, and could even attack with soul rays and soul cannons as they climbed.

Somebody watching from the sky would be able to see a very spectacular scene. Three hundred all-terrain self-driving forts appeared on Oak City’s walls at almost the same time before they quickly scaled it. Some remained to keep their vantage point, while others entered the city. From this moment onwards, Oak City had been completely taken over.

This couldn’t even be considered a battle, as everything was simply too easy, to the point where it would raise people’s hackles.

Taking over the government building and the several warehouses that Huo Yuhao had detected earlier happened fifteen minutes later, as screaming and shouting could be heard everywhere in the city.

He Caitou had ordered the Fort Soul Engineer Legion not to attack civilians, but they still did everything they could to destroy and damage several taller and more conspicuous buildings.

Emptying warehouses was a simple task for soul engineers. Storage soul tools had limited space, but Huo Yuhao’s spectral demiplane had almost unlimited space!

Before Huo Yuhao took off, he had ordered Er Bai to lead the undead creatures to create a large makeshift warehouse inside his spectral demiplane. This place was more than suitable for storing all sorts of resources and items.

One hour later, the Fort Soul Engineer Legion disappeared just as suddenly as they had appeared, and Oak City was in ruins.

But when the soldiers who had previously hidden away came back out to check the damage, they realized that there had been very few casualties in the pillaging process. There were several who had been injured from the damaged buildings, but there were very few who had died.

But they really wanted to cry when they inspected their warehouses. Their granaries had been emptied, and their large warehouses which were used to store rare items for trading were also emptied, while several of their major businesses had all been cleaned out.

They were in the cold north, and that meant they were extremely dependent on food. Winter was coming, and it wasn’t hard to imagine the burden that empty granaries would have on Oak City. The citizens were already fearful and beginning to panic because of this sudden ambush, and their panic would be amplified when they saw that they no longer had any food.

A long time ago, pillaging an entire city with an army which consisted of soul masters was impossible. But now, Huo Yuhao and the others had accomplished this feat by relying on formidable soul tools.

The Fort Soul Engineer Legion’s soul masters were resting inside the spectral demiplane, but nobody could hide the excitement on their faces.

Their excitement didn’t come from the resources and items they had pillaged. Instead, their excitement came from the feeling of battle. They were a group of amateur soul engineers who were fighting together, and that sensation of destruction when nobody could fight back against them simply felt too wonderful.

The Tang Sect’s senior members were gathered inside the warehouse. Bei Bei stared at the mountains of food and heaved a sigh as he said, “If not for the fact that we were at war, stealing food from a city of citizens isn’t anything to be proud of!”

Xu Sanshi laughed and said, “Eh, why do I remember that you were the one who came up with this immoral idea? Why are you suddenly shedding crocodile tears?”

Bei Bei shot a glare at him. “Food is part of a nation’s core. We’re here to wreak havoc and destroy things, so making our move on food is the easiest. Food isn’t like soul tools. Places that are storing large amounts of soul tools and materials are definitely heavily guarded, and we can’t go head-to-head with our enemies. It’s different for food. Any city’s citizens need to eat, and we can choose places like Oak City where they don’t have sufficient strength to defend themselves. We can minimize losses and complete our mission as quickly as possible at the same time, and we can cause panic as well. My idea is excellent!”

Xu Sanshi nodded seriously and said, “It is excellent! Just a little immoral!”

“So be it, for the Douluo Continent’s future!” Bei Bei answered valiantly.

Huo Yuhao said, “Oak City is an important city in the Sun Moon Empire’s northern territory, except their defenses were so slack because there’s almost no possibility that a battle can occur here. The granaries in Oak City are very important for the Sun Moon Empire’s northern territory, as the food that is stored there covers tens of thousands of square kilometers in the north. The Sun Moon Empire’s entire northern territory will be greatly alarmed after our ransacking.”

“What’s our next target?” Bei Bei asked.

Huo Yuhao opened his map. He placed his finger on Oak City’s position before he shifted his finger towards the east and stopped at another city. The city looked a lot larger than Oak City on the map.

“Eastern Sun City is the Sun Moon Empire’s number one city in their northern territories. It’s the only city which can be considered a large city. Oak City was just an opportunity for us to train. Eastern Sun City is our most important objective in our northern invasion. We can retreat from the north as long as we conquer Eastern Sun City. Eastern Sun City contains the largest warehouses for storing food and all kinds of resources. There are twenty thousand proper soldiers stationed within the city. Furthermore, there must be soul tools defending it, and they are likely to be equipped with linked soul tools. There will be a single soul engineer legion stationed there under normal circumstances, as it is the most important stronghold in the north. But the Sun Moon Empire has mobilized their great armies for the invasion, which has resulted in an empty back rank. Eastern Sun City’s soul engineer legion is likely to have been deployed, and there won’t be many even if there are some who remain.”

“We have broken through Oak City so quickly, and it will need some time to report this to Eastern Sun City and request backup. We have destroyed their satellites after all, so there’s no way they can make any long-range transmissions. Therefore, we have to attack Eastern Sun City, and quickly. Eastern Sun City will fall no matter what, and we will not sustain many losses.”

Bei Bei nodded and said, “Alright, then you can go.”

He Caitou rubbed his palms together. “Leave this to me and the Fort Soul Engineer Legion. What’s twenty thousand soldiers? My enormous fort will sweep them clean.”

Huo Yuhao shook his head and laughed as he said, “We cannot be complacent, second senior brother. Attacking Eastern Sun City is very important, and we can’t be sure how formidable its defenses are. Therefore, we have to change our tactics.”

“How?” He Caitou asked.

Huo Yuhao chuckled and whispered something into his ear.

Eastern Sun City was the Sun Moon Empire’s most important stronghold in the north. The city was positioned toward the eastern side of the Sun Moon empire’s northern territory, and was less than a thousand kilometers from the Heavenly Soul Empire’s original borders.

Of course, the Heavenly Soul Empire’s territory in that direction had now been drawn into the Sun Moon Empire, while Eastern Sun City’s strategic importance naturally became a lot smaller than before.

But Eastern Sun City was still the Sun Moon Empire’s most important stronghold in the north. The city was very close to the Ice Sea, and the soldiers and soul engineers stationed there were responsible for defending against any aquatic soul beasts that could come out from the Ice Sea.

Aquatic soul beasts that could live in the Ice Sea almost all possessed both ice-type and water-type abilities, and were very powerful. They would occasionally attack as they attempted to hunt for food along the shore, and to kill humans.

Therefore, Eastern Sun City had the responsibility of fighting them, and to prevent aquatic soul beasts from wreaking havoc along the shores.

Aquatic soul beasts and soul beasts on land were a little different, as most aquatic soul beasts lived in groups. Therefore, they would become very difficult to deal with once they started causing trouble. This was also the reason why Eastern Sun City was so heavily guarded.

Eastern Sun City’s walls were three hundred feet tall, and it could be considered a standard large city. The city’s walls were thick, and there were all sorts of offensive and defensive soul tools along the top of the city wall.

There were more than seventy aerial surveillance soul tools in the skies above the city, and they were responsible for watching several thousand square kilometers in Eastern Sun City’s proximity.





Volume 37, Chapter 533.3: Eastern Sun City


Even though Eastern Sun City was in the north, it was the largest city in that region, and thus was a busy and bustling city. Many northerners were proud of being able to live in Eastern Sun City, and this also meant land within the city had exorbitant prices.

It was evening, and there were fewer and fewer people near the city gates. They had to be prepared against aquatic soul beasts which could appear at any moment, so Eastern Sun City’s gates would close every day after sundown.

A man and a woman carrying simple luggage was walking towards the gates. They seemed very tall, but had normal appearances, and they looked like husband and wife.

The soldiers responsible for standing guard were hiding from the cold in their bunks inside the city gates. Eastern Sun City was a large city, but they weren’t strict with inspecting individuals who were coming into and out of the city. This wasn’t very necessary, as nothing remotely related to war had happened at Eastern Sun City for a long time besides fighting aquatic soul beasts, just like Oak City. This was especially so after much of the Heavenly Soul Empire’s territory had been conquered, and Eastern Sun City became a city towards the back of the Sun Moon Empire’s territory. There were all kinds of surveillance soul tools in the sky, while their enemies wouldn’t choose to attack this place.

The man and woman strode into the city easily.

They were in the north, so the sky darkened relatively early. The sky had turned completely dark just as they entered the city.

The girl glanced at the youth next to her with a look of admiration in her eyes. “You were right. Eastern Sun City’s defenses are slack, like they aren’t defending it at all.”

There was no doubt that this man and woman were Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, who had used Imitation to change their appearances.

Huo Yuhao laughed and said, “Don’t worship me. I’m just a legend.”

Tang Wutong giggled and said, “I’m hungry, legend. Are we going to find a place to eat? It’s still early.”

“Alright!” Huo Yuhao wasn’t worried at all. There were more than two hundred and fifty kilometers between Oak City and Eastern Sun City, and Oak City would need at least a day to report any information to Eastern Sun City, even if they did so as soon as possible. Oak City’s satellites and transmission soul tools had been destroyed after all, and their resources had been cleaned out. The first thing the local officials had to do was stabilize everything inside the city, while sending out information at the same time.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong needed but two hours to fly to Eastern Sun City. They had more than enough time to execute their plan.

They found a barbeque shop and walked in. The weather in the north was extremely cold, and people who lived here needed to replenish a lot of heat to sustain their daily work and activities. That was the reason why meat and wine were very welcome inside the city.

Roast meat and ale were considered the greatest luxuries for typical citizens. It was dinnertime, so the barbeque shop had quite a few customers. They were about eighty percent full.

“What do you guys want to eat?” The waiter trotted over and asked hastily.

“What do you guys have?” Huo Yuhao replied.

The waiter answered, “You must be from elsewhere. Eastern Sun City is famous for its roasted snow pork.”

“Snow pork? What’s that?” Tang Wutong asked curiously.

The waiter continued, “We rear a species of small pigs, and they have a lot of fat, and taste very rich. Roasting them to about seventy percent is best. They can be marinated with all kinds of sauces, and are best combined with a cup of our local specialty – ale – even Gods will salivate with that combination!”

Huo Yuhao laughed when he heard the waiter talk about salivating Gods. The image of the God of Emotions cooking surfaced in his mind. No matter how delicious the roast pork here was, it probably couldn’t compare to his culinary skills.

“Alright. Get us some roasted snow pork, and give us some of your signature dishes as well, along with two cups of ale.”

“Alright! Please wait for a few moments, the food is coming right up.” The waiter was like a gust of wind as he swiftly turned and left.

Tang Wutong heaved a faint sigh and said, “If only there weren’t any war going on! Why does the Sun Moon Empire have to invade us?”

Huo Yuhao answered, “The thirst for power. A ruler will start an invasion at all costs in order to satisfy his desire for even more power, and the citizens are the ones who suffer in the end. Even though we are reacting passively and at a disadvantage, we are still the ones starting a war. The citizens are still the ones suffering. Even though we have a different starting point, the end result will not be that much different. The only thing we can do is try our best not to hurt those innocent citizens.”

Tang Wutong could feel that Huo Yuhao was a little dispirited. She held his hand that was on the table and said, “Don’t think so much. We’re doing this so that fewer people will suffer the fires of battle.”

Huo Yuhao said, “The main reason why a large city like Eastern Sun City has such lax defenses is because of its geographical location.”

Golden light swirled beneath his eyes as he spoke, and he activated Spiritual Detection.

Huo Yuhao didn’t choose this eatery for nothing. This barbeque shop was located in Eastern Sun City’s central region, and the government office wasn’t far from here. Huo Yuhao’s Spiritual Detection activated at maximum range around him from this location could reach everything within Eastern Sun City.

Conducting surveillance before executing their mission was Huo Yuhao’s standard fighting strategy. Eastern Sun City was a large city after all, and it was different from Oak City. Huo Yuhao still had to be careful.

His spiritual undulations actually became weaker rather than stronger when he was using Spiritual Detection as his spiritual power improved. But this weakness wasn’t in terms of his detection capabilities. Instead, it was the spiritual undulations produced during the detection process that became weaker.

It would be harder to discover his Spiritual Detection this way. Even spiritual detectors had to lock onto their targets’ locations by sensing spiritual undulations. When spiritual undulations were weak to a certain extent, not even spiritual detectors could lock onto their targets.

Furthermore, Huo Yuhao’s control over his Spiritual Detection was improving even as the spiritual detectors were evolving.

Back when he had first faced off against the Death God, the Death God Douluo had discovered him because he had used Spiritual Detection, and that created a lot of trouble for him. He was almost unable to escape. But now, such circumstances wouldn’t have happened.

The reason for that was because Huo Yuhao could release a concrete-material spiritual avatar when he was sensing danger, and he would use this spiritual avatar to activate Spiritual Detection. That way, even if his enemies’ spiritual detectors discovered him during the detection process, they would only be locking onto his spiritual avatar.

Huo Yuhao could control his spiritual avatar to run in a different direction from his body. He didn’t have to worry about anything as long as he kept a single thread of his spiritual power from that spiritual avatar. Therefore, Huo Yuhao’s strongest characteristic wasn’t his fighting ability, but rather his ability to survive.

Huo Yuhao had a chance to survive even if he encountered extraordinarily powerful individuals like the Dragon Emperor Douluo, Long Xiaoyao.

But he still needed some luck. In the end, Ultimate Douluo controlled the secret of space, and escaping from their hands wasn’t easy at all. Huo Yuhao could still lose his life, even from a single shred of danger.

Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power expanded into the distance, and more than half of Eastern Sun City was quickly within his detection range. He didn’t share his Spiritual Detection with Tang Wutong because there was too much information, and that would cause a relatively large shock to her senses.

It didn’t take long before their roasted meat and ale were served. The waiter looked at Huo Yuhao, who was just sitting there with his head slightly lowered like he was dozing off. But the waiter didn’t pay him too much mind because business was too busy, and he hurried away after putting down the food.

There was a sharp knife on the plate of roasted pork to cut those large pieces.

Tang Wutong cut a piece and placed it into her mouth. Her eyes began to flow with pleasant surprise. Snow pork did taste different from normal pork. The snow pork was rich with fat, and all that lard entered the lean meat after roasting. It was fragrant but not too greasy, and thick aromatic juices filled her entire mouth once she took a bite. It was very delicious.

Huo Yuhao seemed to wake up from his brief nap after a few moments. He raised his head and glanced at Tang Wutong with a faint smile on his face and said, “How does it taste?”

Tang Wutong had a sip of ale. “It’s very good, you should have some.”

“Alright,” Huo Yuhao had a piece of roasted meat. He was as astonished and impressed as Tang Wutong was, and it didn’t take long for them to clear the food that they had ordered. The ale wasn’t that good, but it was fresh, and it was very effective at washing away the pork’s oiliness.

“Let’s find a place to stay.” Huo Yuhao held Tang Wutong’s hand after paying the bill and stepped out of the barbeque shop as they walked towards a street in the east.

The sky had already turned dark, and the weather was very cold. There was hardly anybody on the streets. Huo Yuhao wrapped an arm around Tang Wutong’s slim waist as he asked gently, “Are you cold?”

Tang Wutong smiled as she shook her head. “I’m not cold! I enjoy this cool and refreshing feeling.” Of course, she wouldn’t ask that same question back to Huo Yuhao. He was a soul master with Ultimate Ice.

Huo Yuhao said, “It would be more appropriate if we deployed the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion after this. We need to be agile, and it seems like we have to split up this time.”

Tang Wutong was a little surprised. “Is there a problem?”

Huo Yuhao answered, “A little. This city has a stronger military force than our initial judgment. They have roughly a hundred and fifty soul engineers, and there’s a soul tool front inside Eastern Sun City, towards the northern side. It should be used to defend against aquatic soul beasts. It seems like aquatic soul beasts appear very often in this place. Otherwise, there should be no reason for them to deploy a soul tool front in a place like this. Furthermore, there are actually many powerful spiritual detectors around that soul tool front. I was already discovered from a slight contact before this, and might have been locked onto if I hadn’t reacted quickly enough.”

Tang Wutong thought for a moment. “We might have some problems if we can’t sneak our way inside. We will likely be exposed if we let them unleash their soul tool front’s offensive and defensive capabilities. Even if we charge and force our way inside, they will have sufficient time to relay information out of the city.”





Volume 37, Chapter 534.1: Mermaids?


Huo Yuhao said, “That’s why we can only barge our way in. The strategic position of Eastern Sun City is very important to the Sun Moon Empire. Otherwise, they wouldn’t have stationed so many troops there. Once we complete our destruction of this place, we’ll greatly affect the Sun Moon Empire’s deployment in the north. In this way, we’ll be closer to our goal. That’s why this fight cannot be avoided.”

Tang Wutong’s eyes brightened immediately, and she said, “Yuhao, I have an idea. Since the Sun Moon Empire has installed a lot of spiritual detection soul tools within their soul formations in Eastern Sun City, such that you can’t even use your spiritual power, does it mean that they are guarding against enemies who are adept at spiritual abilities? If that’s the case, is it possible that they are guarding against aquatic soul beasts?”

Huo Yuhao suddenly thought of something. He had known Tang Wutong for a long time. He immediately understood what she was thinking, “Are you saying that there are spiritual-type aquatic

soul beasts here which can become my Spirit?” Ever since Huo Yuhao got the Ice Bear King as his Spirit, the soul rings of his Ultimate Ice martial soul were already completely filled. The Ice Bear King gave him his eighth soul ring, and his remaining strength was sufficient to confer on him his ninth soul ring. When his second soul core successfully formed, he would be a true nine-ringed Titled Douluo.

However, things were different for his other martial soul. Currently, Huo Yuhao had five Spirits – the Snow Empress, Ice Empress, Skydream Iceworm, Ice Bear King and Star Anise Mysterious Ice Grass. Four of his Spirits affected Huo Yuhao’s Ice Jade Empress Scorpion. But his Spirit Eyes only had seven rings so far.

Huo Yuhao once swore that he would never kill a soul beast to obtain soul rings ever again. This made it even harder for him to obtain a spiritual-type soul ring. Although his spiritual power was very great right now, soul rings were still very significant for soul masters. This was applicable even for Huo Yuhao.

If he could obtain the last two soul rings he needed for his Spirit Eyes, his spiritual abilities would definitely be greatly increased.

Huo Yuhao was also trying to ride his luck. It would be great if he could get a spiritual-type Spirit and two more soul rings for his Spirit Eyes. Otherwise, he would just forget it. Anyway, he was still a Titled Douluo if he had nine soul rings for his Ultimate Ice martial soul. Although it would be regretful if he had two fewer soul rings for his spiritual-type martial soul, it wouldn’t be too impactful.

Right now, he immediately realized that he might stand a chance after Tang Wutong reminded him! If he could obtain a spiritual-type soul ring here, his abilities could improve further. The biggest benefit to increasing his spiritual power was increasing his probability of success when he tried forming his second soul core in the future.

Whichever method he used to form his second soul core, his spiritual control was very important. Even though his spiritual control was already very strong now, he was still some way off from the Rank 98 Transcendent Douluo who were trying to form their second soul core.

Dim lights flashed, and Huo Yuhao revealed a pensive look in his eyes. After a brief moment, he said, “If your conjecture is right, we’ll need to make a trip to the Ice Sea.”

Tang Wutong said, “Let’s go together once we’re finished with things over here.”

Less than fifteen kilometers away from the northern city gates of the Eastern City was the northern side of the Ice Sea. It was very close.

At this moment, Huo Yuhao suddenly felt as if there was something moving in his spiritual sea. He thought of something, and generated a connection with his spiritual sea.

“You should ask me about something like this.” The Snow Empress’ voice sounded.

As Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power grew stronger, his Spirits had to go through his spiritual sea to inform him that they wanted to connect to him. Huo Yuhao relaxed the control of his spiritual sea before their intentions were made known to him. He didn’t do this intentionally. After his cultivation improved, his spiritual sea reached a solid state.

Yes! Although the Ice Sea wasn’t the ice plains of the Extreme North, it was still extremely cold. The Snow Lady was once the ruler of the ice plains of the Extreme North. Naturally, she knew best.

Huo Yuhao smacked his own forehead. “I was really stupid. It would have been easier for me to just ask the Snow Lady whether a spiritual-type soul beast can appear here.”

He opened his Spiritual Interference Domain, and everything around him became slightly blurry. No matter whether it was the aerial surveillance soul tools or those who passed by, they couldn’t see anything for ten meters around him.

“Snow Empress.” Huo Yuhao gently called.

Two beams of light shone at the same time. One was white, and the other was green. Two beauties appeared in front of Huo Yuhao. They were the Ice and Snow Empresses.

The Snow Empress smiled and said, “You are really dumb. You don’t even know how to tap into your advantages. Who else is better equipped than my sister and I when it comes to the Extreme North?”

Huo Yuhao laughed bitterly. “Don’t mock me anymore. Are there any spiritual-type soul beasts in the northern Ice Sea?”

The Snow Empress answered without any hesitation, “Yes! Of course there are. Anything is possible in the sea.”

“What?” Huo Yuhao’s eyes lit up after hearing her words. He also didn’t expect the Snow Empress to be so certain.

The Snow Empress said, “It seems like neither of you are very familiar with aquatic soul beasts.”

Huo Yuhao laughed bitterly and said, “Of course not. They aren’t very useful for soul masters like us. Since that’s the case, we don’t have much research on them. Even in Shrek Academy, there are very few records on them. I vaguely recall that a million year soul beast once appeared. It was called the Deep Sea Devilwhale King. Our ancestor, Tang San, once obtained a soul ring from the sea.”

The Snow Empress said, “There are many aquatic soul beasts. In fact, there are more aquatic soul beasts than there are soul beasts on land. Furthermore, they are very strong. Their overall abilities are above that of land soul beasts. The only advantage that soul beasts on land possess is their outstanding fighting strength. I have to say that Di Tian is indeed very powerful. There was originally the Deep Sea Devilwhale King among aquatic soul beasts who was very strong. However, even he wasn’t Di Tian’s match. According to what I know, in the aquatic regions close to the Douluo Continent, there are a few such aquatic soul beasts. As for what types of soul beasts exist in further aquatic regions, I have no clue. However, I can still confirm that none of them would be Di Tian’s match even if they exist. Di Tian is already the extreme. If not for the fact that he can’t become a god, he would have tried for it.”

The Snow Empress and Di Tian weren’t friends. It was also precisely because of this that her appraisal of him was honest.

Huo Yuhao’s expression changed slightly. His future goal was to defeat Di Tian! If he couldn’t do so, he couldn’t truly become a god and inherit the godly seat of the God of Emotions. It was only by defeating Di Tian that he could fulfil his goal. Right now, he didn’t just learn how strong the Beast God was from one aspect. Di Tian was deservedly the strongest creature on the entire Douluo Continent.

Tang Wutong asked, “Snow Empress, is there an aquatic soul beast that’s adept at spiritual power in this Ice Sea? If there is, is it possible for it to become Yuhao’s Spirit?”

The Snow Empress hesitated for a moment before replying, “In the sea, there are many soul beasts that are adept at spiritual abilities. However, there’s only one sufficiently strong species nearby. It’s the Mermaids.”

“Mermaids?” Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were both curious. They had never heard of such a name before.

The Snow Empress said, “Mermaids are also known as genies in the sea. They are the best in terms of spiritual abilities among all the aquatic soul beasts that I know. Their upper bodies are like humans, while their lower bodies resemble that of fish. Most of them are female, and the females rule their species. Whether it’s a male or a female, the upper half of a Mermaid is always very nice. The reason why they’re called Mermaids is because of their leader, who is known as the Princess of the Sea. The Princess of the Sea is the ruler of this aquatic region. Among the few aquatic soul beasts that can claim to have similar cultivation to mine, one of them is the Princess of the Sea.”

“Her spiritual power is extremely strong. If she’s fighting in the sea, even the Evil Eye Tyrant might not be able to beat her. However, the Evil Eye Tyrant is definitely stronger on land. Because of how strong they are and their spiritual abilities, many other species of aquatic soul beasts ally with them. Their overall abilities are rather strong.

Tang Wutong asked, “Since aquatic soul beasts are so strong, why don’t they venture onto land after their cultivation reaches a certain point? Wouldn’t they benefit more?”

The Ice Empress smiled slightly and said, “You can’t use the mentality of land bound soul beasts on aquatic soul beasts. To them, the sea is their habitat. It’s where the living conditions fit them. Also, a big problem for them is that their abilities are greatly weakened when they leave the sea. The longer they are out of the sea, the more their lives will be in danger. Under such a condition, they are naturally not inclined to leave the sea.”

The Snow Empress said, “If Yuhao wants to obtain a Spirit from an aquatic soul beast, Mermaids are definitely a good choice. There are hundred thousand year Mermaids. It’s just that…” As she spoke until here, she furrowed her brow before continuing, “Mermaids feel that they are above others. They don’t really respect any other species of soul beasts. Furthermore, they are very strong. Trying to convince them won’t be easy. After all, aquatic soul beasts don’t regard humans as their natural enemies. Even that empire that specializes in making soul tools never threatens them.”





Volume 37, Chapter 534.2: Mermaids?


Huo Yuhao said, “I’d like to try when the fight in Eastern Sun City is over.”

Tang Wutong looked at the Snow and Ice Empresses and asked, “Will there be any danger?”

The Snow Empress replied, “If you don’t go to deep into the Ice Sea, there shouldn’t be much of a problem. I’ll appear then. Even the Mermaid will need to show some face to me. At the same time, it will also depend on whether you get lucky. Although I believe that the probability of success isn’t huge, I’ll still accompany you since you want to go there.”

Huo Yuhao nodded and said, “Alright, that’s it then. Please return now. We are about to begin our mission.”

The Snow and Ice Empresses turned into two streaks of flowing light and returned to Huo Yuhao’s spiritual sea.

Huo Yuhao squinted slightly and said, “If I can obtain my eighth soul ring this time, I can try for my second soul core after a period of consolidation. The probability of success will also be greater.”

Tang Wutong asked, “Are you still sticking with the Yin Yang Complement? I still feel that it’s too dangerous.”

Huo Yuhao smiled as he said, “I still have to give it a shot. Otherwise, I won’t be convinced. My future goal is to defeat Di Tian. If I can’t get a soul core that’s as strong as his, how can I do so? Since I’ll need to challenge him one day, I must do so in my best state. Even if I fail, I can still use the other method. My greatest advantage is my age. I still have enough time.”

Tang Wutong rolled her eyes and said, “You are really stubborn.”

Huo Yuhao chuckled and got closer to her before pecking her on the cheek. After this, he said, “Don’t you like how stubborn I am?”

“Pui! Who likes your stubbornness?”

Huo Yuhao laughed, “Oh, it’s called persistence, isn’t it? You like my persistence. Persistence and stubbornness are synonyms. There’s not much difference between the two. Let’s go and find a place. I really wish to cuddle you and sleep.”

Tang Wutong laughed and said, “Come on then! I’ll let you do whatever you want.”

Huo Yuhao’s expression immediately turned bitter. “Your seal will come and give me trouble even before three seconds is up. Haih, when can I see my father-in-law, who’s the only one who can solve this problem!”

Tang Wutong also pinched the soft flesh on his waist and said, “I think this is a rather good arrangement. Let’s take it as a test for you.”

Huo Yuhao appeared sorrowful, “This test is too difficult.”

As the two of them spoke, they approached a nearby inn.

“Let’s go in there.” Huo Yuhao led Tang Wutong into the inn. They asked for a room and used a gold soul coin to purchase a map of Eastern Sun City.

This inn was squeaky clean. Apart from its cleanliness, there was nothing about it that could be raved about. However, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong weren’t there for a holiday.

They entered their room and closed the door. Huo Yuhao then began to recite incantations. In just a few seconds, a pitch-black door silently opened.

Under the concealment of Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power, it was impossible to sense any energy undulations coming from this door.

Huo Yuhao nodded at Tang Wutong. Her body flashed, and she entered the spectral demiplane. Huo Yuhao couldn’t leave right now, as he had to maintain the energy barrier around the door. Otherwise, any soul master that passed by would be able to sense the sinister aura and immense soul power undulations coming from it.

Not long afterward, Tang Wutong returned. Bei Bei, Xu Sanshi, He Caitou, Jiang Nannan and Xiao Xiao were with her. It was a gathering of the members of Shrek’s Seven Monsters.

Bei Bei asked Huo Yuhao, “I heard from Wutong that you’ve encountered some trouble?”

Huo Yuhao answered, “A little, but it shouldn’t be a huge problem. Eldest senior, come here and take a look.”

Everyone gathered around a table, which was covered in the map that Huo Yuhao had purchased earlier. He had already marked out some points on it. Among them, he specially used a red marking for a place in the north of the city.

Huo Yuhao said, “Through the earlier use of my Spiritual Detection, I discovered that there are thirty thousand troops stationed in this city, as well as a soul master legion formed by a total of a hundred and fifty soul masters. Just inside the northern city gates, there’s a soul formation, which I believe is stronger than the one that we destroyed before. The soul tools there are all the newest types. Furthermore, there are many spiritual detection soul tools. Honestly speaking, it does curb my Spiritual Detection and surveillance abilities, such that I’m unable to use my Spiritual Detection to clearly find out what’s going on inside. Earlier, I unintentionally triggered their spiritual barrier. I’m afraid that it has made them warier.”

Bei Bei nodded slightly and said, “The defense of this Eastern Sun City is beyond our expectation. What have you decided to do? If we’re going to launch an assault, how confident are you?”

Huo Yuhao said, “I thought about it earlier. Given the scale of this soul formation, we’ll need our Heavy Artillery Soul Engineer Legion to continuously attack and suppress them if we are to launch an assault. However, given the soul tools in this soul formation, I’m afraid it will be able to last for quite some time. At the same time, it can even counterattack. We’ll definitely sustain some losses then. If we use our Fort Soul Engineer Legion at the same time, we might be able to take it down as quickly as possible. However, we’ll still sustain losses. If we go head-to-head with them, we’ll expose our abilities. News will then spread from Eastern Sun City.”

Bei Bei said, “It’s best for us to avoid any losses. The power that we control is limited. If we can avoid any direct clashes, it’ll be the best.”

Everyone nodded in agreement. They had a common agreement on this point.

The Sun Moon Empire’s expertise in soul tool technology was unquestioned. As a result, there were a few large-scale soul tools among this soul formation that Huo Yuhao and He Caitou didn’t recognize. They didn’t have time right now to research them either. The last time they attacked the Sun Moon Empire’s soul formations, there were a few such soul tools around too.

If these soul tools were lethal weapons, or if the linked soul tools in the soul formation had some kind of special use, Shrek Academy’s three soul engineer legions would likely suffer very heavy damage. This was certainly something they couldn’t afford to risk.

They had linked soul tools too, but each of the three soul engineer legions was differently equipped.

The Heavy Artillery Soul Engineer Legion that Huo Yuhao controlled were equipped with linked soul tools that could only be used for attacking, but not defending. This was the same for the Fort Soul Engineer Legion. This was because the resources that would be drained were far too great. It was only by attacking that they could conserve a lot of resources. After all, these three soul engineer legions were only supported by the wealth of Shrek Academy. They had no choice but to sacrifice certain aspects.

Only the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion was equipped with linked soul tools that could attack and defend at the same time.

The Tang Sect’s greatest problem was that it couldn’t afford to sustain heavy losses. This was why they were afraid of being subjected to an all-out linked attack. The offensive strength of such an attack was even too overwhelming for a Titled Douluo. Losses and damages were certainly unavoidable.

Huo Yuhao said, “This is why I’ve decided not to use the Heavy Artillery Soul Engineer Legion after weighing our options. While the Heavy Artillery Soul Engineer Legion is offensively strong, it’s not flexible enough. Against a huge city like Eastern Sun City, we need to be able to retreat anytime we want to. For this soul formation, we need to think of a way of overcoming it from the inside. It’s only in this way that we can minimize our losses and gain the most from it.”

“I agree.” He Caitou said without any hesitation. He was excited to have robbed a soul formation the other time. Every soul formation represented immense wealth! It was definitely good to loot a soul formation. Destruction would be a pity.

Bei Bei asked, “Yuhao, are you saying that we’re going to stick with attacking from the inside?”

Huo Yuhao nodded and said, “A soul formation is very strong. Whether it’s in terms of defense or offense, it can achieve the best effect through linked soul tools. However, it has a flaw. It’s that any linked soul tools that are fired using a soul formation are all targeted outward. To overcome this flaw, many aerial surveillance soul tools have to be installed around the soul formation to keep enemies from getting close. My strength is that I can conceal myself and get close to the inside of such a soul formation, which would give me an opportunity to cause some destruction. Unless the Sun Moon Empire’s soul engineer legions can link together to attack and defend, I should be able to make a breakthrough using such a method.”

“The reason why this soul formation is so troublesome is because it has many spiritual detection soul tools and barriers. That’s why even I run the risk of alarming them if I sneak in.”

“I’ve made some estimates. The largest spiritual barrier in this soul formation is around five hundred meters from the formation. That’s also the maximum range of a spiritual barrier. Its greatest use is to prevent those who are adept at spiritual power from sneaking in. It doesn’t work the same as aerial surveillance soul tools.”

“If they are really guarding against the Mermaids, I’m fairly sure that Mermaids don’t possess any concealment abilities. At least, they can’t escape the detection of oscillation detectors. Along with such a spiritual barrier, I’m sure it’s enough for them.”

“However, our advantage is that we can avoid detection before we enter that spiritual barrier. That’s why we can sneak in and cause destruction if we are able to cover those five hundred meters in the shortest time possible before the linked soul tools are able to take effect.”





Volume 37, Chapter 534.3: Mermaids?


“If they are automatic linked defensive soul tools, Teacher Xuan discovered that it takes around two to three seconds before the entire soul formation is activated after the soul tools are triggered. This will differ depending on the quality of the linked soul tools. This is why we need to cover that distance within two seconds to remain out of harm’s way. Then, linked defensive soul tools will be useless against us.”

As he spoke until here, Huo Yuhao paused for a moment before he continued, saying, “However, there’s still a problem – our uncertainty of our enemy’s strength. I scanned everything inside earlier, although it was at the price of alarming the enemy. When I scanned the place, I sensed that there were roughly a hundred and fifty soul engineers in the soul formation. However, I couldn’t tell their exact strength, as I was too rushed. This also means that the problem that we’ll face after sneaking in is how to quickly occupy the soul formation and get rid of the enemies.”

Bei Bei said, “This shouldn’t be a huge problem. Given our abilities, we should be able to fight even a Titled Douluo. Although Eastern City is an important fort, I don’t think the Sun Moon Empire will deploy many Titled Douluo here. Now that the war is in full scale, Titled Douluo are very important on the battlefield, as they can threaten their enemies on a strategic scale. However, they would be less useful if they were over here. On the other hand, I think covering five hundred meters is a more difficult task. Can the two of you do it?”

Huo Yuhao replied, “If our flying-type soul tools are at full speed, there shouldn’t be a problem. If we bring two people each with us, we should be able to scrape through.”

Xu Sanshi said, “That’s easy. Leave Caitou outside to liaise with us, while we charge in and quickly deal with the soul engineers. After that, we’ll occupy the soul formation.”

He Caitou was a little dissatisfied as he asked, “Why am I the one staying outside? My Fort Soul Engineer Legion isn’t participating in the fight either.”

Xu Sanshi said, “Of course you are the one staying outside. After we enter, we must do our best not to cause any destruction to the soul formation. Rather, we must only lay our hands on the soul engineers. Those soul tools are extremely destructive. If we damage them, I’ll see how sad you’ll be.”

He Caitou twisted his lips and said, “That sounds logical. Alright then.”

Bei Bei looked at Huo Yuhao and asked, “Yuhao, do you have anything to add?”

Huo Yuhao said, “This time, our main force will be the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion. They’re the most flexible. Second senior shall commandeer them from the outside, and they’ll be prepared to liaise with us at any time. If something happens to us, second senior will lead the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion to focus its firepower and destroy the linked defense of the soul formation. Given the strength of the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion, they should be able to do so within fifteen minutes. However, we must try to avoid a situation where the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion faces the offensive soul tools of the soul formation. People are more important than resources. We must not conserve any resources at all.”

“Alright, I know.” He Caitou nodded seriously.

Jiang Nannan said, “Yuhao, should we deploy our other two soul engineer legions outside the city just in case? If we face any problems, the other two soul engineer legions can coordinate with the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion to attack.”

Huo Yuhao shook his head and replied, “There are many aerial surveillance soul tools above Eastern Sun City. It’ll be difficult to deploy the other two soul engineer legions. If the three soul engineer legions attack together, they’ll indeed be very destructive. But the problem is that we’ll be directly subjected to our own firepower once the enemy’s linked defense is overcome, as we will be within the soul formation.”

Jiang Nannan realized how immature her proposition was after listening to his explanation. She turned slightly red and said, “Apologies, I didn’t consider everything.”

Xu Sanshi always didn’t stand on the side of reason. He hugged Jiang Nannan and cheerfully said, “No worries, no worries. You had a point too.”

Huo Yuhao followed by saying, “However, I’ll still need to adjust our manpower. If it’s the six of us that are going to charge in, I don’t think that’s the ideal combination.”

Bei Bei said, “Yuhao, you don’t need to have any misgivings. You are the chief commander of this mission. Everyone will listen to you. Your word is final.”

Huo Yuhao said, “Our main goal this time is to kill people, or at least make those soul engineers lose their fighting strength. Under such a circumstance, our attack is of paramount importance. For safety purposes, we need to be defensively sound too. That’s why I suggest that third senior has to go in. However, apart from him, we need to send our most offensive fighters in too. That’s why fourth senior and Xiao Xiao should stay out. Eldest senior, third senior, Wutong, Brother Ji, Ye Guyi and I shall be the six entering. In that way, we can achieve the greatest effect. Our combined destructiveness is the strongest.”

Xiao Xiao twisted her lips and said, “You’re not bringing me along for the fun again. Alright, I’ll stay outside with Caitou then.”

Jiang Nannan nodded and said, “I’m fine with this arrangement too. I’ll help Caitou prepare the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion.”

Huo Yuhao said, “We’ll start then. Seniors, I’ll invite you guys out when I find a good spot. Get the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion to be fully equipped and ready to await orders.”

Everyone nodded and quickly returned to the spectral demiplane through the door. Only Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong remained outside.

After shutting the door, Huo Yuhao led Tang Wutong out of the inn and proceeded towards the north.

The thirty thousand soldiers didn’t scare them at all. Ordinary soldiers were just cannon fodder in front of soul engineers. Even if there were a few soul masters, they wouldn’t be able to cause much trouble either. This was why Huo Yuhao’s goal, to destroy the soul formation in Eastern Sun City first, was very precise. From there, they could control the entire city in the shortest time possible, and proceed with their strategic deployment.

Since they were going to attack, they definitely couldn’t do it from the inn they were staying in. Huo Yuhao and the few others could use his Imitation to conceal themselves. However, if the entire Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion was to move out, they needed to gather and prepare first.

Although aerial surveillance soul tools had great surveillance abilities, they weren’t effective against concealed things or people. They weren’t omnipotent. After all, the Sun Moon Empire couldn’t possibly use thermal detectors and oscillation detectors to scan the city continuously. There were many people living in the city. Such surveillance was completely unnecessary.

Where was the best place for people to gather? There were two hundred people. Huo Yuhao had a clear idea of what to do, which was to gather everyone in the inn.

In the distance, the northern city walls of Eastern Sun City were visible. Huo Yuhao squinted, and revealed a mysterious look in his eyes. The soul formation was not far in front of them anymore. This soul formation was very intricately constructed. It relied on the northern city walls. Some of the soul tools were located inside the city, while the others were on top of the city walls.

However, as his Spiritual Detection was discovered earlier, Huo Yuhao couldn’t completely ascertain what those soul tools were. This was why he was very prudent when it came to this fight. He had to fight with his greatest strength.

Apart from Ye Guyi, those who were involved in this mission had at least eight rings. Tang Wutong even had nine rings. Such power was already extraordinary. Moreover, Huo Yuhao’s combination with Tang Wutong made them as strong as a Transcendent Douluo. If nothing unexpected happened, it shouldn’t be difficult to charge in and take control of the soul formation.

Huo Yuhao unleashed his Spiritual Detection once again. Under his control, he avoided the soul formation, which was directly in front of him. Instead, he extended his Spiritual Detection to either side of the soul formation.

Very soon, he found the place that he was looking for. It was a hotel that was not far from the northern city walls.

This hotel wasn’t considered very huge. It only had three stories. The infrastructure also appeared rather decent, just that it looked slightly dilapidated.

After Huo Yuhao discovered it, he immediately used his Spiritual Detection to scan it.

The occupancy of this hotel wasn’t very high. It was only thirty percent full. The third floor was very quiet and empty. The guests in this hotel were also ordinary people. No sign of soul power undulations could be detected.

This discovery left Huo Yuhao very satisfied. He had successfully found a place to hide the members of the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion.

He used his Imitation and disappeared into the night with Tang Wutong. After a brief moment, they appeared within the hotel.

Time was not on his side. Huo Yuhao naturally didn’t ask for rooms. Not only would that leave traces behind, but it was also a massive waste of time.

His gentle yet powerful spiritual power silently engulfed the entire building. In the next moment, his eyes flashed with golden light.

A weaker version of his Spiritual Blast was unleashed. Whether it was the staff or the guests in the hotel, they immediately felt dizzy. In the next moment, they all passed out, and the entire hotel instantly went silent.

This was how terrifying a spiritual-type soul master could be. Huo Yuhao managed to quietly gain control of the entire hotel. This time, he didn’t open too many of the spectral doors. He only opened three. The members of the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion streamed out of the doors and started to rapidly occupy the entire hotel.

Under Huo Yuhao’s orders, all the guests in the hotel were gathered in the lobby and supervised. This was to prevent anyone from screaming hysterically if he or she awoke from unconsciousness.

This hotel was in a prime location. It had three stories, and faced the soul formation at the northern city gates. The two hundred members of the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion were hiding beside the windows in each room. Once the order was given, they could charge out immediately.





Volume 37, Chapter 535.1: Myriad Souls Douluo and the Abomination Douluo


Eastern Sun City was a northern city. If it was like Radiant City, soul power detectors would sweep the city immediately. If that happened, the appearance of a large number of soul masters would still be easily detectable. In Eastern Sun City, it was evident that there wasn’t such a large-scale installation of surveillance soul tools.

The senior management of the Tang Sect were all gathered in the lobby. Huo Yuhao briefed Ji Juechen and Ye Guyi on his strategy.

“You can command us.” Ji Juechen answered in the simplest of ways. With Huo Yuhao’s Spiritual Detection, he was always able to unleash his greatest fighting strength.

Huo Yuhao was a little speechless as he avoided the passionate gaze in Ji Juechen’s eyes. He sighed helplessly. He knew exactly why Ji Juechen looked at him with such an expression. It was evident that he wanted to challenge him to a fight!

When Huo Yuhao exited his closed-door cultivation after two years, Ji Juechen was the most excited. It was just that Huo Yuhao went with Tang Wutong on a mission immediately, after which they were recruited for this fight, thus Ji Juechen didn’t have the time to challenge Huo Yuhao. Huo Yuhao was indeed a little fearful of such a look in Ji Juechen’s eyes. He was too crazy. Furthermore, over the past two years, Ji Juechen’s abilities had been continuously improving too. Even Huo Yuhao couldn’t discern what his current standard was.

It was important to note that Ji Juechen was the first among all of them to become a Soul Douluo. Although he was not yet a Titled Douluo, he was at least at Rank 88 or 89. More importantly, his abilities couldn’t just be measured using his cultivation. His terrifying sword intent was also very frightening.

Ji Juechen was close to becoming a Titled Douluo. Along with his powerful sword intent, Huo Yuhao had no confidence of defeating him, even though he had always been very confident in himself. The reason was very simple. Ji Juechen was simply too aggressive.

“Let’s make a move then. Second senior, I’ll leave things here to you. Wait for my signal.”

He Caitou nodded at Huo Yuhao.

After this, Huo Yuhao led Bei Bei, Xu Sanshi, Tang Wutong, Ji Juechen and Ye Guyi out of the hotel. He unleashed his Imitation and concealed the six of them in the darkness of the night. Not only this, but his Spiritual Detection was also shared with his teammates. He sent everything that he detected to them.

The hotel was very close to the northern city gates. Very soon, Huo Yuhao and the others were close. They only stopped when they were around five hundred meters away from the soul formation.

The soul formation wasn’t very well-lit. It appeared a little dim, and things seemed to be very quiet inside. As some buildings were blocking it, it was unclear what soul tools were inside.

Huo Yuhao stood behind Bei Bei and Xu Sanshi, while Tang Wutong was behind Ye Guyi and Ji Juechen. Their Class 9 flying-type soul tools opened at the same time.

Through his Spiritual Detection, Huo Yuhao said to the rest, “When I shout later, muster your soul power and protect yourselves, as the impact force from the high speed will be very great.”

“Alright.” The rest acknowledged his words.

At this moment, Huo Yuhao turned to look at Tang Wutong. Their minds were linked, and they both nodded. Their soul power poured into their flying-type soul tools at an alarming speed.

Instantly, their Class 9 flying-type soul tools lit up at the same time. Blinding lights were released, such that they were no longer able to conceal themselves. This was especially so because of their soul power undulations.

“Charge!” Huo Yuhao shouted. He and Tang Wutong both grabbed onto one arm of each teammate by their side. They instantly burst forward, and the immense thrusting force made them seem like missiles. They charged in the direction of the soul formation like bolts of lightning.

Just as they fully unleashed their Class 9 soul tools, a deafening alarm sounded inside the soul formation. The soul power undulations from a Class 9 soul tool were simply too strong. The soul power detectors in the soul formation instantly detected their presence.

The entire soul formation lit up almost instantly. A gentle glow also shone from the linked defensive soul tools.

The worst thing that could happen to a soul formation was for enemies to assault it out of the blue. This was why the linked defensive soul tools were immediately activated once there the alarm sounded. The soul formation had to be protected before anything else was attended to.

However, Class 9 soul tools were Class 9 soul tools! In an instant, Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong and the rest had already achieved supersonic speed. In just a flash, they covered five hundred meters, and instantly crashed their way into the soul formation. As a result, the linked defense only came up after they had charged their way in.

Huo Yuhao naturally didn’t need to conceal them anymore. He unleashed his Spiritual Detection and engulfed the entire soul formation.

In this soul formation with so many surveillance soul tools, his Imitation was effectively useless.

Countless soul rays were immediately fired, engulfing the six of them. The reaction speed was immensely quick. It was even faster than the soul formation at the Ming Dou Mountain Range. Clearly, the soul engineers here were well-equipped and highly experienced.

Huo Yuhao had no time to be astonished. He unleashed his Spiritual Detection in all directions. It was as if he didn’t even see the countless soul rays that were being fired at him.

Dark gold light scattered, and turned into a metal barrier. This barrier isolated the soul rays. It was Xu Sanshi’s doing.

Behind Tang Wutong, her Radiant Butterfly Goddess’ wings opened. Suddenly, it was striking in the direction of the soul rays. As tremendous booms sounded, the soul rays stopped firing.

It was also at this moment that the entire soul formation lit up as bright as day. Huo Yuhao’s expression also changed slightly.

Evidently, his expression changed because he had received bad news from his Spiritual Detection. The first problem that he discovered was that this soul formation was much bigger than he had expected. Furthermore, the soul tools at the top and bottom of the city walls formed two different linked defensive formations. This also meant that the linked defensive formation at the top of the city walls was still effective against them, even though they had already snuck into the soul formation.

Apart from this, Huo Yuhao also sensed two strong auras inside this soul formation. Those were auras that threatened them. They probably came from Titled Douluo.

There are actually two Titled Douluo holding the fort in such an extremely northern city? They are certainly full of tricks!

However, Huo Yuhao immediately understood why the Sun Moon Empire had such an arrangement here. Evidently, the threat posed by aquatic soul beasts was rather dire. This was why they needed someone strong to hold the fort.

Two Titled Douluo wasn’t considered too scary. The scary thing was that these two Titled Douluo were likely Class 9 soul engineers too. The strength of a soul formation was clearly different with two Class 9 soul engineers commandeering it.

While Huo Yuhao was making such a judgment, he reacted immediately. On his forehead, his Eye of Destiny opened. Just as he spread his spiritual power without any conservation, he unleashed a strong strike of his Spiritual Blast.

The soul engineers that were closer to the soul formation were instantly killed as their heads burst. At the same time, Ji Juechen, Ye Guyi, Bei Bei and Xu Sanshi also charged in different directions under the guidance of Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power. They were all capable of fighting themselves. No matter how they were going to deal with the soul formation at the top of the city walls, they had to deal with things at the bottom first, since there were many more soul tools there. It was essential to suppress these soul tools before they dealt with the situation at the top of the city walls.

In the hotel, He Caitou was standing in front of a window on the third story. He was quietly observing the soul formation. Suddenly, his eyes brightened, and he shouted through his transmission soul tool, “Brothers, come with me.” As he spoke, he charged forward like a bomb. He broke the window and flew outside.

Xiao Xiao, Jiang Nannan and the rest followed closely behind. Two hundred Tang Sect soul engineers also charged out of the hotel. They rose into the air under He Caitou’s leadership.

They formed a circular formation, and a linked defense was instantly formed under He Caitou’s orders. After this, every soul engineer lifted a high-explosive cannon to his shoulder and ferociously fired it in the direction of the northern city walls.

This only happened because Huo Yuhao had just informed He Caitou through his Spiritual Detection to lead an all-out attack as a means of suppressing the soul formation at the top of the northern city walls.

Otherwise, Huo Yuhao and the others might be fatally hurt if they tried to fight their way up. Once they delayed and allowed more soul engineers to link up, their mission would become more and more difficult.

If they could suppress of the soul formation at the top of the city walls, the linked defensive formation would be quickly drained of soul power, and wouldn’t have enough strength to deal with Huo Yuhao and the others as a result.

Adapting to changes on a battlefield was important no matter when. With regards to this point, Huo Yuhao undoubtedly performed very well.

Bei Bei and the other three charged in four different directions. Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong didn’t move at all. Huo Yuhao only grabbed Tang Wutong’s hand as he unleashed his immense spiritual power towards one direction in the soul formation. His terrifying might even caused the air to shake a little.

“Scoundrels!” Someone shouted before two figures flew up from the soul formation. These two figures charged towards Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

Both were elders who seemed to be around seventy years old. When they rose from the soul formation, the linked defensive formation of the entire soul formation seemed to become a little dimmer. A sinister aura spread and engulfed the entire place, neutralizing Huo Yuhao’s immense spiritual power.





Volume 37, Chapter 535.2: Myriad Souls Douluo and the Abomination Douluo


Not soul engineers?

Huo Yuhao made an accurate judgment immediately. Not only were these two not soul engineers, but they were even a very familiar type of soul master – evil soul masters! They were evil soul masters from the Holy Ghost Church.

These two evil Titled Douluo were unfamiliar to Huo Yuhao. However, his expression immediately turned serious.

Evil soul masters found it very easy in the early stages of their cultivation. They were able to improve by leaps and bounds. However, it was very difficult for an evil soul master to become a Titled Douluo. It was even harder for them compared to ordinary soul masters.

As a result, evil soul masters that could become Titled Douluo were undoubtedly elites among evil soul masters. These two had to be honorary elders of the Holy Ghost Church even if they weren’t from the Worship Hall.

The Holy Ghost Church had actually deployed two evil soul masters here. It seemed like they must have hatched some kind of plot.

Huo Yuhao squinted, and strengthened the release of his spiritual power. Right now, both he and Tang Wutong were within his Spiritual Interference Domain. The two evil soul masters couldn’t tell their appearances. His immense spiritual power also kept the two evil soul masters busy, such that they couldn’t be bothered with anything else for now.

Both parties were at a stalemate, but the battlefield was thundering. Lights were also scattering everywhere. The soul formation at the top of the northern city walls was also being intensely bombed. Its linked defense was on the verge of collapsing.

The Sun Moon Empire had deployed a total of a hundred and fifty soul engineers here. A hundred of them were at the bottom of the city walls, while the other fifty were deployed at the top. Although the soul engineers at the top used their powerful linked defense to resist the attack of the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion, they were also being drained much more quickly.

If this were a normal situation where the enemies came from outside the city, the soul engineers in the city would be able to hang on. They could even combine their linked defenses at the top and bottom of the walls, generating an even stronger defense.

However, things were extremely chaotic at the bottom right now. Bei Bei and the other three were mercilessly killing soul engineers within the soul formation. How could anyone even be bothered by what was going on at the top?

This was why Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were not anxious at all. Whether it was Bei Bei and the other three or He Caitou who managed to achieve what they wanted, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong stood to benefit. If they weren’t anxious, they wouldn’t easily reveal their own flaws. This was the simplest fighting strategy, but it was very effective.

The two evil soul masters soon realized this, and they turned extremely grim. While Huo Yuhao was stunned by them, they were also equally astonished by the fact that so many powerful individuals had appeared here. In addition, there was even a soul engineer legion.

How strong was the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion? In the sky, every figure shone with the light of six soul rings. The entire soul engineer legion was made up of Soul Emperors!

Perhaps the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion might be less well-equipped than the outstanding soul engineer legions of the Sun Moon Empire. However, not a single soul engineer legion, even in the Sun Moon Empire, was as well-equipped with soul masters as the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion. Not even the Sun Moon Imperial Soul Engineer Legion was an exception.

Given this, the soul engineers at the top of the city walls were about to be taken down under the all-out attack of the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion.

“All of you are courting death!” The Titled Douluo on the left shouted before he lifted his right hand. His body immediately shone with two yellow, two purple and five black soul rings. A pitch-black flag also appeared within his grasp.

This entire flag was black, even up to its flagpole. However, there subtly seemed to be countless purplish-black indignant souls flashing above this flag.

Myriad Soul Banner! This evil soul master’s nickname was Myriad Soul. He was the Myriad Soul Douluo, a Rank 91 evil Titled Douluo.

The other evil soul master by his side also unleashed his martial soul. The Myriad Soul Douluo was a Tool Soul Master, while he was a Beast Soul Master. His body immediately expanded, and his skin seemed as if it were going to tear apart. Thick greenish fog quickly spread from his body. Very soon, he was more than twenty meters tall, and his waistline grew to more than twenty meters. He was like a monster now. He was actually a living creature, an Abomination, that existed in Huo Yuhao’s spectral demiplane too.

Huo Yuhao started to recite incantations. Tang Wutong flashed, and came in front of him.

He placed both his hands on her slim waist, maintaining their Haodong Power.

Tang Wutong’s eyes suddenly turned extremely bright. Sonorous dragon roars rang through the air. In front of her, a huge golden dragon head gradually surfaced. Following this, the dragon head opened its mouth wide, and balls of golden light shot towards the two evil soul masters.

This was the second soul skill of the Radiant Dragon Butterfly, Dragon God’s Fury!

It was important to remember that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong could unleash the abilities of a Transcendent Douluo when they came together as one entity. This was Dragon God’s Fury at the level of a Transcendent Douluo!

Every ball of light appeared very real. Wherever they passed, the air would actually weirdly collapse. It was as if the air was a wall, which was dented as the Dragon God’s Fury shot past. It was indeed very weird.

The Myriad Soul Douluo’s figure flashed before he arrived in front them. His Myriad Soul Banner moved along with the winds, and tragic screams echoed as sinister winds blew. The banner was about to engulf the balls of light unleashed by Dragon God’s Fury.

Something weird happened at this moment. The balls of light suddenly unfurled in mid-air, turning into small golden dragons. These dragons bared their teeth as they clawed towards the banner.

The avenging spirits that were released from the Myriad Soul Banner were instantly torn apart as they faced the golden dragons, which were filled with an aura of light. Suddenly, the sky turned extremely bright, and the sinister aura that was previously in the air was swept away under the effect of Dragon God’s Fury.

The Myriad Soul Douluo’s expression changed immediately. These avenging spirits were the source of his strength. He shouted, and the third soul ring of his Myriad Soul Banner shone brightly.

His Myriad Soul Banner enlarged ten times over, and reached towards all the small golden dragons.

The Abomination Douluo had already taken a big step by now, and was charging towards Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

The enlarged Myriad Soul Banner was actually very resilient. When it engulfed all the small golden dragons, it seemed as if countless souls had devoured them. Instantly, it really felt as if Dragon God’s Fury had been completely suppressed.

A cold look flashed across Tang Wutong’s face. The golden dragon head in front of her shone brightly all of a sudden. Following this, tremendous booms rang from the Myriad Soul Banner.

The Myriad Soul Douluo shouted in fury and quickly staggered back. The aura released from his Myriad Soul Banner seemed to weaken a little. Evidently, he had suffered greatly from Tang Wutong’s retaliation.

Evil soul masters could indeed curb most martial souls. However, Tang Wutong’s top-grade Radiant Dragon Butterfly couldn’t be curbed by any ordinary evil soul master. If not for the fact that Huo Yuhao was reciting incantations right now, which affected the circulation of their Haodong Power, Tang Wutong would have been able to hurt the Myriad Soul Douluo with her earlier blow, given her abilities.

At this moment, the Abomination Douluo rushed forward. He opened his arms, and a huge patch of greenish fog swept towards Tang Wutong and Huo Yuhao. A dark-greenish fluid also seeped out from his skin as his terrifying figure approached.

A huge chain also appeared in the Abomination Douluo’s hand. On a closer look, one could discover that it was formed by linking skulls together. These skulls didn’t belong to humans. Instead, they seemed to come from different living creatures. They were filled with intense vengeance and sinister auras. At the top of the chain, there was a hook made from an unknown bone structure.

As the Abomination Douluo swung his hand forward, his huge chain whipped towards Tang Wutong’s head.

Compared to the Abomination Douluo, Tang Wutong was extremely small. However, she was still fearless in the face of such a powerful opponent. She lifted her arms in front of her body and clasped her palms above her head. Her dragon wings came together at this point, engulfing Huo Yuhao within them.

A giant blade of light appeared in mid-air as if it had just cut open the heavens. It was more than ten meters long. As Tang Wutong swept her hands down, the huge blade slashed down, echoing the furious roar of a dragon at the same time.

“Ding!” The Abomination Douluo’s chain collided against the blade of light, and was instantly struck away. Three different projections suddenly appeared on the Abomination Douluo’s body. He wanted to avoid the incoming blade.

However, the blade was simply too quick. As light flashed, the Abomination Douluo roared furiously.

The three projections combined to form one, and a huge wound appeared on the Abomination Douluo’s shoulder. This was the result even after he used a defensive soul skill to take most of the offensive strength from the light blade. Otherwise, he would be in an even more tragic state.

Tang Wutong was forcefully resisting two evil Titled Douluo. Not only did she not lose out, but she even suppressed her opponents.

The Myriad Soul Douluo had caught his breath by now. He was staring fiercely at Tang Wutong. His sixth soul ring lit up, and he raised his Myriad Soul Banner up high. His black banner exuded a bluish rippling glow, causing it to appear deep-blue.

This deep-blue was as deep as the color of the sea. Following this, twelve avenging spirits flew out from the banner.

These avenging spirits were all deep-blue. They appeared to be different from ordinary avenging spirits. These spirits actually possessed a form of their own.

One of them was even a living creature with a human body and a fish tail. This avenging spirit had long hair that flowed all the way behind his head. Its entire body even exuded a blue glow. It was just that there was spirit fire dancing in its eyes.

The other eleven avenging spirits also took different forms. The only similar characteristic between all of them was that they were aquatic creatures. They should be aquatic soul beasts.

This evil soul master actually controls the avenging spirits formed from aquatic soul beasts.





Volume 37, Chapter 535.3: Myriad Souls Douluo and the Abomination Douluo


The avenging spirits of twelve aquatic soul beasts appeared. Apart from that mermaid avenging spirit, the other eleven avenging spirits flew towards Tang Wutong. Each of them released a powerful aura.

The mermaid avenging spirit lifted her head. She seemed to sigh. After that, a weird voice was heard from her mouth.

Her voice was captivating, but she sounded like she was sobbing. She made one feel like crying.

Tang Wutong was stunned when she heard this voice. She was about to unleash her next soul skill, but she paused.

It was also at this moment that the eleven avenging spirits encircled her. One of them, which looked like a shark, picked up speed, and charged in front of Tang Wutong. It opened its huge mouth and was about to bite her.

While these avenging spirits were only spiritual entities, they could inflict more harm than real entities. This was because they could directly harm souls.

However, Tang Wutong was Tang Wutong. She was a nine-ringed Titled Douluo. She was even a Titled Douluo with top-grade twin martial souls.

Although the voice of the mermaid avenging spirit impacted her, she immediately regained her awareness she mimicked a lifting action. In front of her, a huge hexagram array that was more than five meters in diameter suddenly surfaced. Following this, a huge beam of light shot into the sky.

Ever since she got back with Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong had separated some parts from her martial soul before fusing with them again later on. After her memory was fully restored, she was not only able to use every soul skill of her evolved martial souls, but she was also able to use the unevolved soul skills that Wang Dong’er had possessed. Right now, she was using the Hexagram Array!

The beam of light unleashed from the gigantic Hexagram Array was filled with spiritual undulations and an aura of light. The moment the shark avenging spirit touched it, it let out a tragic scream and was glued to it. It couldn’t escape even if it wanted to.

Tang Wutong forcefully stomped the ground with her left foot. Suddenly, the hexagram array shone brightly, and the light also intensified. The shark avenging spirit completely melted as a result.

At this moment, the other ten avenging spirits stalled. The reason why they were so strong was because they conserved some fighting capabilities, and even streaks of soul memories. This was why they could feel fearful too. Evidently, they knew that Tang Wutong could completely curb them.

Tang Wutong didn’t care about all that. As she stomped her foot, her fourth soul ring also lit up. A strange layer of bluish-gold scales engulfed her body, turning into dazzling dragon armor. A huge golden dragon also started to revolve around her body.

This was her fourth soul skill, Dragon God’s Possession.

Tang Wutong’s figure flashed, and she charged towards the Abomination Douluo. She punched her right fist into the air. Suddenly, a terrifying blast rang in the air. This time, all space within a few hundred square meters seemed to collapse. The Abomination Douluo, who had just caught his breath, was delayed for a moment. After this, he saw a bright golden fist in front of him.

Compared to the Abomination Douluo, Tang Wutong was simply too small. However, at this instant, the Abomination Douluo felt a great sense of fear. It was as if this fist could crush the entire sky.

When Tang Wutong and Huo Yuhao were together, Huo Yuhao was generally the one who attacked. However, this didn’t mean that she couldn’t fight. On the contrary, Huo Yuhao might not even be able to beat Tang Wutong in a duel.

After Tang Wutong’s martial soul evolved, Huo Yuhao had the feeling that it was like a fusion of Wang Dong’er’s Radiant Butterfly Goddess and Wang Qiu’er’s Golden Dragon. In terms of physical strength and power, it had completely inherited Wang Qiu’er’s best abilities. This was why Tang Wutong was extremely terrifying right now.

As Tang Wutong charged out, she disabled her connection to Huo Yuhao. However, even so, she was still a Titled Douluo, and a powerful one at that!

“Boom!” A tremendous boom echoed. The Abomination Douluo used his fists to block her attack. He had already used all his strength and unleashed all his power. What he was most adept at was in fact his physical strength.

However, the clash of fists caused him to be flung back. As for the tiny Tang Wutong, she remained motionless in the air.

It was also at this moment that a pitch-black door appeared behind Huo Yuhao. If not for the fact that he had finished reciting his incantations, Tang Wutong wouldn’t have left his side.

A giant foot walked out from the pitch-black door. What appeared next was a massive creature.

It was a giant was even bigger than a Terror Knight! It was the Undead Ice Bear King, Er Bai!

Huo Yuhao didn’t move, and stood where he was. His spiritual senses had already covered the entire place. The reason why he summoned Er Bai wasn’t because he and Tang Wutong couldn’t deal with the two evil Titled Douluo. Rather, he needed to control the entire scene. He was the chief commander of the entire army, and not just fighting on his own. He had to minimize the number of casualties. Therefore, he had to focus on other aspects too, rather than just his own fight.

If this was before, fighting two evil Titled Douluo would be potentially fatal. However, he didn’t really regard them as a threat right now.

Er Bai squeezed out from the door and immediately roared. He took a step forward. After this, he charged towards the Abomination Douluo.

Tang Wutong drifted in mid-air. She was completely covered in dragon armor, and her wings were open behind her back. As a golden dragon revolved around her body, she was like a goddess of war.

She raised her right hand, and a beam of golden light shone. It was the Golden Dragon Spear that had belonged to Wang Qiu’er before.

Every day, Huo Yuhao cultivated with Tang Wutong. As he familiarized himself with her abilities, he passed the Golden Dragon Spear to her. In her hands, it was indeed much stronger as she used it with her Radiant Dragon Butterfly.

The spear drew an arc in the air, and a golden halo spread outward. The ten aquatic avenging spirits were forced back. At the same time, Tang Wutong turned her attention to the Myriad Soul Douluo.

Whether it was the Myriad Soul Douluo or the Abomination Douluo, they didn’t expect their opponents to be so strong. Tang Wutong’s consecutive strikes left them very frustrated. Furthermore, they couldn’t tell how strong she was. Was she a Transcendent Douluo? Only a Transcendent Douluo could possibly suppress them. Otherwise, she shouldn’t be so strong even if she had a light-type martial soul.

The Myriad Soul Douluo turned serious. He couldn’t be bothered with what the Ice Bear King was. At this moment, Tang Wutong had completely locked onto him, and a life-or-death fight was about to break out.

The Myriad Soul Douluo’s seventh soul ring shone, and he turned ethereal. After this, he swept his right hand down, and his banner fell to the ground. Following this, it expanded once again. As for the Myriad Soul Douluo, he turned into an intense ball of red light.

A weird scene appeared. An image surfaced on the originally pitch-black banner. This image was, blood-red and seemed to be similar to the Myriad Soul Douluo’s face. However, the image of him appeared to be much fiercer.

Myriad Soul True Body! This was the Myriad Soul Douluo’s seventh soul skill. He had actually turned into an avenging spirit, and become the main soul of his banner.

A low-pitched groan sounded. As sinister winds blew, the entire soul formation turned dimmer. A cold and sinister aura filled the air as the screams of countless avenging spirits echoed.

Domain-type soul skill! After the Myriad Soul Douluo unleashed his Martial Soul True Body, he actually unleashed a domain-type ability. No wonder he was an evil Titled Douluo!

Tang Wutong revealed a cold look on her face.

Domain-type skill? A domain created by his banner would likely strengthen all his avenging spirits. However, does he really think that’s going to work?

The image of the Myriad Soul Douluo wasn’t small. He had evidently realized that it wasn’t enough for him to deal with Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong. He needed to deal with the others who had entered the soul formation too. This was why he used his strongest skill, Myriad Soul Domain.

To use this domain-type skill, the requirements were very strict. First, he had to unleash his Martial Soul True Body. In addition, it was also his eighth soul skill.

The combination of two powerful soul skills enabled the Myriad Soul Douluo to unleash his greatest strength.

Earlier, he was already very angry when Tang Wutong killed one of his aquatic avenging spirits. Seeing that the Undead Ice Bear King was out too, he knew that he no longer stood a chance if he didn’t turn to his most powerful skill.

Evil soul masters were most adept at fighting en masse. He had relied on his evil martial soul to turn the tables many times.

Initially, when Huo Yuhao first faced evil soul masters, a corpse explosion had caused many elite members of Shrek Academy to suffer greatly. This was how Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong had gained the opportunity to take part in the Continental Advanced Soul Master Academy Soul Dueling Tournament.

It was a pity that they weren’t like they were before!

The deep-blue mermaid avenging spirit expanded to three times its original size. The banner was no longer visible, but this mermaid avenging spirit was extremely obvious.

Tang Wutong flew back. If it were any ordinary person in this Myriad Soul Domain, he wouldn’t be able to see anything. However, as Huo Yuhao was around, did it really matter that she couldn’t see anything?

Tang Wutong came to Huo Yuhao’s side in a flash. After this, the temperature in the entire soul formation fell tremendously.

Huo Yuhao was at the center of it. In the air, snowflakes started to fall.





Volume 37, Chapter 536.1: The Eastern Sun Falls


This was, in fact, the northernmost part of the northern area! Even though it was not as cold as the Extreme North Ice Field, it was way colder than anywhere else. Also, the Ice Sea was just outside of Eastern Sun City. There was plenty of water in the Ice Sea, so there would not be any problem with the water element here.

When Huo Yuhao first came here, he predicted that his power should increase by at least twenty percent here.

When Tang Wutong was shielding the blows for him, Huo Yuhao had already used his Spiritual Detection to scan the battlefield. He now had a complete picture of the battlefield, and had already established contact with He Caitou.

Everything was under control. After confirming that no other accidents would happen, he naturally would not go light on the enemy as he unleashed his true fighting power.

After returning to Huo Yuhao’s side, Tang Wutong opened up her butterfly wings and protected his back. This time around, Huo Yuhao was at the front, and Tang Wutong was like a little bird as she hugged his waist from the back.

If Tang Wutong’s seal were to act up now, it would truly be a tragedy. However, she had long thought of this. Because she was wearing the Dragon God Armor, her body would not come into direct contact with Huo Yuhao. This meant that the seal would naturally not act up.

Huo Yuhao’s eyes turned an ice-blue color as he faced the avenging spirits that were swarming towards him. Even though he was just standing there calmly, those spirits were unable to get near him and Tang Wutong. They were stuck outside of a five-meter radius around the couple.

As Huo Yuhao unleashed the Snowy Dance of Ultimate Ice, the entire area where the soul tools were installed started to experience a plunge in temperature. Because this area had activated their linked defense system, the cold air was trapped inside. Hence, the rate at which the temperature was dropping was faster than usual.

The soul engineers who were trying to put up a struggle experienced a huge drop in their fighting power because of the extreme cold. Even though Ji Juechen and the others would also be affected by the cold, they were much stronger, and thus were not affected as much as the soul engineers.

At this very instant, a loud cry could be heard. Following which, a pure white figure dashed out from the corner of the soul tool formation.

Even though the avenging spirits were spirits, they were also similar to packets of energy, and were affected by the extremely low temperature. Their flying speed and fighting power were also heavily reduced.

After this streak of white light emerged, the neighboring avenging spirits let out a deafening scream as they scrambled away from the white light in fear. As long as they came into contact with the white light, the avenging spirit would disintegrate. There was no chance for them to withstand the power of the white light. The Myriad Soul Domain no longer had any positive effects on them.

As the pure white figure floated in mid-air, a pair of white wings opened up behind her back. The figure was wielding a white sword in her hands. She was none other than Ye Guyi—the cultivator with the Holy Angel martial soul.

After controlling the situation, the next thing Huo Yuhao wanted to do was maximize profits. He not only wanted to make sure he maximized the number of spoils he could take away from this area, but he also wanted his peers to maximize what they could take away for themselves.

Beyond acquiring soul tools and resources here, the one who could stand to gain the most among the Tang Sect was Ye Guyi—the cultivator who was the natural enemy of evil soul masters.

Because she possessed the Holy Angel martial soul, she was able to improve her cultivation from killing evil soul masters and destroying their abilities. The Myriad Soul Douluo’s Myriad Soul Banner contained so many avenging spirits. If Yu Guyi were to cleanse and purify all of them, her cultivation would take a huge leap forward. This was why he did not immediately kill the two Titled Douluo evil soul masters. He merely unleashed his domain and competed against them with it. He only wanted to trap the Myriad Soul Douluo to give Ye Guyi a chance to kill him.

The avenging spirits had no chance against Ye Guyi as they disintegrated like the grass against a fire. All the avenging spirits were purified by her holy light. During the purification process, the pure energy released flowed into Ye Guyi’s body and continually improved her cultivation.

This was her first time fighting against evil soul masters since joining the Tang Sect. On top of that, the evil soul master she was facing was a Titled Douluo. With her current ability, she would not have been able to subdue a Titled Douluo even if she was his or her natural enemy. After all, as a Soul Sage, she was a lot weaker than a Soul Douluo. However, with the help of Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong and Er Bai, the odds were actually in her favor.

As she waved the holy sword in her hand, she was almost invincible. As she flickered across the sky, a large amount of avenging spirits were vanquished, and the leftover spirits scattered in fear.

A deafening howl roared through the air. It was the Myriad Soul Douluo screaming in pain. How could he not be anguished by the death of the spirits he had painstakingly accumulated in his Myriad Soul Banner? Not every dead person would produce an avenging spirit. Avenging spirits could only be formed from the death of a person or a beast with immense hatred. And the odds of that were one in ten.

The Myriad Soul Douluo was only able to cultivate to his current level because of the blood and sweat he had shed to accumulate the avenging spirits in his Myriad Soul Banner. He had been staying at Eastern Sun City to target aquatic soul beasts so as to acquire their avenging spirits. This was because the avenging spirits formed from the bodies of the aquatic soul beasts were a great fit for his martial soul.

Because of how Ye Guyi had rampaged around, the Myriad Soul Douluo had lost over a hundred avenging spirits. The spirits were completely purified, and had no chance of reviving. As the number of avenging spirits in his banner decreased, his powers waned. Even though he had over a thousand avenging spirits, he could not sustain this rate of losses for long!

After shouting in pain, the Myriad Soul Douluo increased the power of his Myriad Soul Banner. He steered his avenging spirits away from Ye Guyi and towards the other people, leaving gusts of wind buffeting against her.

However, Ye Guyi was not fighting alone. While she might not be strong enough to fight the Myriad Soul Douluo alone, she had the help of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong!

Huo Yuhao leaned slightly backwards, and a powerful light was released from both his body and Tang Wutong’s. A large eye—the Eye of the Asura—appeared. A Radiant Dragon God's Butterfly danced around the eye.

Following which, countless tiny black hammers were projected at the speed of light in all directions.

Mantra Amidst the Void, Spiritual Tempest.

Spiritual Tempest was the combination of the Spirit Eyes and the Clear Sky Hammer. It forged and strengthened Huo Yuhao’s immensely powerful spiritual power before releasing it as a devastating blow.

Martial soul fusion skill! It was a skill which was powerful enough to go up against a technique from a Transcendent Douluo. Back when they were facing more than ten Titled Douluo, Tang Wutong and Huo Yuhao had managed to burst through their containment with this skill. The two evil soul masters would probably have no chance against it.

The Spiritual Tempest avoided their own people in a delicate fashion, and attempted to expand its range to envelope their enemies.

The Abomination Douluo, Myriad Soul Douluo and the avenging spirits released from the Myriad Soul Banner were all enveloped within the Spiritual Tempest.

This was truly a full power attack released by both Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

Instantly, the avenging spirits that were flying clear of Ye Guyi found themselves frozen in mid-air. Their spiritual fire was solidified and frozen under the effects of Spiritual Tempest. Normally, the tempest would have destroyed a large number of the avenging spirits. However, Huo Yuhao was able to use his exceptional control to control the power of the tempest to create an advantage for Ye Guyi.

The Myriad Soul Douluo and Abomination Douluo both let out a groan.

The Myriad Soul Domain was also destroyed at that instant. Even if the two of them were to go up against Tang Wutong one-on-one, they would still find it hard to beat her. Furthermore, they were actually going up against a skill released by both Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

Hence, it took only a short while before the outcome of the battle was decided.

The biggest winner was naturally Ye Guyi. As she spread out the wings behind her back, she flickered across the sky like a bolt of lightning. Large numbers of avenging spirits were purified wherever her holy sword landed. As the winds of Spiritual Tempest blew through the area, Ye Guyi cleaned up after them.

The avenging spirits that were hit by Spiritual Tempest and the Snowy Dance of Ultimate Ice could not dodge or defend themselves against Ye Guyi. They could only wait for their vengeance to be purified.

The Myriad Soul Domain might be extremely powerful in the eyes of an average soul master. It could not only release tens of thousands of avenging spirits, but also enhance their power exponentially. However as strong as this skill might be, it would only work in Ye Guyi’s favor.

Huo Yuhao could sense with his spiritual detection that Ye Guyi’s cultivation was shooting up at an insane rate.

This could only be a result of the strength of the opponent she was facing. She was going up against a Titled Douluo evil soul master. In addition, he was the kind of soul master who accumulated avenging spirits. He was the perfect target for her to improve her cultivation.

Over the past few years, Ye Guyi had never used such a method to improve her cultivation. Her foundation had always been solid and stable. Hence, this was a golden opportunity for her to consume the power of a Titled Douluo. It was impossible for her abilities to not improve.

As her cultivation improved, the holy light she was emanating became stronger.

After being caught in the spiritual tempest, the Myriad Soul Douluo took seven to eight seconds before he regained his composure from his shock. But when he finally became calm again, he realized he had already come out of his martial soul true body. His Myriad Soul Banner’s color had become a lot fainter, and only the most powerful avenging spirits were left around him.

As for the Abomination Douluo, he was already pinned down by Er Bai. His back had been crushed, and a thick layer of dense ice had formed on his body.

How could he stand a chance against Er Bai after suffering from the spiritual tempest? This was like fighting a battle against a combination of a Transcendent Douluo who specialized in spiritual control and a Transcendent Douluo who specialized in assault. Even an evil soul master could not withstand such blows.





Volume 37, Chapter 536.2: The Eastern Sun Falls


However, Er Bai did not continue and kill the Abomination Douluo. Huo Yuhao had obviously ordered Er Bai to pin him down, but not kill him.

The Myriad Soul Douluo knew the battle was over. There was no point in him trying to fight a losing battle. As his figure flickered, he sent the remaining avenging spirits around him on a final onslaught. The mermaid avenging spirit released a series of loud howls as its powerful spiritual attack rippled from its body.

To protect his life, the Myriad Soul Douluo knew he had to sacrifice his avenging spirits to escape. He could always replenish his avenging spirits if they were to die. But if he were to lose his life, it would be the end for him.

His reactions were extremely quick, but why would Huo Yuhao not have thought of restraining him? He would not have left him there alone if he didn’t have the ability to control the situation.

Just as the Myriad Soul Douluo was retreating, he suddenly saw a strange eye in front of him. The humongous eye released a purplish-gold flash before his eyes.

Following which, the Myriad Soul Douluo felt as if a hammer which could have split the earth hit his head. After releasing a loud groan, his retreating body lost control and collapsed to the ground with a loud thud.

It was a spiritual shock from the martial soul true body version of the Eye of the Asura! The frighteningly powerful spiritual attack ensured the destruction of the Myriad Soul Douluo’s spiritual sea.

Because of the huge loss of his avenging spirits, the Myriad Soul Douluo had already suffered a drop in his cultivation. After sustaining this blow, he immediately lost consciousness.

The pure white holy light instantly transformed into a sharp sword which descended from the sky as though it was about to judge the evil beneath it. The sword stabbed straight into the chest of the Myriad Soul Douluo.

Following which, Ye Guyi’s body split from the holy sword. Afterwards, one could see copious amounts of grey energy current surging out from the chest of the Myriad Soul Douluo. While he was screaming in pain, he was unable to budge because he was pinned down by the holy sword.

The four wings behind Ye Guyi’s black glistened like white jade as golden streaks of energy raced into her body from the hilt of the holy sword.

Tonight’s battle was definitely a night full of rewards for this Soul Sage.

The Myriad Soul Douluo struggled for close to a minute before relenting. Finally, he transformed into black ash under the holy sword before vanishing. After breaking free from their master’s control, the remaining avenging spirits in the air were about to disperse and escape before they were stopped by Huo Yuhao’s spiritual power.

Ye Guyi immediately turned around to continue her attack. She took close to fifteen minutes before she was able to purify the bulk of the avenging spirits.

Among the avenging spirits, about a third of them were human. The rest of them were from soul beasts. While some of them were from the land, most of them were aquatic soul beasts.

In the end, Huo Yuhao ask Ye Guyi to spare the mermaid avenging spirit.

The spirit was putting up a fierce struggle against Huo Yuhao’s spiritual interference domain. Its once beautiful face was now twisted by rage and hatred.

Huo Yuhao let out a long sigh before chanting a purification spell.

Huo Yuhao’s purification was a level above Ye Guyi’s because he himself had inherited the power from Electrolux.

A white light shone down from the skies and onto the mermaid avenging spirit.

At that very instant, the spirit stopped struggling as streams of black energy current separated from its soul. The hatred and anger which were written all over its face started to slowly disappear. Gradually, all that remained on its face was melancholy.

Huo Yuhao released his spiritual power and attempted to establish contact with the mermaid. However, the mermaid spirit merely looked at him as it gently shook its head. Its eyes were brimming with sadness, but one could tell that it was a kind of sadness which one possessed after coming to terms with one’s predicament.

The mermaid nodded gently before opening her mouth to sing a melody.

At this moment, the battle within the city had ended. Bei Bei, Xu Sanshi and Ji Juechen were all coming back from different directions. However, they all heard the mermaid spirit’s singing.

Her singing was beautiful, but sorrowful. It sounded as though she was sobbing as she shared her tragic story of being captured by the evil soul master through her song. Her spirit started to release spots of white light during her singing. As her voice became brighter, her body started to become fainter.

Huo Yuhao sighed.

After all, she had already become an avenging spirit!

Even if he were to help her remove her vengeance, she was still unwilling to communicate with him. Nonetheless, her soul was purified, and she must be feeling a lot better now.

The mermaid’s singing lasted for a couple of minutes before diminishing to silence. As the last note was sung, everyone’s eyes were brimming with tears.

This mermaid spirit was particularly skilled in spiritual power. She was one of the strongest avenging spirits that the Myriad Soul Douluo had possessed. Now, during her last song, she was able to move everyone present.

The mermaid’s faint spiritual image turned around to face Huo Yuhao before bowing before him, as though she wanted to thank him for his help. Following which, a pale blue glow started to fly towards him. Once the glow started to move towards him, the spirit disintegrated into tiny white particles that vanished into thin air.

Huo Yuhao could sense the kindness from the mermaid spirit, and extended his hand to receive the blue light.

To his surprise, the blue light went through his palm before landing on his body. As the blue light enveloped him, Huo Yuhao felt as though he had been rinsed by warm water. He felt particularly refreshed, but nothing else other than that.

Huo Yuhao was confident that he would be able to detect any problems with his powerful spiritual energy if there were any. But from the way things looked, there didn’t seem to be any problem with the gift from the mermaid spirit.

The Abomination Douluo who was temporarily “spared” by Er Bai was naturally Huo Yuhao’s gift to Ye Guyi. Without hesitating, Ye Guyi moved over to finish him off with her holy sword.

The deaths of different evil soul masters gave her different degrees of improvement. Even though she gained a lot from the death of the Abomination Douluo, the power she gained was a lot less than what she had received from the Myriad Soul Douluo.

After putting her holy sword away, Ye Guti realized the holy fire that was burning around her body was almost beyond her control. Even Er Bai refused to be in close proximity to her.

“Thank you.” Ye Guyi thanked Huo Yuhao before walking straight to the spectral gate behind him. She had purified far too many avenging spirits, and her body was bursting with purified energy. She needed to train immediately to digest this energy, or it would be wasted.

The battle on the walls of the city was nearing its end. Under the combined attack of two hundred soul engineers, each at least a Soul Emperor, the resistance above the walls of the city was destroyed in no time. Even though they had tried to retaliate with their linked soul tools, which were controlled by fifty soul masters, their attack was very feeble, considering how they had to defend at the same time. They simply could not breach the linked defense set up by the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion.

The linked defense on the city wall was destroyed by the furious attacks of the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion.

However, He Caitou was saddened to see so many soul tools destroyed in the battle! They were all precious soul tools which were very valuable!

The large commotion at the city walls naturally attracted the attention of Eastern Sun City’s City Defense Army as they gravitated towards the walls. However, it was apparent that they would be of not much use. The Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion spread out in the air as they fired at the main road which led to the city walls. The series of shots completely cut off the road the army was about to take to provide reinforcement to the walls without taking too many lives. Otherwise, it would just be a one-sided massacre if the army were to actually come into direct conflict with the soul engineer legion.

Bei Bei moved towards Huo Yuhao and said, “Who would have known that there would be two evil Titled Douluo? Fortunately, we had the two of you to take them down.” Even though he was mainly expressing his gratitude towards Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, he was also expressing his amazement at the current strength of the Tang Sect.

Even though he hadn’t managed to witness the full battle earlier, he could tell that Tang Wutong and Huo Yuhao had won the battle fairly easily from their composed expressions.

The two of them were authentic Titled Douluo, and yet they could not put up a fight against Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong. In fact, Huo Yuhao was even able to control the situation, and allow Ye Guyi to improve her cultivation. Compared to the battle at Oak City which had a few unexpected incidents, things went pretty smoothly this time. This exemplified how strong the Tang Sect had become.

After the past few battles, everyone, including Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, had a brand new understanding of their own abilities. Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong could probably put up a fight against the Heavenly Sun Douluo—who was a Rank 97 Transcendent Douluo!

The advantage of using martial soul fusion skills on their top-class martial souls was becoming increasingly apparent as Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong became stronger. At the same time, the gap between them and their peers was also becoming larger. Without the Qiankun Fortune Pills, the gap between them would probably have been larger.

“Senior brother, clear up the battlefield!” Huo Yuhao ordered He Caitou. This was He Caitou’s favourite part of the battle.

Following which, Huo Yuhao first located the equipment which was connected to the nearby aerial surveillance soul tools before shutting the surveillance soul tools down and bringing them in. Afterwards, he chanted his incantations to open a spectral gate and release the remaining two legions.

Of course, the soul engineers came out of the spectral demiplane without their soul tools. After all, the dismantling work only required human labor.

The battle at Eastern Sun City was different from the one back at the Ming Dou Mountain Range. Here, at the biggest city in the northern region of the Sun Moon Empire, Huo Yuhao and the others did not have to flee right after they attacked as they did at the Ming Dou Mountain Range. Even if news of their attack spread to other troops, it would take a long time for reinforcements to arrive. Thus, they could plunder the city at will.





Volume 37, Chapter 536.3: The Eastern Sun Falls


He Caitou led the way as he dismantled every single possible soul tool in the area and brought them back into the spectral demiplane. In fact, he even led the soul engineers to the top of the city wall to scavenge rare metal bits from the ruins.

The sky had started to turn bright by the time they had finished dismantling and packing everything up.

The troops who were planning to attack Huo Yuhao and the others were also fairly rational. They knew they were unable to compete against the soul engineer legions, and hence they merely surrounded the area while they waited patiently for the reinforcements they had called for.

The mission was not over after clearing the area of any remaining soul tools. It was now the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion’s turn to perform.

Eastern Sun City’s seven storehouses were plundered by the legions as they transported large amounts of resources, especially food, into the spectral demiplane.

While Oak City was already considered a huge granary, it was nothing compared to Eastern Sun City. If the food in Oak City was to be compared to a small mountain, the food in Eastern Sun City could be an entire mountain range. In fact, the granary in Eastern Sun City had several special products from the Ice Sea, such as the skin of aquatic soul beasts, etc. There were plenty of resources and money for the legions to plunder.

It was only in the afternoon on the next day when the plundering operation ended. The thirty thousand soldiers were pinned down near the northern city gate by the Fort Soul Engineer Legion until the entire operation ended. Afterwards, the Fort Soul Engineer Legion left the city and headed north.

This operation affected more than just Eastern Sun City. It affected the entire northern region of the Sun Moon Empire.

The newly acquired resources had exceeded the two storehouses built within the spectral demiplane. They had no choice but to erect another two additional storehouses to contain them.

Right from the beginning of their mission, Huo Yuhao had never told the three legions to bring many rations. Their strategy was to fuel the next fight with their plunder from the previous fight.

The rations which they had plundered from these two cities was already sufficient for them to survive for three to five years without any worries.

The group of cultivators from the Tang Sect gathered on top of a small knoll in the spectral demiplane.

Huo Yuhao sighed and said, “It seems like we have underestimated the Sun Moon Empire!”

“What do you mean?” Jiang Nannan asked curiously.

Huo Yuhao said, “Actually, our initial predictions were correct. The number of troops stationed in the northern part of the Sun Moon Empire was actually very limited. In fact, they were not viewed with much importance. Nonetheless, we still faced relatively strong resistance from them. If we had not planned for an unprepared foe, we might not have won so easily, especially with the number of soul tools they had. Hence, we must be extra careful with our subsequent operations. Also, after our two victories, I am certain the Sun Moon Empire will be responding with some sort of plan. Thus, we must be even more unpredictable with our next move in order to achieve the best effect.”

Bei Bei nodded and said, “Yuhao is correct. Our biggest advantage is this spectral demiplane. We are only able to move faster than any other troops because of it. In fact, we can probably appear at any corner of the continent within three days. Even if we can only launch a single shell at the enemy and flee, we can still achieve our objective. We must remember to not get entangled in a battle with our enemies. Yuhao, didn’t you want to take a walk in the Ice Sea?”

Huo Yuhao nodded and said, “Yes, I’m about to go and take a look. Hopefully, I will be able to leave with some takeaways. In the meantime, I need everyone to remain in the spectral demiplane. Regardless of the outcome of my trip to the Ice Sea, I will immediately head to the southern parts of the Sun Moon Empire. By shifting our attack from the north to the south, they will be completely lost as to where exactly we plan to strike. This will be a perfect way to cause panic in their backlines.”

Xu Sanshi frowned and said, “But the problem is that we don’t really know how we’re doing at the frontlines. If we can find out what’s going on there, we might be able to strike at the Sun Moon Empire more effectively.”

Bei Bei replied, “We shouldn’t be too greedy about these things. It’s already incredible for us to achieve what we have done. At least for now, the entire northern part of the Sun Moon Empire is a mess because of the food shortage we’ve created. The Sun Moon Empire must devote resources and attention to solving this problem. At the same time, they will have to try and uncover our tracks. I am sure this will help our friends at the frontline. Once we expand the range of our operations, I am certain that the Sun Moon Empire will become even more chaotic, and when that happens, they will have no choice but to retreat.”

Xu Sanshi asked, “Little junior brother, do you need me to follow you to the Ice Sea? I’m better with water. Judging from the camp the Sun Moon Empire had set up here, the aquatic soul beasts in the Ice Sea might cause you some problems. You need to be careful.”

Huo Yuhao replied, “You can rest assured, senior brother! Even in the worst case scenario, Wutong and I should be able to retreat safely. Don’t forget, I have an Ultimate Ice martial soul. I do have a big advantage up here in the extreme north. If I need any help, I will summon all of you.”

Xu Sanshi did not bug Yuhao any longer. After all, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were already a level above them in terms of fighting ability.

Ji Juechen, who had been keeping quiet at the side, suddenly asked, “Yuhao, when can we spar?” He had finally asked the question that had been on his mind for the longest period of time.

Just now during the battle, he did not face any formidable foes, but saw how Huo Yuhao was able to play around with the two evil soul masters. As a sparring maniac, how could he resist the temptation to ask Huo Yuhao to spar with him?

Huo Yuhao looked at him helplessly before replying, “Brother Ji, let’s talk about it some other time. For now, can I get everyone to go and get some rest? We will head to the Ice Sea after finishing our preparations.”

He did not want to spar with Ji Juechen now. Ji Juechen’s sword intent was no joke. Even if he were confident in his abilities, he still had to put in a hundred percent in order to beat Ji Juechen. Huo Yuhao did not want to waste energy on sparring right now. He still had plenty of work to do.

Ji Juechen frowned as he looked towards the other people around him.

Immediately, Bei Bei walked away and sat down before beginning his meditation. Xu Sanshi looked up at the sky as he whistled and strolled away with Jiang Nannan.

He Caitou smiled awkwardly at Ji Juechen before saying, “Don’t look at me. I’m a soul engineer, so I won’t be a good sparring partner for you. Actually, Ye Guyi should be a good partner. Her cultivation must have improved a lot after the previous battle. Why don’t you spar with her once she’s done with digesting the newly acquired energy?”

Ye Guyi was currently cultivating in the storehouse, and soul engineers had been stationed there to protect her.

Ji Juechen sighed in despair.

Why is it so hard to find someone to spar with?!

Everyone was now avoiding him. He improved the most from finding inspiration in his sparring or battles with strong opponents. It was not sufficient for him to train alone. No one desired a strong opponent more than him.

Then, someone whom no one had expected stood up.

“Why don’t I give it a try?” The voice was tender, but one could still detect a tinge of competitiveness in it.

Ji Juechen turned around, and was surprised to find out who had accepted his challenge.

The voice belonged to a female! But the person was not Tang Wutong—the strongest female soul master among them. She was also neither Jiang Nannan nor Ye Guyi. The person was also not Nan Qiuqiu, who was getting ready to watch the performance before her eyes. She was none other than Xiao Xiao—the one among Shrek’s Seven Monsters who rarely showed her abilities.

Yes, the person who stood up and agreed to spar with Ji Juechen was none other than Xiao Xiao.

The first person who expressed his shock was He Caitou. He frantically asked, “Xiao Xiao, what are you doing? Are you crazy? How could you challenge Juechen? His sword intent is not something he can control properly.”

Xiao Xiao glared angrily at him and said, “Why do you have such little confidence in me? Or are you just a chauvinist by heart?”

“Uhmmm…” He Caitou was lost for words after hearing her words. He was simply too doting towards her. Even though he might be really busy all the time, he was never stingy on the care and affection he had shown for Xiao Xiao. This also resulted in a lack of opportunities for Xiao Xiao to get her hands dirty.

The truth was that even though Xiao Xiao gave off the vibes of a little girl—especially among Shrek’s Seven Monsters—she was actually a little older than Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong. In fact, the three of them had won the freshman competition together when they had just entered Shrek Academy.

Subsequently, she once again showed her abilities in the Continental Elite Youth Soul Master Tournament.

But after that time, Xiao Xiao rarely had the opportunity to spar and showcase her abilities. Even He Caitou did not know exactly how strong she had become.

Ji Juechen stared at Xiao Xiao, but he did not belittle her because of her size. Instead, his eyes showed the respect and wariness he had for any challenger.

Xiao Xiao stood there plainly, but did not seem to reveal any flaws in her stance.

Jue Jichen was an expert at finding flaws in an enemy’s stance. Once the enemy revealed a flaw, he or she would face the wrath of his torrential attacks.

However, Xiao Xiao seemed to have blended in with her surroundings. She was simply not exhibiting any flaws at all.

Xiao Xiao stared at Ji Juechen before announcing, “Brother Ji, can I challenge you?”

Ji Juechen hesitated a while before looking at Huo Yuhao, who was standing by the side.

Huo Yuhao nodded without any hesitation.

While the others might belittle Xiao Xiao, Huo Yuhao would never do so. A year ago, Xiao Xiao had already gained her own spirit with Huo Yuhao’s help. Besides, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong would never forget her true abilities.

Huo Yuhao was not the only control system soul master among the new generation of Shrek’s Seven Monsters. Xiao Xiao was the other one.

However, she had taken a different path from Huo Yuhao. Huo Yuhao had chosen to focus on controlling and attacking, whereas Xiao Xiao chose to dedicate her training to controlling and defending.

The rationale for these two different focuses was because of Huo Yuhao’s twin martial souls. His Spirit Eyes would focus on controlling, while the Ice Jade Empress Scorpion would focus on attacking.





Volume 37, Chapter 537.1: Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute


What about Xiao Xiao? In fact, she also possessed twin martial souls! Yes, Xiao Xiao, the girl who usually kept a low profile, was a soul master with twin martial souls. Among Shrek’s Seven Monsters, she was the third person, other than Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, who had twin martial souls. They were the cream of the crop among the new students of Shrek Academy back then.

Even though Xiao Xiao rarely sparred with anyone, that did not mean she was weak. Under the powerful effects of the Qiankun Fortune Pill, her cultivation had improved tremendously. Also, she was the direct disciple of Elder Xuan, who was an actual Ultimate Douluo! If he was willing to hand his teachings over to Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, why would he not teach his final disciple?

Hence, amongst everyone present, Huo Yuhao was undoubtedly the person who had the most confidence in her.

Seeing how Huo Yuhao had given his consent, Ji Juechen said, “Alright, let’s do it then.”

He Caitou became anxious as he tried to grab Xiao Xiao’s arm. “Xiao Xiao, you shouldn’t! This is too dangerous. What am I going to do if something bad happens to you?”

Xiao Xiao replied casually, “Then go and find another person!”

He Caitou was angered by her words. “What do you mean by ‘find another person’? I only want you. Besides, you have already done that to me. You must take responsibility.”

His words hit everyone like a bolt from the blue. After hearing He Caitou’s words, Xu Sanshi immediately pulled Jiang Nannan back as they returned to listen to the juicy gossip.

Bei Bei’s eyes also widened in disbelief, while Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong looked at Xiao Xiao with a surprised expression.

Xiao Xiao immediately became the center of attention. She started blushing as she glared at He Caitou in a vicious manner. “Can you not spout rubbish? You’re spoiling my spiritual state. You’re going to be responsible if I lose later. And stop asking weird questions like who will be responsible for you and who did what with you. If you continue to ask stupid questions like that, I will ignore you.”

After seeing Xiao Xiao blush, He Caitou frantically said, “How can you fight against Juechen when you’re so flustered now? Come, let’s go and cultivate by the side to calm your mind and heart down.”

As he spoke, he was about to pull Xiao Xiao away.

However, his pull was ineffective. Xiao Xiao’s feet seemed to be rooted to the ground. Of course, He Caitou would not use his real strength to pull her away. However, he could sense the determination in her to spar with Ji Juechen.

As he lowered his head to look at her, he was surprised by the look on her face.

Xiao Xiao’s eyes had grown calm, and the flustered look on her face had disappeared. What was left was a look of calmness and determination.

“Xiao Xiao, you…”

“Caitou.” Xiao Xiao’s voice was very gentle. “I know you treat me well and are afraid that I will get hurt. I understand how you feel towards me. But you must know that I will not only become your wife in the future. At the same time, I will still be a member of Shrek’s Seven Monsters! All these years, I have seen how Yuhao has fought countless battles in the north and the south. All of you have also been busy with projects within the Tang Sect. But what about me? Under your protection, I have been like a bird who is unable to spread her wings. I know you care for me and dote on me. But I do not want to be a flower in a greenhouse. And I have the abilities to not be a flower in a greenhouse. I can stay strong without your protection. I am not just your lover and partner. In times of war, I can be your companion who can fight alongside you and help everyone.”

“I have never cut myself any slack on my training in all these years. And I train hard because I want to help everyone on the battlefield. But all of you have subconsciously excluded me from any dangerous or challenging tasks. I want this to stop, and I want to prove to all of you that I, Xiao Xiao, also possess the ability to become a true member of Shrek’s Seven Monsters. So please don’t stop me, Caitou! Let me prove it to you, alright?”

Xiao Xiao’s words silenced everyone as they started to ask themselves if that was truly the case. Jiang Nannan empathized with her words most strongly. Other than Tang Wutong, she was the only female among Shrek’s Seven Monsters along with Xiao Xiao. Even though Tang Wutong was able to fight alongside Huo Yuhao and had experienced so much, both Jiang Nannan and Xiao Xiao were always living under the care and protection of everyone else.

Hence, after hearing Xiao Xiao’s words, which resonated strongly in her heart, she let go of Xu Sanshi’s hand and walked towards Xiao Xiao. “Xiao Xiao, I support you.”

Xiao Xiao held Jiang Nannan’s hand and smiled. She was truly beautiful.

He Caitou was a little dazed after staring at her beautiful smile. It took him a while before he shook it off and revealed an understanding smile. He sighed before saying, “I am sorry, Xiao Xiao. I must have neglected your feelings.”

Xiao Xiao let go of Jiang Nannan’s hand before walking towards He Caitou. She actually dove into his embrace in front of everyone. “No, Caitou. I am really fortunate and blissful to have you. To be honest, I actually hesitated back then when I chose you. But afterwards, I understood how right I was to have chosen you. Caitou, I really enjoy receiving the care and concern you have for me. But I am so sad to see how hard you work every day. I really want to help you.”

He Caitou hugged her tightly as he stared at her lovingly.

Ji Juechen, who had been standing by the side, suddenly slapped his forehead and muttered, “Why do I suddenly feel like I’m the antagonist of this show?”

After hearing his words, everyone burst into laughter.

Bei Bei smiled and replied, “Brother Ju, you are truly the biggest antagonist in our Tang Sect. Who asked you to challenge people to fights every day?”

Ji Juechen sighed, “I don’t really have a choice. In order to improve, I must find people to spar with. I am terribly sorry if I have inconvenienced you. But I will not change my ways, and will continue to challenge all of you to fights.”

“Then bring it on.” Xiao Xiao escaped from He Caitou’s embrace, and her eyes were already burning with her desire to win.

Ji Juechen nodded and said, “Xiao Xiao, I will not go easy on you because you’re a girl.”

“Who needs you to go easy on me? We don’t even know who will be victorious yet.” As she spoke, she moved to a position that placed her moderately far away from Ji Juechen and opposite him.

Now, no one would stop them from sparring. They slowly moved back to give them space.

Tang Wutong whispered into Huo Yuhao’s ear. “If Xiao Xiao loses, it will be my turn next, okay?”

Huo Yuhao smiled. “Are you itching to get into a battle after dealing with the two evil soul masters?”

Tang Wutong waved her little fist in front of Huo Yuhao and said, “Nope. I just want you men to know that us ladies are not that easy to bully. We are not weaker than men.”

Huo Yuhao smiled. “Why do I have the feeling that I am your real target instead of Brother Ji?”

Tang Wutong raised her head and replied, “If I were to challenge you to a duel, would you accept it?”

Huo Yuhao was shocked. “You’re not being serious, right?”

Tang Wutong replied, “Why not? Yuhao, don’t you feel like you can’t find your own limits after our previous closed-door cultivation? It’s bad for us to not be able to accurately determine how strong we are. We will not be able to decide on the most effective way to deal with our enemies. Actually, Brother Ji’s cultivation method has many areas that are worth learning from. Regardless of what abilities we possess, we are only able to truly understand those abilities by sparring and exercising them.”

Huo Yuhao mulled over her words before saying, “What you say makes sense. But I don’t think I can get myself to attack you…”

Tang Wutong burst into laughter and said, “Don’t worry. I’ll go easy on you.”

“Are you so certain that you can beat me?” Huo Yuhao asked with raised eyebrows.

“Of course,” Tang Wutong answered proudly, “Don’t forget I’m already a Titled Douluo, while you’re still a Soul Douluo.”

“But I also have a soul core,” Huo Yuhao replied, “this makes me pretty similar to a Titled Douluo!”

Tang Wutong said, “If you don’t agree with me, you can always challenge me!”

Huo Yuhao said, “So be it. Let’s do it after Xiao Xiao and Brother Ji are done.”

During their conversation, the way they stared into each other’s eyes seemed as though they were about to launch into a brawl. But it only stayed that way for a short while before both of them burst into laughter.

Yes! No matter what, they would never really fight with one another. Nonetheless, both of them were still fairly competitive. In fact, they were both really excited at the prospect of sparring with one another. It was exactly because they understood each other so well that they could not be certain who would emerge victorious.

Ji Juechen and Xiao Xiao faced each other and, without communicating, both of them took a few steps back. Since it was a proper spar, it had to be fair. Both of them retreated until there were about fifty meters between them. Xiao Xiao specialized in mid-range combat, while Ji Juechen was most adept at close quarters. If the distance was too far, it would not be fair to Ji Juechen. If it were too close, it would be unfair to Xiao Xiao.

Fifty meters was just nice for both of them. Both Ji Juechen and Xiao Xiao stood upright and stared at each other. Xiao Xiao once again radiated a calm aura, as though she was becoming one with her surroundings.

This time, Ji Juechen was not the only one who felt that Xiao Xiao’s abilities were unpredictable. Even her other companions could sense it.

Bei Bei could not help but nod.

That’s right! Regardless of whether it’s Xiao Xiao or Jiang Nannan, all of us have grown a lot. Even they are no longer little girls who everyone needs to protect. They can all take on the world themselves.

Xiao Xiao’s soul rings started to rise from her feet. Her first soul ring was yellow, but the subsequent ones were all black. All seven of her rings hung quietly around her as a flute appeared in her hands. The first martial soul which she released was not her main martial soul, the Threelives Soulcrush Cauldron, but her second martial soul—the Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute.





Volume 37, Chapter 537.2: Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute


Xiao Xiao waved her Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute, and her seven soul rings were drawn by the motion of the flute, and contracted before falling onto it.

Ji Juechen, who was standing opposite her, unsheathed his Judgement Sword. Just as he had said, he would not go easy on his opponents because of their gender.

Ji Juechen revealed a determined look on his face as he wielded his sword with both hands. As he pointed the tip of the sword to the ground, he was able to conceal his aura. At that very instant, everyone could sense that his life energy had disappeared. Even though he was standing right in front of them, it was as if he was not there at all. Even Huo Yuhao, who possessed incredibly powerful spiritual energy, could not detect him.

Even though they were not able to sense his presence, they could sense the energy from his sword. The Judgement Sword might not be reflecting any light, but it gave off the impression of a volcano that was about to erupt at any moment.

Xiao Xiao had never once sparred with Ji Juechen. This time, she finally experienced the immense pressure that one would have to face by standing before this sword fanatic. No wonder no one wanted to spar with him. His sword intent was simply out of this world.

Before making her move, Xiao Xiao already felt as though her entire person was imprisoned within a huge sword. And within the huge sword, there seemed to be hundreds and thousands of smaller swords which threatened to shred her to pieces.

What a powerful sword intent! Is this how it feels to go up against the sword of the sword fanatic?

At that instant, Xiao Xiao emanated a mysterious glow. Her small figure suddenly gave off an impressive aura which resembled that of a humongous mountain.

At that moment, it seemed as though her body could decide the fate of her country. Even Ji Juechen’s incredibly powerful sword intent was shattered when it reached a distance of ten meters from her. Xiao Xiao’s body was enveloped by a black glow which contained countless runes.

Ji Juechen almost lost his balance after his sword intent was shattered.

His face twitched a little after realizing what had just happened. He was seldom caught off-guard—even when he faced Huo Yuhao. He had toned down his sword intent, and no longer released it overtly.

Yes, Xiao Xiao had actually won their opening battle, in which Ji Juechen had pitted his sword intent against her aura!

Xiao Xiao’s aura could only be described as overwhelming!

It could overwhelm people, and even overwhelm the destiny and aura of a country. That was the power of the cauldron. The true cauldron could suppress and overwhelm any aura!

Hence, regardless of how powerful the opponent’s aura was, there was only one possible outcome. Their aura would be overwhelmed and suppressed by the cauldron. Hence, Xiao Xiao was near invincible when it came to comparing the strength of one’s aura. That was the mystical power of the Threelives Soulcrush Cauldron.

Despite releasing her Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute, Xiao Xiao used the power of her Threelives Soulcrush Cauldron. This showed that she had developed incredible control over two martial souls.

At this very instant, her eyes brightened like shiny stars as she released a frightening amount of spiritual power.

Just when Ji Juechen was trying to find his balance, she started blowing her Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute.

A sad but melodic tune started to emerge from the end of her flute. The air around them started to become very viscous. The first soul ring on Xiao Xiao’s flute started to sparkle as its glow pulsed. The viscous air appeared to have been saturated by boundless fluid. Even the people who were spectating from the outside felt weighed down by the “heavy” air around them.

Delay! It was the first technique of the Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute.

Even though it was exactly the same technique, its power was already completely different from what it was the last time she had showed it to the group.

Back then, when Xiao Xiao executed this skill against her opponent, it could only slightly delay her opponent’s movements. But now, her soul skill was actually capable of making people struggle to move.

Ji Juechen stood there without moving. His aura might have been suppressed by Xiao Xiao previously, but he chose not to move even when he was up against her Delay. Since he was not moving, the soul skill did not affect him much.

Xiao Xiao’s eyes remained focused on Ji Juechen as she changed the flute’s melody.

The melancholic tune suddenly became gentle and bright. As the new tune emerged from the flute, one could see ripples of jade-green light emanating from Xiao Xiao’s body. These ripples were like circles of thread which expanded towards Ji Juechen as they attempted to entangle him.

Initially, they appeared to just be circles of light, but when they got closer to Ji Juechen, they suddenly solidified to become material. They seemed to be like rings which were trying to bind and trap him.

Nonetheless, Ji Juechen chose to stay where he was. But just when the rings were about to ensnare him, they shattered to bits and pieces and fell to the ground. They were unable to restrict him at all.

The Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute’s second soul skill—Binding Ring!

This soul skill could be executed in a simple or complex fashion. It possessed a powerful binding ability, but its powers seemed to have lost their effect when they came into contact with Ji Juechen’s sword intent.

Xiao Xiao’s face did not reveal any emotional change after witnessing the disintegration of her binding rings. She carried on with her flute playing as more rings started to gravitate towards Ji Juechen. Other than this, she did not seem to be casting any other soul skill. It appeared that she was hoping to drag the battle on in this manner.

After witnessing what Xiao Xiao was doing, Huo Yuhao nodded from the side of the sparring area. Xiao Xiao’s strategy was sound. By suppressing Ji Juechen’s aura with her advantage right from the start, Ji Juechen was unable to increase the power and range of his aura.

Aura was an extremely important component within Ji Juechen’s sword intent. If his aura were to be increased to its maximum, his attack would become incredibly piercing and penetrating. What Xiao Xiao was doing now was dragging out the battle to expend his soul power and determination.

It was important to note that Xiao Xiao’s soul power was not weaker than Ji Juechen’s. Even though Ji Juechen was almost at Rank 90, his martial soul was just a normal martial soul. He had only become strong because of his unique understanding of sword intent and the Judgement Sword—a powerful Class 8 soul tool—which he wielded.

Compared to Ji Juechen, Xiao Xiao possessed twin martial souls. Her second martial soul had seven rings, and that would only strengthen her first martial soul. Even though her total amount of soul power might be less than Ji Juechen’s, it was only slightly less. Besides, the possession of a strong martial soul would allow a soul master to recover more quickly. When it came to this, Xiao Xiao definitely had an advantage. Hence, even though it seemed unwise for her to drag the battle out, it was actually a good move. Ji Juechen had no chance to showcase the explosiveness of his sword intent.

If he were to force his sword intent towards Xiao Xiao, he would expose himself to her attacks. In fact, as of now, Xiao Xiao did not have any flaws or gaps which he could take advantage of. Hence, Ji Juechen seemed to be at a disadvantage currently.

As their battle wore on, everyone held their breath as they waited for the next event to unfold.

Ji Juechen’s soul rings were unspectacular—they were just the ordinary soul rings. Nonetheless, he seemed very calm and collected as he stood still where he was. It was as though there was nothing in this world which he needed to be concerned about.

Even though Xiao Xiao looked like a girl who would be flustered easily, she was similarly calm and collected. She might not appear to have frozen still like Ji Juechen, but she was still very stable and relaxed, as though everything was under her control. She continued to apply pressure on Ji Juechen, keeping him from releasing his aura.

Bei Bei, He Caitou and Xu Sanshi revealed expressions of disbelief. They were certain that they might not be able to face Ji Juechen with this amount of composure!

Xiao Xiao, have you really become this strong?

Jiang Nannan clenched her fists as she rooted for Xiao Xiao in her heart. She was especially happy to see her showcase her true abilities.

Very quickly, five minutes passed. Both of them were still in their original positions. If they were to continue in this fashion, it would probably take close to a day before they would finish expending all of their soul power.

Ji Juechen frowned as he looked at the situation before him. This was not the feeling he wanted. He would have preferred his opponent to pressure him directly. Instead, Xiao Xiao was using her binding rings to harass him. He felt as though he was sinking into a marsh instead of fighting a fearsome battle. However, he was unable to detect any flaws or gaps in his opponent’s defence. If he were to strike haphazardly, he would expose himself to her.

However, he knew it was definitely disadvantageous for him to drag the battle on like this!

If there’s no gap or hole in your defence, I shall find one, or even create one! So what if there’s a hole in my defence? Let’s see who will strike first!

After making up his mind, Ji Juechen suddenly took a step forward with his left foot before stamping violently on the ground.

The silence stopped instantly as an unbelievably sharp sword intent formed from Ji Juechen’s body. The sword intent was greyish black, and its sudden appearance shattered all of the binding rings which had just been released by the Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute. That powerful sword intent flew away from Ji Juechen and zoomed towards Xiao Xiao. In the blink of an eye, it was already right in front of her, and was ready to tear her apart.

However, the moment Ji Juechen made his move, Xiao Xiao had already reacted to it. The flute in her hands suddenly released a piercing howl.

Following which, her body became illusory as she split in two. Even though the sword intent had locked onto her, it went straight through her illusory figure, and did not harm her at all. After that, it was Xiao Xiao’s time to retaliate.

Right after the greyish black sword intent passed through her, a jade-green image flew out of the Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute and reached Ji Juechen almost instantly.





Volume 37, Chapter 537.3: Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute


Ji Juechen slashed the Judgement Sword upwards, and a formidable sword aura steamrolled towards the image of the jade-green phoenix.

The sword aura seemed to embody justice as it collided head-on with the green phoenix. However, the unexpected happened. Instead of shattering, the green phoenix magically melted and flowed along the sides of the sword aura as it continued to travel towards Ji Juechen.

That’s right. It flowed like a fluid before the green phoenix splashed onto Ji Juechen’s body.

At this juncture, everyone had started to gain a better appreciation of the situation.

Even though Xiao Xiao could not match Ji Juechen, she was probably not too far away from him. There was also an additional reason why she dared to challenge him today. It was because he was not familiar with her.

In fact, not many people within Tang Sect knew what soul skills Xiao Xiao possessed.

After witnessing this Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute’s soul skills, Bei Bei, Xu Sanshi and the rest were all surprised.

What is this soul skill? It seems like it’s going to be very difficult to get away from the green light.

Ji Juechen definitely experienced the difficulty firsthand.

When he first saw the jade-green phoenix fly towards him, he thought that this would be an attack-type soul skill. However, he knew his guess was wrong the moment the sword aura pierced through the jade-green phoenix.

He expected his sharp sword aura to shatter the phoenix upon contact. However, the soul skill did not end with its shattering. In fact, it had been agitated.

The stream of jade-green light, which was very much like a viscous fluid, landed on Ji Juechen’s body instantly. It seemed to have been drawn to his sword aura. However, Ji Juechen knew that it was only drawn to him because Xiao Xiao had locked it onto him. Otherwise, it would not have come straight to him.

As the jade-green light melted into his body, he felt his entire body become heavier. It was as though he had just put on a thousand-pound suit of armor, and had lost all of his agility.

In fact, he even realized that his blood flow and soul power had become sluggish. It was as though his entire person had become very sluggish and slow.

What a powerful soul skill! What exactly is it?

This was a question which only Xiao Xiao could answer. Its name was Phoenix Seal—a sealing technique from the Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute.

This soul skill was very powerful because of how indestructible it was. Unless it was obliterated on all fronts, it was practically unstoppable. Once it came into contact with an opponent, he or she would be in serious trouble. The jade-green Phoenix Seal would stick itself to the person like cotton candy. It would require an unreal amount of soul power to dissolve. Xiao Xiao had been trying to expend Ji Juechen’s soul power right from the beginning. Now that her seal had landed on him, it would only accelerate the rate at which he was forced to burn his soul power.

After landing the seal on Ji Juechen’s body successfully, Xiao Xiao was over the moon, and the tune which she was blowing with her flute became even more melodic.

Warm halos were now being released from the Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute. These halos transformed into jade-green phoenixes as they flew towards Ji Juechen.

What a remarkable control-type soul skill!

Everyone thought to themselves as they marvelled at Xiao Xiao’s technique. Xiao Xiao’s Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute could have been equipped with attacking-type soul skills. But from the looks of the soul skills which she had executed, all of them seemed to be control-type. This also meant that she had dedicated her entire second martial soul to control-type soul skills. It was apparent that she chose to do this for the team.

As an owner of twin martial souls, her Threelives Soulcrush Cauldron was already a defense-type control-type martial soul. If she were to only care about herself, she could have dedicated her second martial soul to attacking-type soul skills. This would have made her a more balanced soul master.

But Xiao Xiao did not choose to do that. Instead, she chose to focus purely on control-type soul skills on her second martial soul. This was a team-oriented decision. Because her boyfriend—He Caitou—was already skilled in attacking-type soul skills, it would make perfect sense for her to focus on control-type skills to complement him, and improve their overall fighting power.

At this instant, Ji Juechen’s eyes suddenly brightened. He knew very well what kind of predicament he was in. Since Xiao Xiao did not stop releasing the phoenix seals, this meant that the effects of her seals could be compounded.

While he remained there, Ji Juechen’s aura suddenly changed. An indescribably sharp aura suddenly surged out from his body.

At that very instant, even the light from his Judgement Sword was covered by the aura surging out from him. Ji Juechen had transformed into a long sword with an unparalleled aura exploding from his body.

Xiao Xiao’s eyes were blurred by the sudden outburst of Ji Juechen’s aura. Following which, Ji Juechen made his move. Countless sword auras surged from his body as though they were gushing out from every pore. A faint green energy was also ejected from his body along with the sword auras. The first phoenix seal had been broken.

Ji Juechen lifted the Judgement Sword as though he was conducting the millions of sword auras which had been released from his body. Immediately, they formed a powerful wave which swept towards Xiao Xiao.

The greyish black sword auras were like a hurricane which swept across the ground that separated Xiao Xiao and Ji Juechen. The jade-green phoenixes which stood in the way of the huge hurricane were instantly shattered as they vanished into thin air.

Ji Juechen was able to turn the tables in a single move. Also, he was able to lock on his aura onto Xiao Xiao.

Xiao Xiao’s face was visibly paler. She could no longer sense her energy from Ji Juechen’s body. Naturally, her methods would no longer be effective on him. Instead, she felt an unparalleled murderous intent from him.

This murderous intent did not have a material form, but Xiao Xiao was certain that it existed. At that very instant, she felt as though every single pore on her body had been shut by the killing intent exhibited by Ji Juechen. The effect of the intent was so strong that her flute playing stopped momentarily.

Following which, Ji Juechen made his move. He flew towards Xiao Xiao at lightning speed like a sharp sword tearing up the sky.

This was Executioner’s Blade—Ji Juechen’s most commonly used ability. It was a soul skill which he had invented by himself. This soul skill was often able to create miracles during battles, and had an attacking power that was unparalleled by other soul masters on his level.

Xiao Xiao was startled by the sight before her, but she did not step back. This was undoubtedly a wise decision. She stopped playing the Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute, and instead she waved it in the air as though it were a short baton. After waving her flute, her delicate body once again became illusory. It was apparent that she had used the same soul skill which she had used to avoid Ji Juechen’s previous attack.

Phoenix Substitution!

In addition, the seventh soul ring on the Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute also started to shine.

As the Executioner’s Blade collided with its target, once again, it only managed to slash at Xiao Xiao’s illusory figure. The most powerful thing about the Phoenix Substitution was its ability to allow its user to break free from a lock on by his or her opponent. Even Ji Juechen’s sword intent could not strike Xiao Xiao.

However, this time round, Ji Juechen was attacking with his own body. Hence, he stopped right next to Xiao Xiao’s real body after destroying the illusory figure.

The Judgement Sword’s light became more intense as dense black energy instantly surged around it. As Ji Juechen released his fearsome sword aura, the air around it started to crack and shatter.

Ji Juechen knew that no soul skill could be continuously executed without stopping. Hence, he launched his attack precisely at the moment when Xiao Xiao was no longer able to use her Phoenix Substitution to evade his attack.

However, something unexpected happened.

Xiao Xiao’s body transformed into a streak of green light before melting into the Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute. Following which, the flute released a bright phoenix screech as it opened its own humongous pair of green wings and transformed into a flying green phoenix.

At the same time, a large green ring descended from the sky and bound Ji Juechen’s body. Even though it was shattered almost immediately by Ji Juechen’s dominating sword aura, it gave the green phoenix sufficient time to fly away.

The green phoenix was actually the Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute’s martial soul true body!

Once again, Xiao Xiao was able to surprise her peers with her soul skills.

The flying green phoenix extended its wings before flapping them intensely as the sixth soul ring on its body started to glow. Following which, a green light descended from the sky.

These green shadows looked like pillars from afar. However, once they landed, everyone realized that they were replicas of the Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute. Every single one of them had been magnified by at least ten times. The carvings of the nine phoenixes on it were particularly delicate.

After landing on the ground, those pillars became frozen, as though they were structures which had been there all along.

Ji Juechen’s body was originally poised to chase after Xiao Xiao. However, after the pillars landed, he found that he could not move.

Phoenix Pillars!

This was her sixth soul skill!

The effect of these pillars was incredibly strong. After the skill was executed, there seemed to be an incredible attraction wherever the pillars covered. This force of attraction was not gravity, but sound waves. It was an unbelievably strong sound wave which was similar to the cry of a phoenix. The sound wave exploded from bottom to top within the regions where the pillars lined themselves up. Every single pillar was producing a deafening sound wave which could cause a person to lose his or her concentration. If a weaker cultivator were to find himself within the pillars, he would probably have been shattered by the sound waves.

As the green phoenix in the sky flapped its wings again, the sound waves released by the phoenix pillars grew in intensity. If one were to pay attention to them, one would notice faint ripples in the air.

Attacking with sound waves was the Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute’s true trump card. All its previous soul skills used sound waves, but their use was not as apparent as the Phoenix Pillars.

This time around, Ji Juechen was truly bound by the sound waves, as his body trembled under their effect. The sound waves were everywhere, and there was no chance of evading them. It was the first time he was going up against an attack like this, and he could not adapt to it in time. While his body was shaking under the powerful sound waves, he was busy trying to muster the sword auras around him as he tried to free himself from the impact of the sound waves.





Volume 37, Chapter 538.1: Huo Yuhao VS Tang Wutong


Xiao Xiao’s Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute might only have seven soul rings, but they were all ten-thousand-year soul rings, except for the one yellow hundred-year soul ring, which she had added back during the freshman competition to help Huo Yuhao and Wang Dong’er.

The reason why she used her Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute instead of her Threelives Soulcrush Cauldron was that everyone was familiar with her flute. At the same time, her flute granted her immense controlling power.

Even Huo Yuhao’s Spirit Eyes were not a pure control-type martial soul, but Xiao Xiao’s Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute was.

Back then, when Elder Xuan was mentoring her, he once told her how the simplest method to become a truly powerful soul master was to become the best at a certain field. Regardless of what field it was, as long as one was able to become the best in that area, he or she would possess immense power!

Apparently, Xiao Xiao had subscribed to that belief, and had persisted with her decision. And reality showed that she had succeeded. By using the powerful controlling ability of her Ninephoenix Worshipping Flute, she was actually able to restrain Ji Juechen.

The green phoenix in the sky tucked its wings in, and Xiao Xiao reappeared in mid-air. Following which, a huge black cauldron appeared.

When this cauldron appeared, the number of soul rings on Xiao Xiao’s body increased from seven to eight!

That’s right! Xiao Xiao had already attained the rank of a Soul Douluo! Her primary martial soul already had eight soul rings. She was now a powerful eight-ringed Soul Douluo with the Threelives Soulcrush Cauldron.

As the fifth soul ring on Xiao Xiao’s body lit up, the Threelives Soulcrush Cauldron expanded furiously against the wind. The matte black cauldron seemed to embody immense authority as the surrounding air became increasingly dense and heavy. The cauldron seemed to have transformed into a humongous mountain as the people from the Tang Sect felt the immense pressure radiating from it.

The cauldron floated over Ji Juechen as it started to release a humming sound. It released countless humongous runes which started to circle around it.

At this instant, Ji Juechen, who was stuck within the formation formed by the phoenix pillars, seemed to have become frozen as he quietly stood where he was. However, his whole body had transformed into a greyish black color.

Even though the sound waves from the phoenix pillars continued to attack him, they were unable to penetrate his defense. At this instant, Xiao Xiao felt an inexplicable sense of danger. Even though she seemed to have the upper-hand over Ji Juechen, she did not feel as though she had an advantage over him. Instead, she felt very uncomfortable, as though something ominous was about to happen.

Xiao Xiao released a low growl as she pointed in the direction of the cauldron with her right hand. At that instant, the Threelives Soulcrush Cauldron released a loud and powerful humming sound as it dropped from the sky toward Ji Juechen.

A powerful black light was also ejected from the mouth of the cauldron. Endless authority descended from the heavens as the black pillar of light struck Ji Juechen ahead of the cauldron.

This was the fifth soul skill of Xiao Xiao’sThreelives Soulcrush Cauldron—Threelives Soulcrush. It was a powerful sealing soul skill which acted directly on the body and the soul.

Previously, with the help of the Threelives Soulcrush, Xiao Xiao was actually able to seal a powerful evil soul master and contribute to the team’s success.

However, the person she was facing now was Ji Juechen. The sword fanatic, Ji Juechen!

A bright cry escaped Ji Juechen’s mouth, following which, a matte black sword light erupted from the ground like black ink.

Both the Threelives Soulcrush and the sword light from Ji Juechen were black.

The two black forces collided with a humongous impact.

Ji Juechen’s figure rose up into the sky like a dragon ascending to the heavens. However, the Threelives Soulcrush Cauldron had vanished in that instant.

That’s right, it had somehow vanished.

The cauldron which was falling rapidly had disappeared without any warning. However, if one were to pay attention to Xiao Xiao, one would notice the sly smile that had formed on her face.

A humongous cauldron sneakily appeared below Ji Juechen’s feet. The same black pillar enveloped and trapped Ji Juechen after he had exploded up into the sky with his maximum effort.

Ji Juechen was caught in that moment when he had just exerted strength on a previous soul skill, and was recovering his energy for the next blow. Hence, his body froze upon contact with the Threelives Soulcrush as he was sealed in mid-air.

A small thing that resembled a lizard rested itself silently on Xiao Xiao’s shoulder. This thing seemed to be a little strange, as it looked different from a normal lizard. However, because it was hidden within a ball of dark light, no one could see its true appearance.

Nonetheless, it was its existence that allowed the Threelives Soulcrush technique to suddenly change positions. This allowed Xiao Xiao to trick Ji Juechen into exposing himself to her attacks.

After the Threelives Soulcrush was completed, the matte black cauldron suddenly expanded before releasing a powerful suction force. Ji Juechen was sucked into the cauldron.

The eighth ring on Xiao Xiao’s body lit up, and nine humongous golden runes fell from the sky onto the cauldron. Instantly, the black cauldron was dyed a uniform golden color as it dropped to the ground!

The phoenix pillars disappeared, leaving only the cauldron sparkling on the ground. The ten golden runes on the cauldron glowed intensely in an intermittent fashion, as though they were trying to resist powerful blows from within.

Xiao Xiao floated back to the ground as she looked at the commotion before her with surprise. Even though she might have beaten Ji Juechen, she knew that she had not won by ability. She was only able to defeat him because of her tactics.

Ji Juechen was simply too unfamiliar with her abilities. Conversely, Xiao Xiao had watched so many of his spars with the others. Hence, she possessed a superior understanding of his abilities.

Ji Juechen’s final attack—his Sword Fanatic Domain—was undoubtedly his greatest skill. Xiao Xiao’s prior control was simply her way of waiting for that moment to come. When Ji Juechen launched his most powerful attack, it was also the time when he was most vulnerable to any form of attack. If he were to fail to land a blow in a single attempt, his aura and sword intent would drastically decrease.

Xiao Xiao had been waiting for this opportunity all along. Of course, she understood that Ji Juechen could have directed his final attack at her instead of her Threelives Soulcrush Cauldron. Even though he would most definitely get hurt, she would also not be able to escape unscathed. The truth was that even though Ji Juechen was a sword fanatic, he would still not put his own people in danger.

Xiao Xiao raised her right hand as the Threelives Soulcrush Cauldron transformed into a streak of light before returning to her body. A deafening sword aura flickered as Ji Juechen reappeared within the spectral demiplane.

He looked slightly ragged after reappearing. There were many holes in his clothes, and his face seemed to be slightly pale. However, the spark in his eyes showed that he was actually very excited.

The scariest thing about the sword fanatic was how he was not afraid of losing. In fact, the more he lost, the more excited he would become. That was why everyone had a headache when facing him. The more they tried to put him down, the more he wanted to fight them.

“I have lost. That was very impressive!” Ji Juechen nodded as he looked at Xiao Xiao.

Xiao Xiao shook her head and said, “No. I definitely can’t compare to you when it comes to our true abilities. You only lost because you did not understand my skills well enough. Also, you chose to go easy on me instead of putting me in harm’s way. When we fight the next time, I will definitely lose to you. I can sense that you haven’t even released your full fighting power.”

Ji Juechen shook his head and said, “It’s still a loss at the end of the day. I can sense that you did not go all-out on me either. It would be very difficult to say who would win if we were to fight to the death. But that would only result in serious injuries for both of us.”

Ji Juechen’s words were usually very objective. Hence, his praise had elevated Xiao Xiao to a new status. It meant a lot about Xiao Xiao’s ability when she was able to hold her own against the sword fanatic.

He Caitou gaped as he stared at Xiao Xiao. “Xiao Xiao, I can’t believe how strong you’ve become. If we were to battle within a fixed physical range, I might not even be able to beat you.”

Xiao Xiao waved her little fist at He Caitou and said, “So you better watch out! If you dare bully me in the future, I’ll make sure I put you down.”

He Caitou gave her an awkward smile and said, “You are the one who’s bullying me every day now! When have I ever bullied you? Look, you even bit me yesterday.” Following which, he revealed a mark on his shoulder.

Xiao Xiao’s face became red as she turned and fled. The people who were listening to their conversation burst into laughter.

“Alright, now that they’re done, it’s our turn!” Tang Wutong’s voice attracted everyone’s attention. They were confused about what she meant.

Ji Juechen’s eyes lit up as he leapt forward. “Yes, let’s do it!”

Huo Yuhao laughed angrily before saying, “Hey! Hey! Hey! I’m not letting you fight my wife. Besides, I don’t think you can withstand her blows for even a minute with the current state you’re in. My wife is no pushover.”

As he clarified, he stepped onto the sparring ground with Tang Wutong.

Bei Bei looked at him and asked, “Little junior brother, what are you trying to do?”

Huo Yuhao sighed and replied, “Wutong was very inspired by what she saw, and mentioned to me how females should not be discriminated against. Hence, she challenged me to a duel.”

“Cough! Cough!” Even though a mocking look formed on Bei Bei’s face, he did not dare to say anything. From the look in his eyes, he seemed to be saying, “Good luck, buddy!”

Xu Sanshi did not seem to fear anything as he egged Huo Yuhao on, “Little junior brother, go for it! You must fight for all the men in the world.”

Jiang Nannan rolled her eyes and said, “It seems like you’re quite a chauvinist, eh? Come, fight with me!”

Xu Sanshi shook his head fervently before saying, “No way. Forget about it. Use your sleeping technique only after we return to our room. I promise I will definitely not resist.”

Jiang Nannan launched herself into the air as she kicked Xu Sanshi. However, she was already blushing.

Tang Wutong moved to the side of the sparring ground on her own. Huo Yuhao was also in no mood to care about what the others were talking about. Because he had been cultivating with Tang Wutong every day, he had a rough understanding of her ability. However, he had never faced her when she was in full fighting mode.





Volume 37, Chapter 538.2: Huo Yuhao VS Tang Wutong


Before, when he duelled with Wang Qiu’er, it was already very difficult for him to defeat her. Currently, Tang Wutong’s current ability seemed to be a combination of Wang Qiu’er’s and Wang Dong’er’s abilities. She was also already a Titled Douluo. When it came to individual abilities, she was probably the strongest in the whole Tang Sect. Even though Huo Yuhao was boosted by his multiple spirits, he could not be complacent when going up against her.

After seeing how he had been excluded from this upcoming affair, Ji Juechen retreated to the side unwillingly. However, he was still very excited to watch a battle between two powerful cultivators. Watching their battle was still very useful for his cultivation.

After Ji Juechen retreated, Huo Yuhao took up his place as he allowed his energy to calm down. As he watched Tang Wutong, who was walking further and further away, he started to focus on his target.

Bei Bei, Xu Sanshi, He Caitou, and the others stopped fooling around. Xiao Xiao had quietly returned as she took up a place beside He Caitou.

To be honest, everyone knew well enough that the two strongest cultivators in Tang Sect were none other than Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong. However, they were not certain exactly how strong these two were.

When Huo Yuhao teamed up with Tang Wutong to pin down the two evil soul masters, they had fully demonstrated the power of their martial soul fusion skills. However, that was still fundamentally different from facing off against one another.

One-on-one battles were the true demonstration of an individual’s abilities. It would show everyone how strong they had become, and that was something that everyone from Tang Sect wanted to know.

Nan Qiuqiu, who was standing to one side moved over to talk to Tang Wutong. She waved her fist and cheered, “Wutong, go for it! Beat him! Beat him until he loses all his teeth.”

Huo Yuhao was at a loss for words. “Qiuqiu, do you really hate me that much?”

Nan Qiuqiu replied, “This is no longer an issue of hatred. It’s about the battle between the sexes. Ladies, am I right?”

Her words received support from her fellow ladies.

Xu Sanshi then cheered loudly, “Yuhao, you can do it. Brother Ji has already lost the first round. You must not lose again! If you lose, I am afraid every male in Tang Sect will have to walk around with our heads lowered.”

Huo Yuhao sighed.

That’s easy for you to say. I don’t think it will be an easy fight against Wutong!

At this moment, Tang Wutong had already walked to a distance which would separate her from Huo Yuhao by about a hundred meters. When she turned around to face Huo Yuhao, her beautiful eyes showed the excitement in her heart. No one knew whether she was excited to fight, or excited by the prospect of destroying Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao focused his gaze on Tang Wutong. Bei Bei walked forward a few steps before declaring, “I will be the referee for this duel. Are both of you ready?”

Compared to the previous duel between Ji Juechen and Xiao Xiao, this duel was obviously a lot more formal.

As of now, the higher-ups of Tang Sect were not the only spectators. After hearing the commotion above the knoll, many of the soul engineers from the three legions had left their resting areas and surrounded the knoll to watch the upcoming duel.

After hearing that they were about to witness a duel between Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, all of them were visibly more excited than the duelists themselves.

Most of the soul engineers in the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Legion, the Fort Soul Engineer Legion, and the Heavy Artillery Soul Engineer Legion were young people. Even the older ones were only middle-aged. They were all people who were full of bloodlust, and were raring to watch people fight. They were extremely interested to watch a battle between two top-class soul masters.

Besides, quite a number of people within the legions had witnessed Huo Yuhao demonstrate his abilities during the Sea God’s Fated Blind Date. It was also then that he got together with Tang Wutong.

Even people who were not fortunate enough to see them at the Blind Date would have definitely heard about them. Now, they were about to watch them duel in front of their eyes. It was an opportunity not to be missed! As people quickly passed the message about the duel that was about to start, a large number of soul engineers had surrounded the sparring ground. Even though they were keeping a safe distance from the actual ground itself, their excitement was still infectious.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were not anxious about the duel at all. Both of them merely stood there as they waited patiently for the duel to officially begin. Even though the fight was about to start, both of them were perfectly fine with having the legions spectate their battle, because it was a good way to improve their morale.

Everyone wanted to be assured of the strength of their commanders. A strong commander would not only lead them to victory, but would also be capable of keeping them safe.

Hence, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong chose to wait a little longer until everyone had found a safe viewing point before they nodded at Bei Bei.

Bei Bei naturally understood their intentions as he smiled. “Both of you really have great chemistry! Are you ready?”

Once again, they nodded. Bei Bei raised his right hand before looking at both of them. Then, he lowered his hand rapidly as he announced, “Start!”

As he announced the start of the duel, Tang Wutong made the first move. Her beautiful dragon wings opened up from her back as her soul rings ascended from her feet. The sight of this made the throngs of soul engineers cheer in delight.

They were not only cheering because she had nine soul rings. She possessed a combination of soul rings which far exceeded the best-known combination! The sight of Tang Wutong’s red hundred-thousand-year soul ring made the crowd wild.

Is this the true strength of the wife of our Chief Commander? That’s unbelievable! Will Chief Commander be able to beat her?

After witnessing the powerful soul rings Tang Wutong possessed, everyone turned their attention to Huo Yuhao. Once again, they were stunned by what they saw.

Huo Yuhao’s eyes released a gentle golden glow as a humongous golden eye formed behind his back. Seven soul rings gently ascended from his feet. Even though there were only seven rings, their colors were overwhelmingly attention-grabbing.

The first soul ring was milky-white, with a circle of golden carvings. The second soul ring was already black. The third, fourth and fifth soul rings were also black in color. And to everyone’s surprise, the sixth and seventh soul rings were red.

After the appearance of his seventh soul ring, the air around Huo Yuhao started to bend and twist, as though he were no longer real.

Tang Wutong slowly raised her right hand as her body emanated an intense golden glow, which spread outwards in the shape of a butterfly.

As she tapped the tip of her foot on the ground gently, she sprang forwards towards Huo Yuhao in flight. As her wings flapped intensely behind her back, she had already flown a hundred meters and was right in front of Huo Yuhao before anyone could even see how she did it.

That’s way too fast!

Everyone cheered in unison after witnessing her incredible speed.

Tang Wutong leaned slightly to the side as her right wing went straight for Huo Yuhao. A deafening howl could be heard as the dragon wing extended to form a gigantic blade.

Huo Yuhao’s body had become illusory the moment Tang Wutong dashed over. He had activated his Spiritual Interference Domain. While the wing cut through his figure, it was not able to hit his real body. Huo Yuhao had silently moved towards behind Tang Wutong right before everyone’s eyes.

He threw out a simple punch at her back.

Even though the punch seemed extraordinarily simple, Tang Wutong froze after receiving the blow, as though she had become immobile. Huo Yuhao’s punch seemed to contain a black hole that was holding her in place.

Tang Wutong closed and folded the wings behind her back before releasing them again violently as she hoped to use the sharp edges of her wings to counter Huo Yuhao’s fist.

However, at this instant, Huo Yuhao's eyes flashed as he released a spiritual blast radiating from the center of his body into the area about ten meters from him.

The golden trident rune on Tang Wutong's forehead flickered and absorbed most of the force from the spiritual blast. This only delayed Wutong slightly, as her wings continued in their course and collided with Huo Yuhao's fist.

"Ping!" A loud metallic sound rang out.

Huo Yuhao retreated rapidly upon their collision. The others also noticed how the air around him had started to show signs of cracking and shattering. These cracks were caused by the sharpness of Tang Wutong's dragon wings.

However, things were also not easy for Tang Wutong. The golden light from Huo Yuhao's fist had followed the contours of her wings and flowed into her body. To her surprise, this golden glow caused her to lose her focus for a split second.

After being forced backwards, Huo Yuhao's third soul ring lit up. A vertical beam of white light shone on Tang Wutong. Mass Enfeeblement! Of course, it had been focused on a single target under Huo Yuhao's superior control. Its power was naturally magnified as it became a lot more concentrated.

Following which, his fourth soul ring lit up. A mysterious whirlpool formed above Tang Wutong's head. If one were to pay attention to the whirlpool, one would notice the little vertical eye which was flickering within it. Spiritual Confusion!

After releasing two powerful control-type soul skills simultaneously, Huo Yuhao's soul rings suddenly changed. The original seven rings became eight different soul rings. Even their colors had become different. As he raised his right hand, a gigantic deep blue sword appeared. Following which, the sword went for Tang Wutong's head as it followed the two powerful soul skills.

Snow Empress’ Three Ultimate Techniques: Unparalleled Chill, Empress’ Sword!

This series of transformations was extremely rapid. Everyone found it hard to follow Huo Yuhao's movements, as his attacks were just too quick for their eyes. His transition from controlling to attacking was seamless. He did not seem like he was going easy on Tang Wutong at all.

Tang Wutong only lost her focus momentarily. When the Mass Enfeeblement landed on her body, she had already regained her focus. Her eyes revealed a flash as her body flipped on its own in mid-air. Afterwards, she raised her hands as her fourth soul ring lit up. Dragon God's Possession!





Volume 37, Chapter 538.3: Huo Yuhao VS Tang Wutong


As the armor of dragon scales fitted itself onto Tang Wutong, her aura suddenly changed. Her powerful dragon aura blew away the Mass Enfeeblement. Even the dangerous Spiritual Confusion was blocked by the golden trident on her forehead.

The shiny Golden Dragon Spear appeared and blocked the Unparalleled Chill’s blade.

“Clinggg!” Once again, another bright sound echoed through the air. The Unparalleled Chill shattered in mid-air, while Tang Wutong also fell to the ground from the impact, her entire body covered with a layer of frost.

Huo Yuhao had been working on his Ultimate Ice, especially after he had absorbed the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence previously. After the Unparalleled Chill shattered, it released the extremely low temperature trapped within it. The soul engineers who were watching the duel felt the sudden drop in temperature, and quickly mustered their soul power to warm their bodies.

Huo Yuhao let out a long growl as he accelerated instead of retreating. He flew towards Tang Wutong as he pulled his right hand to his waist. The image of the Ice Jade Empress Scorpion appeared behind his back as a Star Anise Mysterious Ice Grass formed on his shoulder. These increased the aura of his Ultimate Ice by orders of magnitude.

Meanwhile, Tang Wutong fearlessly tapped the ground with her feet. Following which, a gigantic golden dragon appeared with a loud dragon roar. Afterwards, the dragon shrank rapidly, and wrapped itself around the Golden Dragon Spear. Tang Wutong pointed the tip of the spear at Huo Yuhao as both of them prepared for the other’s next move.

Within the blink of an eye, both of them were inches apart. But suddenly, both of their figures vanished simultaneously. At that very instant, the surrounding soul masters felt the effects of a powerful suction force. The suction force seemed to penetrate their minds as most of the soul masters were forced to take a step forward to steady their bodies. They were struggling against the power of the suction force.

But then, in the next instant, both Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong reappeared in the other’s former positions.

Both of them revealed a shocked expression on their faces. Following which, both their expressions revealed a look of amazement.

I can’t believe we have so much chemistry. We’re even using the same technique.

It seemed like both of them had executed Instant Teleportation at the same time. They had both wanted to teleport to the other person’s back before launching an attack. But it seemed like both of them had foiled the other’s plan unintentionally. Even their tactics were exactly the same.

Huo Yuhao was lost for words after he realized this, whereas Tang Wutong burst into laughter.

But even then, their emotions would not get into the way of their fight.

After teleporting to where Huo Yuhao was, Tang Wutong spun around as her Golden Dragon Spear lashed back like a whip towards him.

Huo Yuhao moved as he barely dodged the jab from Tang Wutong’s spear. The current situation was starting to show the advantage that weapon wielders had over soul masters who did not wield weapons. Because Huo Yuhao did not have a weapon, he could only react passively to Tang Wutong’s attacks.

After barely dodging the attack from her spear, Huo Yuhao placed his right palm above the tip of the Golden Dragon Spear as he pressed it downwards.

Suddenly, Tang Wutong injected her strength into the spear in an explosive manner. This sudden imbalance in energy caused Huo Yuhao to be tossed aside as though he had just been electrocuted. In addition, his hand was bursting with light and energy. It was apparent that he had expended copious amounts of soul power to barely block off the lifesteal ability of Tang Wutong’s Golden Dragon Spear.

Meanwhile, after suffering from a blow from the Snowless Glacier, the glow on the Golden Dragon Spear became slightly fainter. However, the golden dragon light, which had wrapped itself around the spear, suddenly intensified as it forced the cold aura out of the spear.

Once again, Tang Wutong’s body released an unbelievable amount of golden light as her soul power intensified once more. As she flapped the wings behind her back, she chased after Huo Yuhao like a comet. It took her no time at all to appear behind his back.

In their previous collision, Huo Yuhao was undoubtedly the loser. He was at a disadvantage because he did not have a weapon.

Tang Wutong was not about to let him catch his breath. A golden dragon head appeared in front of her chest and dragon let out a low roar. A streak of golden light emerged from the dragon’s mouth as it shot straight towards Huo Yuhao. Dragon God’s Roar!

Tang Wutong’s fifth soul skill was the skill which made the evil soul master suffer a lot previously. It was going to be very difficult for Huo Yuhao to evade this attack when it was fired at such a short distance from him.

Tang Wutong’s tactics could be said to be very unpredictable. Just when everyone thought that she was about to begin a close-combat battle with Huo Yuhao after chasing after him, she suddenly released a ranged skill. And this ranged attack was released precisely before Huo Yuhao could predict her next move.

Because Huo Yuhao could use his spiritual detection to predict Tang Wutong’s moves, he was supposed to be able to know what she was about to do next. However, Tang Wutong now possessed superior soul power, and her attacks were unprecedentedly unpredictable. She was undoubtedly trying to reduce the advantage of Huo Yuhao’s spiritual detection by trying to be as unpredictable as possible.

After being knocked away by the previous blow, he landed in a position where he could look straight at Tang Wutong. As he saw the golden streak of light from the Dragon God’s Roar coming towards him, his face revealed a faint smile—much to everyone’s surprise.

Following which, Huo Yuhao’s eyes brightened as his hands made a hugging motion in front of his chest.

Then, a strange scene unfolded before their eyes. The airflow around his body suddenly became very violent and rapid. It was suddenly infused with an agitated Ultimate Ice aura as it formed a whirlpool around his body. He extended his left hand outwards while retracting his right hand as an icy blue whirlpool formed.

“Booommm!” A violet humming sound reverberated across the sparring ground. Once again, Huo Yuhao was thrown backwards before he slowed himself with his feet. However, Tang Wutong was no longer able to chase after him. Her body paused in mid-air as her eyes revealed her shock at what had just happened. A layer of ice had formed on her Dragon God’s Armor.

Tang Wutong shook her body as though the Dragon God itself was shaking its armor. The layer of ice shattered, but her speed was visibly slower than before. Huo Yuhao also took this opportunity to catch his breath. As he looked at Tang Wutong, he slowly raised his right hand as a tornado suddenly formed around his body.

This was not any normal tornado. If one were to be precise, it was an Ice Snow Tornado.

The tornado’s diameter was only about five meters. But it was as tall as the heavens as it stood towering above everyone, with its top beyond anyone’s field of view. Huo Yuhao seemed to have disappeared within the tornado.

Tang Wutong's eyes narrowed as she paused momentarily. She did not immediately attack as she let out a cold battle-cry. She raised the Golden Dragon Spear which she was wielding with her right hand as she pointed it at the tornado. At the same time, her small frame exploded with an invincible aura.

Even Huo Yuhao had never seen this aura that Tang Wutong had just released. She released the pair of wings behind her back. At this instant, she seemed to have become a circle. With her body as the center of a greater circle, a blinding purple-gold glow illuminated her surroundings.

The diameter of this purple-gold glow was a good ten meters. After its appearance, almost the entire spectral demiplane’s aura seemed to have become agitated and more violent. If one were to pay attention to Tang Wutong’s soul rings, one would notice that her eighth soul ring had just lit up.

Tang Wutong’s body disappeared as though she had transformed into a beautiful butterfly flying within the humongous purple-gold glow. At this instant, it seemed like the spectral demiplane had a sun for the first time, a beautiful purple-gold sun.

Xu Sanshi’s jaw dropped as he witnessed the sight before him. “That’s way too insane. What the hell are they trying to do? They have been executing impossibly difficult moves one after another. Ji Juechen, are you still planning to challenge Wutong? I think they might still have some cards up their sleeves.”

Ji Juechen had a worried look on his face. In his mind, he knew that he might have stood a chance against the previous moves that Tang Wutong had executed.

But after he saw the purple-gold sun before his eyes, he knew that there was an impossible gap between them. In order to bridge this gap, he first had to attain the rank of a Titled Douluo. But was it really that easy to move from eight to nine rings? Ji Juechen’s martial soul was not considered a strong one. It was more than just a game of probability as to whether he could get his soul core.

Yes, the soul skill that Tang Wutong had just executed was her eighth soul skill—Dragon Dance of the Radiant Sun. It was an immensely powerful offensive soul skill.

As the purple-gold sun slowly rose into the sky, the Radiant Dragon God’s Butterfly danced within its glow. As the sun climbed higher into the sky, the pressure it released became even greater. All the soul masters who were watching the battle started to retreat from the area. No one wanted to be injured by this powerful soul skill.

Countless spectral creatures which were prowling around the other end of the spectral demiplane howled in fear as though they were being attacked by the sun’s glow. All of them started to flee as far as possible.

Meanwhile, the Ice Snow Tornado that Huo Yuhao had created stood proud and tall. As the soul masters started to retreat further from the sparring ground, its size started to grow as it became more powerful.

“Yuhao, watch my Dragon Dance of the Radiant Sun!” Tang Wutong warned Yuhao. In the next instant, the brightness of the sun grew to its maximum. Following which, a gigantic purple-gold pillar of light tore the sky apart as it raced towards Huo Yuhao’s Ice Snow Tornado.

However, before the sun’s blow even reached the tornado, the Ice Snow Tornado suddenly disintegrated. That was something no one had expected.

Huo Yuhao had vanished. He was replaced by two figures who were holding each other’s hands.

One was white as snow.

The other was pale as ice.

The Ice and Snow Empress were holding each other’s hands as they carried a smile on their pretty faces. A similarly gigantic beam of light was released from their bodies as it accelerated towards Tang Wutong’s Dragon Dance of the Radiant Sun.

This pillar was formed from the combination of the pure white color of snow and the pale jade color of ice. The two tones of light blended perfectly with one another as they released an invincible aura.

Yes! This was the most powerful soul skill that Huo Yuhao had acquired after fusing with the Snow Empress. It was a skill that came with his Ice Jade Empress Scorpion martial soul’s fifth soul ring. Ice and Snow Empress' Arrogance!

“Boom!”

A radiant sight unfolded before everyone’s eyes. After colliding with one another, both the purple-gold glow and the ice jade glow exploded into sparks which flew everywhere as the burning brightness of the sun fought the intense cold.

This collision caused the entire world to be shaken as the spectral demiplane trembled, and radiant sparks lingered in the air for an extended period of time.

The soul masters had long become dazed from watching the battle before their eyes. Even though these blows were not targeted at them, they could still feel the frightening power within those attacks.

Is this the strength of a top-class cultivator? What would happen if we were the ones receiving these blows?

It took a good ten seconds before the collision of the two soul skills to start showing signs of subsiding. In the end, the fight between Tang Wutong and Huo Yuhao came to a deadlock. Neither of them could overwhelm the other.





Volume 37, Chapter 539: Sigh of the Frozen Goddess, Morning Dew Dagger!


Finally, the dazzling light dissipated. Tang Wutong and Huo Yuhao also reappeared in mid-air. At least, it wasn’t possible to find anything wrong with them just by looking at them.

Well-matched?

Tang Wutong fluttered her wings, and a sonic boom suddenly rang out. She turned into a beam of flowing light and charged towards Huo Yuhao.

Both of them had just unleashed a powerful skill, which drained quite a lot of their soul power. They couldn’t keep up such an expenditure. Given this, close-combat was undoubtedly the best choice.

Tang Wutong’s figure flashed, and she moved five meters in front of Huo Yuhao. Her Golden Dragon Spear turned into thousands of streaks of golden light that surrounded Huo Yuhao. A sonorous dragon roar sounded at the same time.

Her spear gave her an advantage! Tang Wutong had a wealth of fighting experience. Through their earlier clash, she could tell that she had an advantage in the aspect of weapons.

Dragon Dance of the Radiant Sun versus the Pride of the Ice and Snow Empresses. Tang Wutong had originally believed that she could suppress Huo Yuhao. After all, he wasn’t a Titled Douluo yet. Both of them even had twin martial souls. In terms of soul power, she should possess a distinct advantage over him. However, she was stunned to realize that not only did she not gain an advantage over him as they fought, but she even felt as if her entire body had been invaded by chilly energy. She knew that that was because Huo Yuhao’s Ultimate Ice was superior to her martial soul.

She couldn’t really accept this fact. She couldn’t believe that her Radiant Dragon Butterfly was inferior to Huo Yuhao’s Ice Jade Empress Scorpion!

Everyone was competitive, including Tang Wutong. Furthermore, she had her own secrets. She already had nine rings. How could she possibly not gain the upper hand using her eighth soul skill against Huo Yuhao’s fifth soul skill?

In fact, she had neglected one matter, which was very important. It was Huo Yuhao’s five Spirits.

Yes, he only had eight rings. However, he had five powerful Spirits! When he first obtained the Manifold Mysterious Ice Essence, he wasn’t the only one who managed to absorb it. His five Spirits absorbed it at the same time. His spiritual sense was strengthened, and his five Spirits all had some level of strength. Even if they couldn't fully rely on Huo Yuhao, they still had their own fighting strength.

As a result, they could reflect some of their abilities onto Huo Yuhao when necessary. The earlier attack was an example of that. Clearly, the difference between Tang Wutong and Huo Yuhao was in terms of Spirits.

Huo Yuhao smiled when he saw the competitive look in Tang Wutong’s eyes.

My dear, did you really think that I had no chance against your Golden Dragon Spear?

A trace of deep-blue light appeared from Huo Yuhao’s hand without any warning. At that instant, everything seemed to freeze up in the spectral demiplane.

“Ding!”

A crisp ringing sounded. A tragic dragon scream also echoed at the same time. Tang Wutong shook tremendously. Her bright gold spear started to turn icy-blue right from the tip. At the same time, this icy-blue was spreading to her body. The streaks of light that she had formed also instantly vanished, turning into nothingness.

Tang Wutong exclaimed in shock before she collapsed to the ground.

Huo Yuhao also shook slightly in the air. There was an intense look of astonishment in his eyes.

At this moment, he was holding a dagger. It was a very weird dagger. It was completely black, and around thirty-six centimeters long. The hilt was around twelve centimeters long and five centimeters wide. The back of the dagger was very thick, but the blade was thin. There was a blue, diamond-shaped gem at the bottom of the hilt. This gem shone with a dim and mysterious glow.

The most special part about it was that there was a thin layer of white fog surrounding the blade of this dagger. This layer of fog was formed by countless dense droplets of water. They weren’t formed from the consolidation of Huo Yuhao’s Ultimate Ice soul power, and didn’t experience any changes because of his soul power either.

“Dang!” The spear fell to the ground. Tang Wutong also collapsed at the same time. She had no choice but to let go of her spear. If she didn’t do that, the terrifying chill would have corroded her body through her spear.

She couldn’t possibly resist that terrifying chill with her soul power. It was completely unimaginable.

What was this?

This was Tang Wutong’s first time seeing the dagger in Huo Yuhao’s hand. Her spear had actually been completely defeated by that dagger.

Huo Yuhao drifted and landed on the ground. Right now, there was a passionate look in his eyes. He thought to himself -

no wonder it’s a weapon from a god! At the start, the Ghostcarving Blade had shocked him greatly. Without it, he wouldn’t have possibly become a Class 9 soul engineer in such a short period of time.

Nian Rongbing, the God of Emotions, didn’t give him one, but two daggers. The other one was in his hand right now.

Huo Yuhao had never used this dagger before. It was his first time taking it out, and he had used it to curb the Golden Dragon Spear.

When he first held this dagger, he sensed that his life seemed to be connected to it. Even his five Spirits felt it. When he waved the dagger, it was as if all the Ultimate Ice energy in heaven and earth had gathered around it. Huo Yuhao was completely certain that the temperature of this dagger was below negative two hundred and fifty degree Celsius. Just by simply waving it, half the amount of soul power he had used on his Pride of the Ice and Snow Empresses was drained. This was a testament to how much strength was needed to wield it. Even so, Huo Yuhao felt a little dizzy. Evidently, he wasn’t completely able to tap into the strength of this dagger with his current abilities.

“Wutong, are you ok?” Huo Yuhao looked at Tang Wutong as he was in awe.

Tang Wutong bit her lower lip and glared at the dagger in Huo Yuhao’s hand. “I’ve not lost yet.”

As she spoke, she suddenly pressed her own forehead with her right hand. Instantly, blinding light was released from her forehead.

This was...

Tang Wutong’s terrifying might was instantly unleashed. At this instant, Huo Yuhao felt as if his entire body had turned rigid. He felt a little helpless at this point, as if he couldn’t resist at all.

It wasn’t just him. Everyone present had the same feeling.

It was also at this instant that a weird feeling surfaced. A refreshing feeling flowed into his body from the dagger. Huo Yuhao suddenly felt as if the pressure on him had been alleviated considerably.

Tang Wutong pointed her left hand at her spear, which was still on the ground. She also slowly moved her right hand.

It was clear that there was an extra ball of intense golden light in her right hand. That ball of golden light appeared like a fluid. It fell from her hand and landed accurately on the spear.

The spear, which was covered in a layer of ice, had started to drift up. When Tang Wutong flung the ball of light at it, it started to shine with golden light. The originally tough layer of ice was scraped away with a deafening sound. Following this, the layer of ice broke, and a beam of golden light shot into the sky.

A terrifying might spread at this moment. This time, Huo Yuhao could clearly sense his demiplane shaking tremendously. It was shaking because of Tang Wutong’s golden light.

Terrifying pressure spread in the air. The Golden Dragon Spear had transformed!

It was no longer a spear. The tip divided into three, and it instantly turned into a golden trident. In addition, Huo Yuhao also discovered that the golden trident rune on Tang Wutong’s forehead had disappeared as a result.

Tang Wutong groaned, but was a little provocative as she stared at Huo Yuhao. She said, “Let’s see whether your dagger can resist me this time.”

The golden trident fell from the air, and Tang Wutong caught it with her hand. However, her body shook a little as she caught it. Evidently, using this golden trident took a huge toll on her too.

What was going on?

Before Huo Yuhao could think any further, Tang Wutong had already made her move. Her golden trident moved slightly in the air, and halos immediately shot toward Huo Yuhao.

When Tang Wutong moved her golden trident, her dragon scale armor also turned golden.

Her aura was simply too powerful and restraining. Even those from the Tang Sect were unable to take it, and had to step back. The surrounding soul masters naturally retreated even further.

Huo Yuhao was very sharp. He slashed with his dagger, and something strange happened. His dagger actually formed many dense projections. They appeared to be very chaotic and messy. However, on a closer look, they actually contained the principles of heaven and earth.

The halos that were released from the golden trident were crushed as they clashed with the dense projections. However, Huo Yuhao’s dagger could no longer freeze Tang Wutong’s weapon.

Tang Wutong was becoming more and more astonished. She clearly knew how strong her move was. She didn’t expect Huo Yuhao to have been able to resist her attack.

In fact, Huo Yuhao was under more pressure than she thought. Right now, he had already unleashed the Rain Dragon’s Dance that Nian Rongbing had imparted to him.

Huo Yuhao’s dagger had an extremely domineering name, Sigh of the Frozen Goddess, Morning Dew Dagger!

This dagger had its own history. Before Nian Rongbing became the God of Emotions, this dagger was the first weapon he had obtained just as he was becoming famous in his plane. This Morning Dew Dagger was a dagger made by a master smith whose martial soul was a Chill Dagger. After that, Nian Rongbing provided a rock of the Frozen Goddess to this master, who attached it to the dagger and named it the Morning Dew Dagger.

This dagger followed Nian Rongbing everywhere, and was one of his most important weapons. After he became a god, this dagger remained by his side. It grew stronger as Nian Rongbing’s divine sense became more and more acute. It was a true godly weapon.

Right now, Huo Yuhao couldn’t fully unleash the strength of this Morning Dew Dagger. He didn’t have divine sense yet, and had yet to inherit the godly seat of the God of Emotions. This was why his soul power was rapidly drained as he unleashed his Rain Dragon’s Dance.

Of course, he wasn’t drained without reason. As he used this dagger to unleash the Rain Dragon’s Dance, his understanding of the dagger became deeper. At the same time, it was also his first time sensing the secrets of this dagger.

The rock of the Frozen Goddess on this dagger released a strong chilly energy. This energy further cultivated and compressed his soul power. After that, he poured his soul power into the dagger, mustering its true strength. The aura of divine sense was even released from the rock, further boosting his soul power. This was why he could partly unleash the strength of this godly weapon. It was also because of this that he was drained so quickly.

Tang Wutong was equally drained as well. Her golden trident was abnormally heavy. Even though she was only using a projection of the trident, she still had to support a third of its actual weight. Furthermore, she was also using a godly skill.

The two of them became slower and slower. Tang Wutong’s face was completely red, while Huo Yuhao turned paler and paler. Their soul power was being drained very rapidly.

Whoever’s soul power was drained first would immediately lose this fight.

Suddenly, Huo Yuhao staggered a little, and his dagger also paused for a brief moment. The halos that were formed by Tang Wutong’s trident hit him.

Huo Yuhao’s body stiffened. He was restrained by the halos, and couldn’t move a single inch.

The tip of the golden trident was pointed at Huo Yuhao’s chest, but Tang Wutong pursed her red lips.

Golden light flashed, and the trident turned back into the Golden Dragon Spear. The golden halos on Huo Yuhao’s body also disappeared.

It was only now that everyone watching the fight heaved a sigh of relief. The backs of their shirts were completely drenched.

This fight was simply too exciting. From the first clash to the subsequent flaunting of big moves to the final exchanges, it didn’t seem very lively, but the sense of doom in the air was unprecedented.

Ji Juechen was already very grim. This was because he knew that he didn’t stand a chance against either Huo Yuhao or Tang Wutong, given his current abilities.

He was a sword fanatic, and thus he was especially sensitive towards weapons. Huo Yuhao’s Morning Dew Dagger and Tang Wutong’s golden trident completely erased his desire to challenge either of them. This was because he knew that his Judgment Sword would immediately be crushed by those two weapons. The same would happen to his sword aura. This was the difference in their qualities. Even if he became a Titled Douluo, things would still not change. He would only possibly stand a chance if he was a Transcendent Douluo.

How could the rest not feel the same way? They had learned that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were already as strong as Titled Douluo. In addition, they weren’t just as strong as ordinary Titled Douluo. They might even be able to challenge a Transcendent Douluo. No wonder their fusion skills were so strong.





Volume 38: The Merfolk's Blessing, Chapter 540.1: The Ice Sea


The practice battle was over. Tang Wutong withdrew her Golden Dragon Spear as she spun around and left.

Huo Yuhao hurriedly chased behind her. “What’s wrong, Wutong?”

Tang Wutong said nothing as she strode towards the tent she was resting in.

“They’re at loggerheads now! For what? Does anyone know?” Xu Sanshi whispered.

Everyone shook their heads blankly, and only Bei Bei thought for a moment as he said, “Yuhao was deliberately giving Wutong a chance, and I think she found that out. That’s the reason why she’s upset.”

“Really? Why did I not see that?” Jiang Nannan was a little unconvinced.

Bei Bei smiled faintly and said, “We all know Yuhao’s abilities. He was giving her a chance from the beginning. Otherwise, he wouldn’t have used Spiritual Blast when he was dodging away. He should have used Spiritual Shock. Furthermore, Yuhao didn’t use his Eye of the Asura from the beginning to the end. He didn’t use his martial soul true body.”

Jiang Nannan asked, “Didn’t Wutong not use her martial soul true body either?”

Bei Bei shook his head. “No, she did. When Wutong was using her abilities related to that purplish-gold sun, she was using them with her martial soul true body. Yuhao had also used Pride of the Ice and Snow Empresses, but he didn’t use his martial soul true body. As for their fight with their weapons in the end, I didn’t understand that. But since Wutong is angry, there must clearly be a reason. Yuhao lost the fight a little too abruptly, and it didn’t seem like he had depleted all his soul power.”

Everyone understood things a little better as they listened to him.

Xu Sanshi chuckled and said, “I didn’t think she’d be so competitive.”

Bei Bei continued, “She’s a Titled Douluo after all! She mustn’t feel very good because a Titled Douluo didn’t defeat a Soul Douluo, even if she was fighting against Yuhao. She should have given her full strength in that fight. I didn’t expect them to have trump cards like that.”

Huo Yuhao had already chased Tang Wutong back into her tent in this moment.

“What’s wrong, Wutong? Talk to me. Don’t be angry,” Huo Yuhao moved next to Tang Wutong with a sheepish smile on his face.

Tang Wutong was still pouting.

Something in Huo Yuhao’s eyes shifted as he suddenly used Instant Teleportation and reappeared right opposite Tang Wutong, facing her, and pressed his lips against hers.

Tang Wutong’s eyes immediately widened as her pouting red lips were kissed. The mild anger in her heart was like a vent as it dissipated immediately.

But in the next moment, a certain someone yelled agonizingly as a powerful beam of golden light blasted him away and sent him hurtling out of the tent, which now had a huge hole in it.

The others from the Tang Sect all quivered as they looked on from a distance. Bei Bei, Xu Sanshi, and He Caitou exchanged glances as the same thought surfaced in their heads.

It’s not such a good thing after all that your wife is so strong!

“Yuhao,” Tang Wutong dashed out from her tent as she came beside Huo Yuhao, who was lying motionless on the ground. That blast was very fierce and forceful, and even she could feel that Huo Yuhao didn’t take that hit easily.

Huo Yuhao groaned as he struggled up from the ground. His body suddenly swayed just as he got to his feet, and he fell into Tang Wutong’s arms.

Tang Wutong was afraid that her seal would blast him away once more, and she hurriedly supported him with her hands. “Are you okay?”

“No. My entire body is hurting, I can’t take it anymore,” Huo Yuhao closed his eyes as he spoke with a pained look on his face.

Tang Wutong hurriedly helped him back into her tent. There were thousands of people watching outside, what did they think was happening?

Tang Wutong helped him onto the bed once they were back in the tent. She couldn’t help but say, “You had it coming. Who asked you to kiss me?”

Huo Yuhao chortled. “You’re too cute when you pout. I couldn’t resist, so I had to kiss your lips. Haih, when is my father-in-law going to remove this seal?”

Tang Wutong grunted and said, “I won’t agree even if Dad wants to remove my seal with your behaviour today.”

“Why? What’s wrong with my behaviour?” Huo Yuhao seemed aggrieved.

Tang Wutong answered, “Of course your behaviour was bad. You weren’t using your full strength from the beginning to the end!”

Huo Yuhao was full of denial. “No! I just had a different fighting style. Did you not see me flipping all my trump cards in the end? But look at what’s happening! We are the ones who are flipping each other’s trump cards. Fortunately, there are no outsiders. Otherwise, we’d be in real trouble.”

Tang Wutong grunted again. “If others don’t understand you, how can I not? Your control over your spiritual power means you are entirely capable of switching more intricately between your martial souls, and you shouldn’t be so disoriented and messy. Furthermore, how dare you say that you completely depleted your soul power in the end?”

Huo Yuhao said, “There was only a little bit left, so I couldn’t just faint, could I? You were so full of energy, and since I would lose in the end anyway, it didn’t make sense for me to drag it out any longer.”

Tang Wutong pouted. “Nonsense. I had almost expended all my soul power, and it’s uncertain who would win in the end if we both expended all our soul power. Furthermore, your Spirits can fight independently. Why didn’t you use them? And you didn’t use your martial soul true body either. I don’t need you to give me a chance.”

Huo Yuhao grabbed her around the waist and said, “When did you become so competitive? But weren’t you holding back too? You didn’t use your Clear Sky Hammer from the beginning to the end. Don’t tell me that you only have one soul ring for that martial soul, because you have the ability to fuse two martial souls together.”

The corner of Tang Wutong’s mouth curved into a faint smile, but she said, “I forgot.”

Huo Yuhao stared at her tender and pretty face that was still fuming as he went up to her ear and whispered, “I really want to bite you.”

Tang Wutong blushed. “You’re so annoying. Hurry up and cultivate to recover. Aren’t we still going to the Ice Sea?”

“A bite won’t delay us for too long. Come here!” Huo Yuhao came even closer with an indecent expression on his face.

Tang Wutong dodged away. She was alert as she stared at him and said, “Are you not afraid that my seal will blast you away again? You’re not in a very good state right now.”

Huo Yuhao felt a little defeated when he heard those words. The previous hit had been quite heavy, and he could still feel throbbing pains around his body even now.

“Father-in-law, when will you appear? Please have mercy on me.” Huo Yuhao fell back onto the bed as he exclaimed up into the sky.

Tang Wutoong pursed her lips into a smile and said, “You should pray harder. My Daddy is almost never around.”

Three battles had been fought, and Shrek Academy’s three soul engineer legions became more cohesive, while their fighting strength also improved. They crushed their opponents in every victory, and that was very beneficial for their confidence.

They had pillaged large amounts of resources, and that covered the three legions’ daily expenses and consumption. Morale was high and growing.

But now, the fourth battle wouldn’t happen for a long time. All the soul masters could only remain in the spectral demiplane to cultivate and wait.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong left his spectral demiplane quietly after resting for an evening.

They appeared at the Ice Sea’s shores. Bone-chilling winds billowed as they came out, and Tang Wutong shivered from the cold.

Huo Yuhao hurriedly took her into his arms as they flew high into the sky.

They had stayed inside his spectral demiplane for a night, and it was already midday on the second day. They gazed in Eastern Sun City’s direction from the sky, but couldn’t see much. At least, there weren’t any traces of reinforcements.

Huo Yuhao had pocketed all the aerial surveillance soul tools mercilessly after they finished pillaging the city, and stored them inside his spectral demiplane. The entire city immediately became both blind and deaf. They didn’t have satellites to pass information on, and they couldn’t send word inland within a short period of time for them to send reinforcements. Eastern Sun City was the largest city in the north, and they had to seek aid from large cities inland so that they could find military forces strong enough to support them.

Their enemy was gone, so the most important matter for them was to send out information while redirecting food to the city.

Eastern Sun City’s first target was Oak City, which was the previous target of Huo Yuhao’s team, when they sent out their messengers. Oak City was one of the most important food warehouses in the north, but it was a pity that their reply was a negative one. All the food left in Eastern Sun City was only enough to sustain their citizens for a week, and disaster would strike if that was dragged out any longer. Eastern Sun City’s rulers were so busy that they were already up to their ears with work.

Even though Huo Yuhao didn’t know what the exact situation was, he could still make a rough guess. He smiled at Tang Wutong and said, “I estimate that Eastern Sun City will need a week to transmit any information to Radiant City. I wonder how Xu Tianran will react when he finds out what has happened.”

Tang Wutong said, “Hopefully, he will turn his armies around in time. We will have achieved our goal if that happens.”

Huo Yuhao shook his head. “It won’t be that simple. The Sun Moon Empire has mobilized their armies to start an invasion, and they won’t change their strategies so easily just because their back ranks have become a little unstable. Therefore, matters at the frontlines won’t change unless the danger in their back ranks reaches a certain threshold. Therefore, our mission has barely begun. When the time comes that Xu Tianran feels that the chaos in his back ranks is threatening his rule, then we have a chance of successfully drawing his armies at the front lines back.”

Tang Wutong said, “Come, let’s go to the Ice Sea.”

Huo Yuhao held her little hand, and Haodong power flowed through their bodies as they flew towards the Ice Sea.

They were in the Extreme North, but the ocean’s surface hadn’t completely frozen over. The ocean was vast and there was no end in sight, while there was warm water flowing beneath the cold waves. This resulted in enormous icebergs and glaciers appearing above the ocean’s surface, but the ocean wasn’t completely frozen over.

Even then, the temperature in this place was so low that normal people couldn’t survive. Blocks of ice floated along the ocean’s icy surface as chilly winds cut to the bone. The winds carried some of the ocean’s pungent smells and chills as they whooshed by continuously.

Huo Yuhao wasn’t afraid of the cold at all. Furthermore, his soul power recovered even more quickly in such an environment, like he was a fish in water.
